1
LETTERS FROM NEW-YORK.
LETTER I.
August 19, 1841.
You ask what is now my opinion of this great Babylon:
and playfully remind me of former philippics, and a long
string of vituperative alliterations, such as magnificence and
mud, finery and filth, diamonds and dirt, bullion and brass
tape, &c. &c. Nor do you forget my first impression of
the city, when we arrived at early dawn, amid fog and
drizzling rain, the expiring lamps adding their smoke to the
impure air, and close beside us a boat called the Fairy
Queen, laden with dead hogs.
Well, Babylon remains the same as then. The din of
crowded life, and the eager chase for gain, still run through
its streets, like the perpetual murmur of a hive. Wealth
dozes on French couches, thrice piled, and canopied with
damask, while Poverty camps on the dirty pavement, or
sleeps off its wretchedness in the watch-house. There,
amid the splendour of Broadway, sits the blind negro
beggar
,
with horny hand and tattered garments, while opposite
to him stands the stately mansion of the slave trader, still
plying his bloody trade, and laughing to scorn the cobweb
laws, through which the strong can break so easily.
In Wall-street, and elsewhere, Mammon, as usual, coolly
calculates his chance of extracting a penny from war,
pes-tilence
,
and famine; and Commerce, with her loaded drays,
and jaded skeletons of horses, is busy as ever fulfilling
the World's contract with the Devil. The noisy discord
of the street-cries gives the ear no rest; and the weak
voice of weary childhood often makes the heart ache for
the poor little wanderer, prolonging his task far into the
hours of night. Sometimes, the harsh sounds are pleasantly
varied by some feminine voice, proclaiming in musical
cadence
,
Hot corn! hot corn! with the poetic addition of
Lily white corn! Buy my lily white corn! When this
sweet, wandering voice salutes my ear, my heart replies
'Tis a glancing gleam o' the gift of song
And the soul that speaks hath suffered wrong.
There
was
a time when all these things would have
passed by me, like the flitting figures of the magic lantern,
or the changing scenery of a theatre, sufficient for the
amusement of an hour. But now, I have lost the power of
looking merely on the surface. Every thing seems to me
to come from the Infinite, to be filled with the Infinite, to be
tending toward the Infinite. Do I see crowds of men
hastening to extinguish a fire? I see not merely uncouth
garbs, and fantastic, flickering lights, of lurid hue, like a
tramping troop of gnomes,but straightway my mind
is filled with thoughts about mutual helpfulness, human
sympathy, the common bond of brotherhood, and the
mysteriously
deep foundations on which society rests; or rather,
on which it now reels and totters.
But I am cutting the lines deep, when I meant only to
give you an airy, unfinished sketch. I will answer your
question, by saying that, though New-York remains the
same, I like it better. This is partly because I am like
the Lady's Delight, ever prone to take root, and look up
with a smile, in whatever soil you place it; and partly
because
bloated disease, and black gutters, and pigs uglier
than their ugly kind, no longer constitute the foreground in
my picture of New-York. I have become more familiar
with the pretty parks, dotted about here and there; with
the shaded alcoves of the various public gardens; with
blooming nooks, and sunny spots of greenery. I am
1
fast inclining to the belief, that the Battery rivals our
beautiful
Boston Common. The fine old trees are indeed
wanting
;
but the newly-planted groves offer the light, flexile
gracefulness of youth, to compete with their matured
majesty
of age. In extent, and variety of surface, this noble
promenade is greatly inferior to ours; but there is,
The sea, the sea, the open sea;
The fresh, the bright, the ever free!
Most fitting symbol of the Infinite, this trackless pathway
of a world! heaving and stretching to meet the sky it never
reacheslike the eager, unsatisfied aspirations of the human
soul. The most beautiful landscape is imperfect without
this feature. In the eloquent language of Lamartine, The
sea is to the scenes of nature what the eye is to a fine
countenance; it illuminates them, it imparts to them that
radiant physiognomy, which makes them live, speak,
enchant
,
and fascinate the attention of those who contemplate
them.
If you deem me heretical in preferring the Battery to
the Common, consecrated by so many pleasant associations
of my youth, I know you will forgive me, if you will go
there in the silence of midnight, to meet the breeze on
your cheek, like the kiss of a friend; to hear the continual
plashing of the sea, like the cool sound of oriental
fountains
;
to see the moon look lovingly on the sea-nymphs,
and throw down wealth of jewels on their shining hair; to
look on the ships in their dim and distant beauty, each
containing within itself, a little world of human thought,
and human passion. Or go, when night, with her
thousand eyes, looks down into the heart, making it also
greatwhen she floats above us, dark and solemn, and
scarcely sees her image in the black mirror of the ocean.
The city lamps surround you, like a shining belt of
descended
constellations, fit for the zone of Urania; while
the pure bright stars peep through the dancing foliage, and
speak to the soul of thoughtful shepherds on the ancient
plains of Chaldea. And there, like mimic Fancy, playing
fantastic freaks in the very presence of heavenly
Imagination
,
stands Castle Gardenwith its gay perspective of
coloured lamps, like a fairy grotto, where imprisoned
fire-spirits
send up sparkling wreaths, or rockets laden with
glittering ear-drops, caught by the floating sea-nymphs, as
they fall.
But if you would see the Battery in
all
its glory, look at
it when, through the misty mantle of retreating dawn, is
seen the golden light of the rising sun! Look at the
horizon
,
where earth, sea, and sky, kiss each other, in robes of
reflected glory! The ships stretch their sails to the coming
breeze, and glide majestically alongfit and graceful
emblems
of the Past; steered by Necessity; the Will
constrained
by outward Force. Quick as a flash, the
steamboat
passes them byits rapidly revolving wheel made
golden by the sunlight, and dropping diamonds to the
laughing
Nereids, profusely as pearls from Prince Esterhazy's
embroidered coat. In that steamer, see you not an
appropriate
type of the busy, powerful, self-conscious Present?
Of man's Will conquering outward Force; and thus making
the elements his servants?
From this southern extremity of the city, anciently called
The Wall of the Half-Moon, you may, if you like, pass
along the Bowery to Bloomingdale, on the north. What a
combination of flowery sounds to take captive the
imagination
!
It is a pleasant road, much used for fashionable
drives; but the lovely names scarcely keep the promise
they give the ear; especially to one accustomed to the
beautiful environs of Boston.
During your ramble, you may meet wandering musicians.
Perhaps a poor Tyrolese with his street-organ, or a Scotch
lad, with shrill bag-pipe, decorated with tartan ribbons.
Let them who will, despise their humble calling. Small
skill, indeed, is needed to grind forth that machinery of
sounds; but my heart salutes them with its benison, in
common with all things that cheer this weary world. I
have little sympathy with the severe morality that drove
these tuneful idlers from the streets of Boston. They are
to the drudging city, what Spring birds are to the country.
The world has passed from its youthful, Troubadour Age,
into the thinking, toiling Age of Reform. This we may
not regret, because it needs must be. But welcome, most
welcome, all that brings back reminiscences of its
childhood
,
in the cheering voice of poetry and song!
Therefore blame me not, if I turn wearily aside from the
dusty road of reforming duty, to gather flowers in sheltered
nooks, or play with gems in hidden grottoes. The
Practical
has striven hard to suffocate the Ideal within me; but
it is immortal, and cannot die. It needs but a glance of
Beauty from earth or sky, and it starts into blooming life,
like the aloe touched by fairy wand.
LETTER II.
August 26, 1841.
You think my praises of the Battery exaggerated;
perhaps
they are so; but there are three points on which I am
crazymusic, moonlight, and the sea. There are other
points, greatly differing from these, on which most
American
juries would be prone to convict me of insanity. You
know a New-York lawyer defined insanity to be a
differing
in opinion from the mass of mankind. By this rule,
I am as mad as a March hare; though, as Andrew
Fair-service
said, Why a hare should be more mad in March
than at Michaelmas, is more than I ken.
I admit that Boston, in her extensive and airy Common,
possesses a blessing unrivalled by any other city; but I am
not the less disposed to be thankful for the circumscribed,
but well-shaded limits of the Washington Parade Ground,
and Union Park, with its nicely trimmed circle of hedge,
its well-rolled gravel walks, and its velvet greensward,
shaven as smooth as a Quaker beau. The exact order of its
arrangement would be offensive in the country; and even
here, the eye of taste would prefer variations, and
undulation
of outline; but trimness seems more in place in a city,
than amid the graceful confusion of nature; and neatness
has a charm in New-York, by reason of its exceeding
rarity
.
St. John's Park, though not without pretensions to
beauty, never strikes my eye agreeably, because it is shut
up from the people; the key being kept by a few genteel
families in the vicinity. You know I am an enemy to
monopolies
;
wishing all Heaven's good gifts to man to be as
free as the wind, and as universal as the sunshine.
I like the various small gardens in New-York, with their
shaded alcoves of lattice-work, where one can eat an
ice-cream
,
shaded from the sun. You have none such in
Boston
;
and they would probably be objected to, as open to
the vulgar and the vicious. I do not walk through the
world with such fear of soiling my garments. Let science,
literature, music, flowers, all things that tend to cultivate
the intellect, or humanize the heart, be open to Tom,
Dick, and Harry; and thus, in process of time, they will
become Mr. Thomas, Richard, and Henry. In all these
things, the refined should think of what they can
import,
not of what they can
receive
.
As for the vicious, they excite in me more of compassion
than of dislike. The Great Searcher of Hearts alone
knows whether I should not have been as they are, with the
same neglected childhood, the same vicious examples, the
same overpowering temptation of misery and want. If they
will but pay to virtue the outward homage of decorum, God
forbid that I should wish to exclude them from the
healthful
breeze, and the shaded promenade. Wretched enough
are they in their utter degradation; nor is society so
guiltless
of their ruin, as to justify any of its members in
unpitying
scorn.
And this reminds me that in this vast emporium of
poverty
and crime, there are,
morally
speaking, some flowery
nooks, and sunny spots of greenery. I used to say, I
knew not where were the ten righteous men to save the
city; but I have found them now. Since then, The
Washington
Temperance Society has been organized, and
active in good works. Apart from the physical
purity
,
the triumph of soul over sense, implied in abstinence
from stimulating liquors, these societies have peculiarly
interested me, because they are based on the Law of Love.
The Pure is inlaid in the Holy, like a pearl set in fine
gold. Here is no fifteen-gallon-law, no attendance upon
the lobbies of legislatures, none of the bustle or manuvres
of political party; measures as useless in the moral world,
as machines to force water above its level are in the
physical
world. Serenely above all these, stands this new
Genius
of Temperance; her trust in Heaven, her hold on the
human heart. To the fallen and the perishing she throws
a silken cord, and gently draws him within the golden
circle
of human brotherhood. She has learned that
persuasion
is mightier than coercion, that the voice of
encouragement
finds and echo in the heart deeper, far deeper, than the
thunder of reproof.
The blessing of the perishing, and of the merciful God,
who cares for them, will rest upon the Washington
Temperance
Society. A short time since, one of its members
found an old acquaintance lying asleep in a dirty alley,
scarcely covered with filthy rags, pinned and tied together.
Being waked, the poor fellow exclaimed, in piteous tones,
Oh don't take me to the Police OfficePlease don't take
me there. Oh, no, replied the missionary of mercy;
you shall have shoes to your feet, and a decent coat on
your back, and be a Man again! We have better work for
you to do, than to lie in prison. You will be a Temperance
preacher, yet.
He was comfortably clothed, kindly encouraged, and
employment procured for him at the printing office of the
Washington Society. He now works steadily all day, and
preaches temperance in the evening. Every week I hear
of similar instances. Are not these men enough to save a
city? This Society is one among several powerful agencies
now at work, to teach society that it
makes its own criminals,
and then, at prodigious loss of time, money, and morals,
punishes its own work.
The other day, I stood by the wayside while a
Washingtonian
procession, two miles long, passed by. All
classes and trades were represented, with appropriate
music
and banners. Troops of boys carried little wells and
pumps; and on many of the banners were flowing fountains
and running brooks. One represented a wife kneeling in
gratitude for a husband restored to her and himself; on
another, a group of children were joyfully embracing the
knees of a reformed father. Fire companies were there
with badges and engines; and military companies, with
gaudy colours and tinsel trappings. Toward the close,
came two barouches, containing the men who first started
a Temperance Society on the Washingtonian plan. These
six individuals were a carpenter, a coach-maker, a tailor, a
blacksmith, a wheelwright, and a silver-plater. They held
their meetings in a carpenter's shop, in Baltimore, before
any other person took an active part in the reform. My
heart paid them reverence, as they passed. It was a
beautiful pageant, and but one thing was wanting to make
it complete; there should have been carts drawn by
garlanded
oxen, filled with women and little children, bearing
1*
a banner, on which was inscribed, WE ARE HAPPY
NOW! I missed the women and the children; for
without
something to represent the genial influence of domestic
life, the circle of joy and hope is ever incomplete.
But the absent ones were present to my mind; and the
pressure of many thoughts brought tears to my eyes. I
seemed to see John the Baptist preparing a pathway through
the wilderness for the coming of the Holiest; for like unto
his is this mission of temperance. Clean senses are fitting
vessels for pure affections and lofty thoughts.
Within the outward form I saw, as usual, spiritual
significance
.
As the bodies of men were becoming weaned
from stimulating drinks, so were their souls beginning to
approach those pure fountains of living water, which refresh
and strengthen, but never intoxicate. The music, too, was
revealed to me in fulness of meaning. Much of it was of
a military character, and cheered onward to combat and to
victory. Everything about war I loathe and detest, except
its music. My heart leaps at the trumpet-call, and marches
with the drum. Because I cannot ever hate it, I know that
it is the utterance of something good, perverted to a
ministry
of sin. It is the voice of resistance to evil, of combat
with the false; therefore the brave soul springs forward at
the warlike tone, for in it is heard a call to its appointed
mission. Whoso does not see that genuine life is a battle
and a march, has poorly read his origin and his destiny.
Let the trumpet sound, and the drums roll! Glory to
resistance
!
for through its agency men become angels. The
instinct awakened by martial music is noble and true; and
therefore its voice will not pass away; but it will cease to
represent war with carnal weapons, and remain a type of
that spiritual combat, whereby the soul is purified. It is
right noble to fight with wickedness and wrong; the
mistake
is in supposing that spiritual evil can be overcome by
physical means.
Would that Force were banished to the unholy region,
whence it came, and that men would learn to trust more
fully in the law of kindness. I think of this, every time I
pass a dozing old woman, who, from time immemorial, has
sat behind a fruit stall at the corner of St. Paul's church.
Half the time she is asleep, and the wonder is that any
fruit remains upon her board; but in this wicked city very
many of the boys deposit a cent, as they take an apple; for
they have not the heart to wrong one who trusts them
.
A sea-captain of my acquaintance, lately returned from
China, told me that the Americans and English were much
more trusted by the natives, than their own countrymen;
that the fact of belonging to those nations was generally
considered good security in a bargain. I expressed
surprise
at this; not supposing the Yankees, or their ancestors,
were peculiarly distinguished for generosity in trade. He
replied, that they were more so in China, than at home;
because, in the absence of adequate laws, and legal
penalties
,
they had acquired the habit of
trusting in each others'
honour and honesty:
and this formed a bond so sacred, that
few were willing to break it. I saw deep significance in
the fact.
Speaking of St. Paul's church, near the Astor House,
reminds
me of the fault so often found by foreigners with our
light grey stone, as a material for Gothic edifices. Though
this church is not Gothic, I now understand why such
buildings
contrast disadvantageously with the dark colored
cathedrals
of Europe. St. Paul's has lately been covered
with a cement of dark, reddish-brown sand. Some
complain
that it looks like gingerbread; but for myself, I
greatly like the depth of colour. Its steeple now stands
relieved
against the sky, with a sombre grandeur, which
would be in admirable keeping with the massive
proportions
of Gothic architecture. Grey and slate colour
appropriately
belong to lighter styles of building; applied to the
Gothic, they become like tragic
thoughts
uttered in mirthful
tones
.
The disagreeables of New-York, I deliberately mean to
keep out of sight, when I write to you. By contemplating
beauty, the character becomes beautiful; and in this
wearisome
world, I deem it a duty to speak genial words, and
wear cheerful looks.
Yet, for once, I will depart from this rule, to speak of the
dog-killers. Twelve or fifteen hundred of these animals
have been killed this summer; in the hottest of the
weather
at the rate of three hundred a day. The safety of the
city doubtless requires their expulsion; but the
manner
of
it strikes me as exceedingly cruel and demoralizing. The
poor creatures are knocked down on the pavement, and
beat to death. Sometimes they are horribly maimed, and
run howling and limping away. The company of
dog-killers
themselves are a frightful sight, with their bloody
clubs, and spattered garments. I always run from the
window
when I hear them; for they remind me of the Reign of
Terror. Whether such brutal scenes do not prepare the
minds of the young to take part in bloody riots and
revolutions
is a serious question.
You promised to take my letters as they happened to
comefanciful, gay, or serious. I am in autumnal mood
to-day, therefore forgive the sobriety of my strain.
LETTER III.
September 2, 1841.
Oh, these damp, sultry days of August! how oppressive
they are to mind and body! The sun staring at you from
bright red walls, like the shining face of a heated cook.
Strange to say they are
painted
red, blocked off with white
compartments, as numerous as Protestant sects, and as
unlovely
in their narrowness. What an expenditure for
ugliness
and discomfort to the eye! To paint bricks their own
color, resembles the great outlay of time and money in
theological schools, to enable dismal, arbitrary souls to give
an approved image of themselves in their ideas of Deity.
After all, the God
within
us is the God we really believe
in, whatever we may have learned in catechisms or creeds.
Hence to some, the divine image presents itself
habitually
as a dark, solemn shadow, saddening the gladsomeness
of earth, like thunder-clouds reflected on the fair mirror of
the sea. To others, the religious sentiment is to the soul
what Spring is in the seasons, flowers to the eye, and music
to the ear. In the greatest proportion of minds these
sentiments
are mixed, and therefore two images are reflected,
one to be worshipped with love, the other with fear.
Hence, in Catholic countries, you meet at one corner of
the road frightfully painted hell-fires, into which poor
struggling
human souls are sinking; and at another, the sweet
Madonna, with her eye of pity and her lip of love.
Whenever
God appears to the eye of faith as terrible in power,
and stern in vengeance, the soul craves some form of
mediation
,
and satisfies its want. As the reprobate
college-boy
trusts to a mother's persuasive love to intercede for him
with an angry father, so does the Catholic, terrified with
visions of torment, look up trustingly to the Blessed
mother
,
Virgin mild.
Not lightly, or scornfully, would I speak of any such
manifestations of faith, childish as they may appear to the
eye of reason. The Jewish dispensation was announced
in thunder and lightning; the Christian, by a chorus of love
from angel voices. The dark shadow of the one has
fearfully
thrown itself across the mild radiance of the other.
Those old superstitious times could not well do otherwise
than mix their dim theology with the new-born glorious
hope. Well may we rejoice that they could not transmit
the blessed Idea completely veiled in gloom. Since the
Past
will
overlap upon the Present, and therefore
Christianity
must
slowly evolve itself from Judaism, let us at
least be thankful that,
From the same grim turret fell
The
shadow
and the
song
.
Whence came all this digression? It has as little to do
with New-York, as a seraph has to do with Banks and
Markets. Yet in good truth, it all came from a painted
brick wall staring in at my chamber window. What a
strange thing is the mind! How marvellously is the
infinite
embodied in the smallest fragment of the finite!
It was ungrateful in me to complain of those walls, for
I am more blest in my prospect than most inhabitants of
cities; even without allowing for the fact that more than
most others, I always see much
within
a landscapea
light and a revealing, every where.
Opposite to me is a little, little, patch of garden, trimly
kept, and neatly white-washed. In the absence of rippling
brooks and blooming laurel, I am thankful for its marigolds
and poppies,
side by side,
And at each end a hollyhock,
With an edge of London Pride.
And then between me and the sectarian brick wall, there
are, moreover, two beautiful young trees. An Ailanthus
twisting its arms lovingly within its smaller sister
Catalpa
.
One might almost imagine them two lovely nymphs
suddenly transformed to trees in the midst of a graceful,
twining dance. I should be half reluctant to cut a cluster
of the beautiful crimson seed-vessels, lest I should wound
the finger of some Hamadryad,
Those simple crown-twisters,
Who of one favorite tree in some sweet spot,
Make home and leave it not.
But I must quit this strain; or you will say the fair,
floating
Grecian shadow casts itself too obviously over
my
Christianity. Perchance, you will even call me
transcendental
;
that being a word of most elastic signification,
used to denote every thing that has no name in particular,
and that does not especially relate to pigs and poultry.
Have patience with me, and I will come straight back
from the Ilissus to New-Yorkthus.
You too, would worship two little trees and a sunflower,
if you had gone with me to the neighbourhood of the Five
Points the other day. Morally and physically, the
breathing
air was like an open tomb. How souls or bodies
could live there, I could not imagine. If you want to see
something worse than Hogarth's Gin Lane, go there in a
warm afternoon, when the poor wretches have come to
what they call home, and are not yet driven within doors, by
darkness and constables. There you will see nearly every
form of human misery, every sign of human degradation.
The leer of the licentious, the dull sensualism of the
drunkard
,
the sly glance of the thiefoh, it made my heart ache
for many a day. I regretted the errand of kindness that
drew me there; for it stunned my senses with the amount
of evil, and fell upon the strong hopefulness of my
character
,
like a stroke of the palsy. What a place to ask one's
self, Will the millenium ever come!
And there were multitudes of childrenof little
girls
.
Where were their guardian angels? God be praised, the
wilfully committed sin alone shuts out their influence; and
therefore into the young child's soul they may always
enter.
Mournfully, I looked upon these young creatures, as I
said within myself, And
this
is the education society gives
her childrenthe morality of myrmidons, the charity of
constables! Yet in the far-off Future I saw a gleam.
For these too Christ has died. For these was the chorus
sung over the hills of Judea; and the heavenly music will
yet find an echo deep in their hearts.
It is said a spacious pond of sweet, soft water once
occupied
the place where Five Points stands. It might have
furnished half the city with the purifying element; but it
was filled up at incredible expensea million loads of
earth being thrown in, before perceivable progress was
made. Now, they have to supply the city with water from
a distance, by the prodigious expense of the Croton Water
Works.
This is a good illustration of the policy of society
toward
crime. Thus does it choke up nature, and then seek
to protect itself from the result, by the incalculable expense
of bolts, bars, the gallows, watch-houses, police courts,
constables
,
and Egyptian tombs, as they call one of the
principal prisons here. If viewed only as a
blunder,
Satan
might well laugh at the short-sightedness of the world, all
the while toiling to build the edifice it thinks it is
demolishing
.
Destroying violence by violence, cunning by cunning,
is Sisyphus' work, and must be so to the end. Never shall
we bring the angels among us, by setting one devil up to
knock another devil down; as the old woman said, in
homely but expressive phrase.
LETTER IV.
September 9, 1841.
New-York enjoys a great privilege, in facility and
cheapness
of communication with many beautiful places in the
vicinity
.
For six cents one can exchange the hot and dusty city,
for Staten Island, Jersey, or Hoboken; three cents will
convey
you to Brooklyn, and twelve and a half cents pays for a
most beautiful sail of ten miles, to Fort Lee. In addition
to the charm of rural beauty, all these places are bathed by
deep waters.
The Indians, named the most beautiful lake of New
England
Win-ne-pe-sauk-ey, (by corruption, Winnepiseogee,
which means, the Smile of the Great Spirit. I always think
of this name, so expressively poetic, whenever I see
sunbeams
or moonbeams glancing on the waves.
Because this feature is wanting in the landscape, I think
our beautiful Massachusetts Brookline,with its graceful,
feathery elms, its majestic old oaks, its innumerable hidden
nooks of greenery, and Jamaica pond, that lovely, lucid
mirror
of the water nymphs,is scarcely equal to Hoboken.
I saw it for the first time in the early verdure of spring, and
under the mild light of a declining sun. A small open
glade, with natural groves in the rear, and the broad river at
its foot, bears the imposing name of Elysian Fields. The
scene is one where a poet's disembodied spirit might be
well content to wander; but, alas, the city intrudes her vices
into this beautiful sanctuary of nature. There stands a
public
house, with its bar room, and bowling alley, a place of
resort for the idle and the profligate; kept within the bounds
of decorum, however, by the constant presence of
respectable
visiters.
Near this house, I found two tents of Indians. These
children of the forest, like the monks of olden time, always
had a fine eye for the picturesque. Wherever you find a
ruined monastery, or the remains of an Indian encampment,
you may be sure you have discovered the loveliest site in
all the surrounding landscape.
A fat little pappoose, round as a tub, with eyes like black
beads, attracted my attention by the comical awkwardness
of its tumbling movements. I entered into conversation
with the parents, and found they belonged to the remnant of
the Penobscot tribe. This, as Scott says, was picking up
a dropped stitch in the adventures of my life.
Ah, said I, I once ate supper with your tribe in a
hemlock forest, on the shores of the Kennebec. Is the old
chief, Capt. Neptune, yet alive?
They almost clapped their hands with delight, to find one
who remembered Capt. Neptune. I inquired for Etalexis,
his nephew, and this was to them another familiar word,
which it gave them joy to hear.
Long forgotten scenes were restored to memory, and the
images of early youth stood distinctly before me. I
seemed
to see old Neptune and his handsome nephew, a tall,
athletic youth, of most graceful proportions. I always used
to think of Etalexis, when I read of Benjamin West's
exclamation
,
the first time he saw the Apollo Belvidere: My
God! how like a young Mohawk warrior!
But for years I had not thought of the majestic young
Indian
,
until the meeting in Hoboken again brought him to
my mind. I seemed to see him as I saw him lastthe
very dandy of his tribewith a broad band of shining brass
about his hat, a circle of silver on his breast, tied with
scarlet
ribbons, and a long belt of curiously-wrought wampum
hanging to his feet. His uncle stood quietly by, puffing
his pipe, undisturbed by the consciousness of wearing a
crushed hat and a dirty blanket. With girlish curiosity, I
raised the heavy tassels of the wampum belt, and said
playfully
to the old man, Why don't
you
wear such an one as
this!
What for
me
wear ribbons and beads? he replied:
Me no want to catch 'em
squaw
.
He spoke in the slow, imperturbable tone of his race; but
there was a satirical twinkle in his small black eye, as if he
had sufficiently learned the tricks of civilization to enjoy
mightily any jokes upon women.
We purchased a basket in the Elysian Fields, as a
memento
of these ghosts of the Past: preferring an unfinished
one of pure white willow, unprofaned by daubs of red and
yellow.
Last week I again saw Hoboken in the full glory of
moonlight
.
Seen thus, it is beautiful beyond imagining. The
dark, thickly shaded groves, where flickering shadows, play
fantastic gambols with the moonlight; the water peeping here
and there through the foliage, like the laughing face of a
friend; the high, steep banks, wooded down to the margin
of the river,; the deep loneliness, interrupted only by the
Katy-dids; all conspired to produce an impression of solemn
beauty.
If you follow this path for about three miles from the
landing-place
,
you arrive at Weehawken; celebrated as the place
where Hamilton fought his fatal duel with Burr, and where
his son likewise fell in a duel the year preceding. The place
is difficult of access; but hundreds of men and women have
there engraven their names on a rock nearly as hard as
adamant
.
A monument to Hamilton was here erected at
considerable
expense; but it became the scene of such frequent
duels, that the gentlemen who raised it caused it to be
broken
into fragments; it is still, however, frequented for the
same bad purpose. What a lesson to distinguished men to
be careful of the moral influence they exert! I probably
admire Hamilton with less enthusiasm than those who fully
sympathize with his conservative tendencies; but I find so
much to reverence in the character of this early friend of
Washington, that I can never sufficiently regret the silly
cowardice which led himin to so fatal an error. Yet would I
speak of it gently, as Pierpont does in his political poem:
Wert thou spotless in thy exit? Nay:
Nor spotless is the monarch of the day.
Still but
one
cloud shall o'er thy fame be cast
And that shall shade no action, but thy
last
.
A fine statue of Hamilton was wrought by Ball Hughes,
which, like all resemblances of him, forcibly reminded one
of William Pitt. It was placed in the Exchange, in Wall
street, and was crushed into atoms by the falling in of the
roof, at the great fire of 1835. The artist stood gazing on
the scene with listless despair; and when this favourite
production
of his genius, on which he had bestowed the labour
of two long years, fell beneath the ruins, he sobbed and
wept like a child.
The little spot at Weehawken, which led to this
digression
about Hamilton, is one of the last places which should
be desecrated by the evil passions of man. It is as lovely
as a nook of Paradise, before Satan entered its gardens.
Where the steep, well wooded bank descends to the broad,
bright Hudson, half way down is a level glade of verdant
grass, completely embowered in foliage. The sparkling
water peeps between the twining boughs, like light through
the rich tracery of Gothic windows; and the cheerful
twittering
of birds alone mingles with the measured cadence of
the plashing waves. Here Hamilton fought his duel, just
as the sun was rising:
Clouds slumbering at his feet, and the clear blue
Of Summer's sky, in beauty bending o'er him
The city bright below; and far away,
Sparkling in golden light, his own romantic bay.
Tall spire, and glittering roof, and battlement,
And banners floating in the sunny air,
And white sails o'er the calm blue waters bent,
Green isle and circling shore, all blended there,
In wild reality.
We descended, to return to the steamboat, by an open
path on the river's edge. The high bank, among whose
silent groves we had been walking, now rose above our
heads in precipitous masses of rugged stone, here and there
broken into recesses, which, in the evening light, looked
like darksome caverns. Trees bent over the very edge of the
summit, and their unearthed roots twisted among the rocks
like huge serpents. On the other side lay the broad
Hudson
in the moonlight, its waves rippling up to the shore with
a cool, refreshing sound.
All else was stillstillso fearfully still, that one might
almost count the beatings of the heart. That my heart
did
beat, I acknowledge; for here was the supposed scene of
the Mary Rogers' tragedy; and though the recollection of
her
gave me no uneasiness, I could not forget that quiet,
lovely path we were treading was near to the city, with its
thousand hells, and frightfully easy of access.
We spoke of the murdered girl, as we passed the
beautiful
promontory near the Sybil's cave, where her body was
found, lying half in and half out of the water. A few steps
further on, we encountered the first human beings we had
met during the whole of our long rambletwo young
women
,
singing with a somewhat sad constraint, as if to keep
their courage up.
I had visited the Sybil's cave in the day time; and should
have entered its dark mouth by the moonlight, had not the
aforesaid remembrances of the city haunted me like evil
spirits.
We Americans, you know, are so fond of classic names
that we call a village Athens, if it has but three houses,
painted red to blush for their own ugliness. Whence this
cave derives its imposing title I cannot tell. It is in
fact rather a pretty little place, cut out of soft stone, in rude
imitation of a Gothic interior. A rock in the centre,
scooped
out like a baptismal font, contains a spring of cool, sweet
water. The entire labour of cutting out this cave was
performed
by one poor Scotchman, with chisel and hammer.
He worked upon it an entire year; and probably could not
have completed it in less than six months, had he given
every day of his time. He expected to derive
considerable
profit by selling draughts from the spring, and keeping
a small fruit stand near it. But alas, for the vanity of
human
expectations! a few weeks after he completed his
laborious
task, he was driven off the grounds, it is said,
unrequited
by the proprietor.
A little before nine, we returned to the city. There was
a strong breeze, and the boat bounded over the waves,
producing
that delightful sensation of elasticity and vigour which
one feels when riding a free and fiery steed. The moon,
obscured by fleecy clouds, shone with a saddened glory;
rockets rose from Castle Garden, and dropped their blazing
jewels on the billowy bosom of the bay; the lamps of the
city gleamed in the distance; and with painful pity for the
houseless street-wanderer, I gratefully remembered that one
of those distant lights illuminated a home, where true and
honest hearts were ever ready to bid me welcome.
LETTER V.
September 16, 1841
Since I wrote last, I have again visited Hoboken to see
a band of Scotchmen in the old Highland costume. They
belong to a Benevolent Society for the relief of indigent
countrymen; and it is their custom to meet annually in
Gaelic dress, to run, leap, hurl stones, and join in other
Highland exercisesin fond remembrance of
The land of rock and glen,
Of strath, and lake, and mountain,
And moreof gifted men.
There were but thirty or forty in number, and a very
small proportion of them fine specimens of manhood. There
was one young man, however, who was no bad sample of
a brave young chief in the olden time; with athletic frame,
frank countenance, bold bearing, and the bright, eager eye
of one familiar with rugged hills and the mountain breeze.
Before I was told, my eye singled him out, as most likely
to bear away the prizes in the games. There was mettle
in him, that in another age and in another clime, would have
enabled him to stand beside brave old Torquil of the Oak,
and give the cheerful response,
Bas air son Eachin
.
(Death for Hector.)
But that age has past, blessed be God; and he was
nothing
more than a handsome, vigorous Scotch emigrant,
skilful in Highland games.
The dresses in general, like the wardrobe of a theatre,
needed the effect of distance to dazzle the imagination;
though two or three of them were really elegant. Green
or black velvet, with glittering buttons, was fitted close to
the arms and waist; beneath which fell the tartan kilt in
ample folds; from the left shoulder flowed a long mantle of
bright-coloured plaid, chosen according to the varieties of
individual taste, not as distinguishing marks of ancestral
clans. Their shaggy pouches, called
sporrans,
were of
plush or fur. From the knee to the ancle, there was no
other covering than the Highland buskin of crimson plaid.
One or two had dirks with sheaths and hilts beautifully
embossed in silver, and ornamented with large crystals
from Cairngorm; St. Andrew and the thistle, exquisitely
wrought on the blades of polished steel.
These were exceptions; for, as I have said, the corps in
general had a theatrical appearance; nor can I say they
bore their standards, or unsheathed their claymores, with a
grace quite sufficient to excite my imagination. Two boys,
of eight or ten years old, who carried the tassels of the
central
banner, in complete Highland costume, pleased me more
than all the others; for children receive gracefulness from
nature, and learn awkwardness of men.
But though there were many accompaniments to render
the scene common-place and vulgar, yet it was not
without
pleasurable excitement, slightly tinged with romance,
that I followed them along the steep banks of Hoboken, and
caught glimpses of them between the tangled foliage of the
trees, or the sinuosities of rocks, almost as rugged as their
own mountain-passes. Banners and mantles, which might
not have borne too close inspection, looked graceful as they
floated so far beneath me; and the sound of the bagpipes
struck less harshly on my ear, than when the musicians
stood at my side. But even softened by distance, I thought
the shrill wailing of this instrument appropriate only to
Clan
Chattan,
whose Chief was called
Mohr ar chat,
or the
Great Cat.
As a phantom of the Past, this little pageant interested
me extremely. I thought of the hatred of those fierce old
clans, whose blood refused to mix, even if poured into
the same vessel. They were in the State what sects are
in the Churchnarrow, selfish, and vindictive.
The State has dissolved
her
clans, and the Church is
fast following the good example; though there are still
sectaries
casting their shadows on the sunshine of God's
earth, who, if they were to meet on the Devil's Bridge, as
did the two old feudal chieftains of Scotland, would, like
them, choose death rather than humble prostration for the
safe foot-path of an enemy.
Clans have forgotten old quarrels, and not only mingled
together, but with a hostile nation. National pride and
national
glory is but a more extended clanship, destined to be
merged in universal love for the human race. Then
farewell
to citadels and navies, tariffs and diplomatists; for the
prosperity of
each
will be the prosperity of
all
.
In religion, too, the spirit of extended, as well as of narrow
clanship will cease. Not only will Christianity forget its
minor subdivisions, but it will
itself
cease to be sectarian.
That only will be a genuine World's Convention, when
Christians, with reverent tenderness for the religious
sentiment
in every form, are willing that Mohammedans or
Pagans
should unite with them in every good work, without
abstaining from ceremonies which to them are sacred.
The Turks, says Lamartine, always manifest
respect
for what other men venerate and adore. Wherever a
Mussulman sees the image of God in the opinion of his
fellow-creatures
,
he bows down and he respects; persuaded
that the
intention
sanctifies the
form
.
This sentiment of reverence, so universal among
Mohammedans
,
and so divine in its character, might well lead
Pierpont to ask, when standing in the burying-ground of
Constantinople,
If all that host,
Whose turbaned marbles o'er them nod
Were doomed, when giving up the ghost,
To die as those who have no God?
No, no, my God! They worshipped
Thee
;
Then let not doubts my spirit darken,
That Thou, who always hearest me,
To these, thy children too, didst hearken.
The world, regenerated and made free, will at last bid a glad
farewell to clans and sects! Would that their graves were
dug and their requiems sung; and nothing but their
standards
and costumes left, as curious historical records of the
benighted Past.
2
LETTER VI.
September 23, 1841.
I lately visited the Jewish Synagogue in Crosby-street,
to witness the Festival of the New Year, which was
observed
for two days, by religious exercises and a general
suspension of worldly business. The Jewish year, you
are aware, begins in September; and they commemorate
it in obedience to the following text of Scripture: In the
first day of the seventh month ye shall have a Sabbath, a
memorial of blowing of trumpets, a holy convocation. Ye
shall do no servile work therein.
It was the first time I ever entered any place of worship
where Christ was not professedly believed in. Strange
vicissitudes of circumstance, over which I had no control,
have brought me into intimate relation with almost every
form of Christian faith, and thereby given me the power of
looking candidly at religious opinions from almost any point
of view. But beyond the pale of the great sect of
Christianity
I had never gone; though far back in my early years,
I remember an intense desire to be enough acquainted with
some intelligent and sincere Mohammedan, to enable me to
look at the Koran through
his
spectacles.
The women were seated separately, in the upper part of
the house. One of the masters of Israel came, and
somewhat
gruffly ordered me, and the young lady who
accompanied
me, to retire from the front seats of the synagogue.
It was uncourteous; for we were very respectful and still,
and not in the least disposed to intrude upon the daughters
of Jacob. However, my sense of justice was rather
gratified
at being treated contemptuously as a Gentile and a
Nazarene; for I remembered the contumely with which
they
had been treated throughout Christendom, and I
imagined
how they must feel, on entering a place of Christian
worship, to hear us sing,
With hearts as hard as stubborn Jews,
That unbelieving race.
The effect produced on my mind, by witnessing the
ceremonies
of the Jewish Synogogue, was strange and
bewildering
;
spectral and flitting; with a sort of vanishing
resemblance
to reality; the magic lantern of the Past.
Veneration and Ideality, you know, would have made
me wholly a poet, had not the inconvenient size of
Conscientiousness
forced me into reforms; between the two,
I look upon the Future with active hope, and upon the Past
with loving reverence. My mind was, therefore, not only
unfettered by narrow prejudice, but solemnly impressed
with recollections of those ancient times when the Divine
Voice was heard amid the thunders of Sinai, and the Holy
Presence shook the mercy-seat between the cherubim. I
had, moreover, ever cherished a tenderness for
Israel's wandering race, that go
Unblest through every land;
Whose blood hath stained the polar snow
And quenched the desert sand:
Judea's homeless hearts, that turn
From all earth's shrines to thee,
With their lone faith for ages borne
In sleepless memory.
Thus prepared, the scene would have strongly excited
my imagination and my feelings, had there not been a
heterogeneous jumbling of the Present with the Past.
There was the Ark containing the Sacred Law, written
on scrolls of vellum, and rolled, as in the time of Moses;
but between the Ark and the congregation, instead of the
brazen laver, wherein those who entered into the
tabernacle
were commanded to wash, was a common bowl and
ewer of English delf, ugly enough for the chamber of a
country tavern. All the male members of the
congregation
,
even the little boys, while they were within the
synagogue
,
wore fringed silk mantles, bordered with blue stripes;
for Moses was commanded to Speak unto the children of
Israel, and bid them that they make them fringes in the
borders of their garments, throughout their generations,
and that they put upon the fringe of their borders a ribbon
of blue;but then these mantles were worn over modern
broadcloth coats, and fashionable pantaloons with straps.
The Priest indeed approached more nearly to the
gracefulness
of oriental costume; for he wore a full black silk robe,
like those worn by the Episcopal clergy; but the large
white silk shawl which shaded his forehead, and fell over
his shoulders, was drawn over a common black hat! Ever
and anon, probably in parts of the ceremony deemed
peculiarly
sacred, he drew the shawl entirely over his face, as
he stooped forward and laid his forehead on the book
before
him. I suppose this was done because Moses, till
he had done speaking with the congregation, put a veil
upon his face. But through the whole, priest and people
kept on their hats. My spirit was vexed with this
incongruity
.
I had turned away from the turmoil of the Present,
to gaze quietly for a while on the grandeur of the Past;
and the representatives of the Past walked before me, not
in the graceful oriental turban, but the useful European
hat! It broke the illusion completely.
The ceremonies altogether impressed me with less
solemnity
than those of the Catholic Church; and gave me
the idea of far less faith and earnestness in those engaged
therein. However, some allowance must be made for
this: first, because the common bond of faith in Christ
was wanting between us; and secondly, because all the
services were performed in Hebrew, of which I
understood
not one syllable. To see mouths opened to chant
forth a series of unintelligible sounds, has the same kind of
fantastic unreality about it, that there is in witnessing a
multitude dancing, when you hear no music. But after
making all these allowances, I could not escape the
conclusion
that the ceremonies were shuffled through in a cold,
mechanical style. The priest often took up his watch,
which lay before him; and assuredly this chanting of
prayers by Shrewsbury clock is not favourable to
solemnity
.
The chanting was unmusical, consisting of monotonous
ups and downs of the voice, which, when the whole
congregation
joined in it, sounded like the continuous roar of
the sea.
The trumpet, which was blown by a Rabbi, with a shawl
drawn over his hat and face, was of the ancient shape,
somewhat resembling a cow's horn. It did not send forth
a spirit-stirring peal; but the sound groaned and struggled
through itnot at all reminding one of the days when
There rose the choral hymn of praise,
And trump and timbrel answered keen,
And Zion's daughters poured their lays,
With priest and warrior's voice between.
I observed, in the English translation on one side of an
open prayer book, these words: When the trumpet shall
blow on the holy mountain, let all the earth hear! Let
them which are scattered in Assyria, and perishing in
Egypt, gather themselves together in the Holy City. I
looked around upon the congregation, and I felt that Judea
no longer awoke at the sound of the trumpet!
The ark, on a raised platform, was merely a kind of
semicircular
closet, with revolving doors. It was surmounted
by a tablet, bearing a Hebrew inscription in gilded letters.
The doors were closed and opened at different times, with
much ceremony; sometimes, a man stood silently before
them, with a shawl drawn over his hat and face. When
opened, they revealed festoons of white silk damask,
suspended
over the sacred rolls of the Pentateuch; each roll
enveloped in figured satin, and surmounted by ornaments
with silver bells. According to the words of Moses,
Thou shalt put into the ark the testimony which I shall
give thee. Two of these rolls were brought out, opened
by the priest, turned round toward all the congregation,
and after portions of them had been chanted for nearly two
hours, were again wrapped in satin, and carried slowly
back to the ark, in procession, the people chanting the
Psalms of David, and the little bells tinkling as they moved.
While they were chanting an earnest prayer for the
coming
of the Promised One, who was to restore the scattered
tribes, I turned over the leaves, and by a singular
coincidence
my eye rested on these words: Abraham said, see
ye not the splendid light now shining on Mount Moriah?
And they answered,
nothing but caverns do we see
. I
thought of Jesus, and the whole pageant became more
spectral than ever; so strangely vague and shadowy, that
I felt as if under the influence of magic.
The significant sentence reminded me of a German
friend, who shared his sleeping apartment with another
gentleman, and both were in the habit of walking very
early in the morning. One night, his companion rose
much earlier than he intended; and perceiving his
mistake
,
placed a lighted lamp in the chimney corner, that its
glare might not disturb the sleeper, leaned his back against
the fire-place, and began to read. Sometime after, the
German rose, left him reading, and walked forth into the
morning twilight. When he returned, the sun was
shining
high up in the heavens; but his companion,
unconscious
of the change, was still reading by lamp light in the
chimney corner. And this the Jews are now doing, as
well as a very large proportion of Christians.
Ten days from the Feast of Trumpets, comes the Feast
of the Atonement. Five days after, the Feast of
Tabernacles
is observed for seven days. Booths of evergreen
are erected in the synagogue, according to the injunction,
Ye shall dwell in booths seven days; all that are
Israelites
born shall dwell in booths. And ye shall take the
boughs of goodly trees, branches of palm trees, and the
boughs of thick trees, and willows of the brook; and ye
shall rejoice before the Lord your God seven days.
Last week, a new synagogue was consecrated in
Attorney-street
;
making, I believe, five Jewish Synagogues in
this city, comprising in all about ten thousand of this
ancient
people. The congregation of the new synagogue
are German emigrants, driven from Bavaria, the Duchy of
Baden, &c., by oppressive laws. One of these laws
forbade
Jews to marry; and among the emigrants were many
betrothed couples, who married as soon as they landed on
our shores; trusting their future support to the God of
Jacob. If not as rich as Jews, they are now most of
them doing well in the world; and one of the first proofs
they gave of prosperity, was the erection of a place of
worship.
The oldest congregation of Jews in New-York, were
called
Shewith Israel
. The Dutch governors would not
allow them to build a place of worship; but after the
English
conquered the colony, they erected a small wooden
synagogue, in Mill-street, near which a creek ran up
from the East River, where the Jewish women performed
their ablutions. In the course of improvement this was
sold; and they erected the handsome stone building in
Crosby-street, which I visited. It is not particularly
striking
or magnificent, either in its exterior or interior; nor
would it be in good keeping, for a people gone into
captivity
to have garments like those of Aaron, for glory and
for beauty; or an ark overlaid with pure gold, within
and without, and a crown of gold to it round about.
There is something deeply impressive in this remnant
of a scattered people, coming down to us in continuous
links through the long vista of recorded time; preserving
themselves carefully unmixed by intermarriage with people
of other nations and other faith, and keeping up the
ceremonial
forms of Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, through all the
manifold changes of revolving generations. Moreover,
our religions are connected, though separated; they are
shadow and substance, type and fulfilment. To the Jews
only, with all their blindness and waywardness, was given
the idea of one God, spiritual and invisible; and,
therefore
,
among them only could such a one as Jesus have
appeared
.
To us they have been the medium of glorious
truths; and if the murky shadow of their Old dispensation
rests too heavily on the mild beauty of the New, it is
because
the Present can never quite unmoor itself from the
Past; and well for the world's safety that it is so.
Quakers were mixed with the congregation of Jews;
thus oddly brought together, were the representatives of
the extreme of conservatism, and the extreme of
innovation
!
I was disappointed to see so large a proportion of this
peculiar people fair-skinned and blue-eyed. As no one
who marries a Gentile is allowed to remain in their
synagogues
,
one would naturally expect to see a decided
predominance
of the dark eyes, jetty locks, and olive
complexions
of Palestine. But the Jews furnish
incontrovertible
evidence that colour is the effect of climate. In the
mountains of Bavaria they are light-haired and fair-skinned:
in Italy and Spain they are dark: in Hindostan swarthy.
The
Black
Jews of Hindostan are said to have been
originally
African and Hindoo slaves, who received their freedom
as soon as they became converted to Judaism, and had
fulfilled
the rites prescribed by the ceremonial law; for the
Jews, unlike Christians, deem it unlawful to hold any one
of their own religious faith in slavery. In another respect
they put us to shame; for they held a Jubilee of Freedom
once in fifty years, and on that occasion emancipated all,
even of their heathen slaves.
Whether the Black Jews, now a pretty large class in
Hindostan, intermarry with other Jews we are not
informed
.
Moses, their great lawgiver married an Ethiopian.
Miriam and Aaron were shocked at it, as they would have
been at any intermarriage with the heathen tribes, of
whatever
colour. Whether the Ethiopian woman had adopted
the faith of Israel is not mentioned; but we are told that
the anger of the Lord was kindled against Aaron and his
sister for their conduct on this occasion.
The anniversary meetings of the New-York Hebrew
Benevolent Society present a singular combination. There
meet together pilgrims from the Holy Land, merchants from
the Pacific Ocean and the East Indies, exiles from the
banks of the Vistula, the Danube, and the Dneiper, bankers
from Vienna and Paris, and dwellers on the shores of the
Hudson and the Susquehannah. Suspended in their
dining
hall, between the American and English flags, may be
seen the Banner of Judah, with Hebrew inscriptions in
golden letters. How this stirs the sea of memory! That
national banner has not been unfurled for eighteen hundred
years. The last time it floated to the breeze was over the
walls of Jerusalem, besieged by Titus Vespasianus. Then,
our
stars and stripes were not foreseen, even in dim shadow,
by the vision of a prophet; and here they are intertwined
together over this congress of nations!
In New-York, as elsewhere, the vending of old clo'
is a prominent occupation among the Jews; a fact in which
those who look for spiritual correspondences can perceive
2*
significance; though singularly enough Sartor Resartus
makes no allusion to it, in his Philosophy of Clothes.
When I hear Christian ministers apologizing for slavery by
the example of Abraham, defending war, because the Lord
commanded Samuel to hew Agag in pieces, and sustaining
capital punishment by the retaliatory code of Moses, it
seems to me it would be most appropriate to have Jewish
criers at the doors of our theological schools, proclaiming
at the top of their lungs, Old Clothes! Old Clothes!
Old Clothes all the way from Judea!
The proverbial worldliness of the Jews, their unpoetic
avocations, their modern costume, and mechanical mode of
perpetuating ancient forms, cannot divest them of a sacred
and even romantic interest. The religious idea transmitted
by this remarkable people, has given them a more abiding
and extended influence on the world's history, than Greece
attained by her classic beauty, or Rome by her triumphant
arms. Mohammedanism and Christianity, the two forms of
theology which include nearly all the civilized world, both
grew from the stock planted by Abraham's children. On
them lingers the long-reflected light of prophecy; and we,
as well as they, are watching for its fulfilment. And verily,
all things seem tending toward it. Through all their
wanderings
,
they have followed the direction of Moses, to be
lenders
and not
borrowers
. The sovereigns of Europe and
Asia, and the republics of America, are their debtors, to an
immense amount. The Rothschilds are Jews; and they
have wealth enough to purchase all Palestine if they
choose; a large part of Jerusalem is in fact mortgaged to
them. The oppressions of the Turkish government, and
the incursions of hostile tribes, have hitherto rendered
Syria an unsafe residence; but the Sultan has erected it
into an independent power, and issued orders throughout
his empire, that the Jews shall be as perfectly protected in
their religious and civil rights, as any other class of his
subjects; moreover, the present controversy between
European
nations and the East seems likely to result in placing
Syria under the protection of Christian nations. It is
reported that Prince Metternich, Premier of Austria, has
determined, if possible, to constitute a Christian kingdom
out of Palestine, of which Jerusalem is to be the seat of
government. The Russian Jews, who number about
2,000,000, have been reduced to the most abject condition
by contempt and tyranny; but there, too, government is
now commencing a movement in their favour, without
requiring
them to renounce their faith. As long ago as 1817
important privileges were conferred by law on those Jews
who consented to embrace Christianity. Land was
gratuitously
bestowed upon them, where they settled, under the
name of The Society of Israelitish Christians.
These signs of the times cannot, of course, escape the
observation, or elude the active zeal, of Christians of the
present day. England has established many missions for
the conversion of the Jews. The Presbyterian Church of
Scotland have lately addressed a letter of sympathy and
expostulation to the scattered children of Israel, which has
been printed in a great variety of Oriental and Occidental
languages. In Upper Canada, a Society of Jews
converted
to Christianity, have been organized to facilitate the
return of the wandering tribes to the Holy Land.
The Rev. Solomon Michael Alexander, a learned Rabbi,
of the tribe of Judah, has been proselyted to Christianity,
and sent to Palestine by the Church of England; being
consecrated the first Bishop of Jerusalem.
Moreover the spirit of schism appears among them. A
numerous and influential body in England have seceded,
under the name of Reformed Jews. They denounce the
Talmud as a mass of absurdities, and adhere exclusively
to the authority of Moses; whereas, orthodox Jews
consider
the rabbinical writings of equal authority with the
Pentateuch. They have sent a Hebrew circular to the
Jews of this country, warning them against the seceders.
A General Convention is likewise proposed, to enable them
to draw closer the bonds of union.
What a busy, restless age is this in which we are cast!
What a difficult task for Israel to walk through its midst,
with mantles untouched by the Gentiles.
And hath she wandered thus in vain,
A pilgrim of the past?
No! long deferred her hope hath been,
But it shall come at fast;
For in her wastes a voice I hear,
As from some prophet's urn,
It bids the nations build not there,
For Jacob shall return.
LETTER VII.
Sept 30, 1841.
A few days since, I crossed the East River to Brooklyn,
on Long Island; named by the Dutch, Breuck-len, or the
Broken-land. Brooklyn Heights, famous in Revolutionary
history, command a magnificent view of the city of
New-York
,
the neighbouring islands, and harbour; and being at
least a hundred feet above the river, and open to the sea,
they are never unvisited by a refreshing and invigorating
breeze. A few years ago, these salubrious heights might
have been purchased by the city at a very low price, and
converted into a promenade, of beauty unrivalled throughout
the world; but speculators have now laid hands upon them,
and they are digging them away to make room for stores,
with convenient landings from the river. In this process,
they not unfrequently turn out the bones of soldiers, buried
there during the battles and skirmishes of the Revolution.
We turned aside to look in upon the small, neat burying
ground of the Methodist church, where lie the bones of
that remarkable young man, the Rev. John Summerfield.
In the course of so short a life, few have been able to
impress themselves so deeply and vividly on the memory
of a thousand hearts, as this eloquent disciple of Christ.
None who heard the fervid outpourings of his gifted soul
could ever forget him. His grave is marked by a horizontal
marble slab, on which is inscribed a long, well written
epitaph. The commencement of it is the most striking:
Rev. John Summerfield. Born in England; born
again in Ireland. By the first, a child of genius; by the
second a child of God. Called to preach at 19; died
at 27.
Dwellings were around this little burying-ground,
separated
by no fences, their thresholds divided from the graves
only by a narrow foot path. I was anxious to know what
might be the effect on the spiritual character of children,
accustomed to look out continually upon these marble slabs
to play among the grassy mounds, and perchance to take
their little porringer, and eat their supper there.
About two miles from the ferry, we came to the marshy
village of Gowannus, and crossed the mill-pond where
nearly a whole regiment of young Marylanders were cut
off, retreating before the British, at the unfortunate battle of
Long Island. A farm near by furnishes a painful
illustration
of the unwholesome excitement attendant upon
speculation
.
Here dwelt an honest, ignorant, peaceful old man,
who inherited from his father a farm of little value. Its
produce was, however, enough to supply his moderate
wants; and he took great pleasure in a small, neatly kept
flower garden, from which he was ever ready to gather a
bouquet for travellers. Thus quietly lived the old-fashioned
farmer and his family, and thus they might have gone home
to their fathers, had not a band of speculators foreseen that
the rapidly increasing city would soon take in Brooklyn,
and stretch itself across the marshes of Gowannus. Full
of these visions, they called upon the old man, and offered
him $70,000 for a farm which had, originally, been bought
almost for a song. $10,000, in silver and gold, were
placed on the table before him; he looked at them,
fingered
them over, seemed bewildered, and agreed to give a
decisive answer on the morrow. The next morning found
him a raving maniac! And thus he now roams about,
recklessly tearing up the flowers he once loved so dearly,
and keeping his family in continual terror.
On the high ground, back of this marsh, is Greenwood
Cemetery, the object of our pilgrimage. The site is
chosen with admirable taste. The grounds, beautifully
diversified with hill and valley, are nearly covered with a
noble old forest, from which it takes its cheerful name of
the Green Wood.
The area of two hundred acres comprises a greater
variety of undulating surface than Mount Auburn, and I
think excels it in natural beauty. From embowered glades
and deeply shaded dells, you rise in some places twenty
feet, and in others more than two hundred, above the sea.
Mount Washington, the highest and most remarkable of
these elevations, is two hundred and sixteen feet high.
The scenery here is of picturesque and resplendent beauty;
comprising an admirable view of New York; the shores
of North and East river, sprinkled with villages; Staten
Island, that lovely gem of the waters; the entire harbor,
white with the sails of a hundred ships; and the margin
of the Atlantic, stretching from Sandy Hook beyond the
Rockaway Pavilion. A magnificent monument to
Washington
is to be erected here.
Thence we rambled along, through innumerable
sinuosities
,
until we came to a quiet little lake, which bears the
pretty name of Sylvan Water. Fish abound here,
undisturbed
;
and shrubs in their wild, natural state, bend over
the margin to dip their feet and wash their faces.
Here come the little gentle birds,
Without a fear of ill,
Down to the murmuring water's edge,
And freely drink their fill.
As a gun is never allowed to enter the premises, the
playful squirrels, at will, drop down from the leafy tree,
and the air of spring is redolent with woodland melody.
An hour's wandering brought us round to the same place
again; for here, as at Mount Auburn, it is exceedingly easy
for the traveller to lose his way in labyrinthine mazes.
The wandering paths that wind and creep,
Now o'er the mountain's rugged brow,
And now where sylvan waters sleep
In quiet beauty, far below,
Those paths which many a lengthened mile
Diverge, then meet, then part once more,
Like those which erst in Creta's isle,
Were trod by fabled Minotaur.
Except the beautiful adaptation of the roads and paths
to the undulating nature of the ground, Art has yet done
but little for Greenwood. It is said the Company that
purchased it for a cemetery, will have the good taste to
leave the grounds as nearly as possible in a state of nature.
But as funds are increased by the sale of burying lots, the
entire precincts will be enclosed within terrace-walls, a
handsome gate-way and chapel will be erected, and a
variety of public monuments. The few private monuments
now there, are mostly of Egyptian model, with nothing
remarkable in their appearance.
On this spot was fought the bloody battle of Long Island.
Each wood, each hill, each glen,
Lives in the record of those days
Which `tried the souls of men.'
This fairy scene, so quiet now,
Where murmuring winds breathe soft and low,
And bright birds carol sweet,
Once heard the ringing clash of steel,
The shout, the shriek, the volley'd peal,
The rush of flying feet!
When the plan was first suggested, of finding some quiet,
sequestered place, for a portion of the innumerable dead of
this great city, many were very urgent to have it called
The Necropolis, meaning The City of the Dead; but
Cemetery was more wisely chosen; for the old Greeks
signified thereby The Place of Sleep. We still need a
word of
Christian
significance, implying, They are not
here; they have risen. I should love to see this
cheerful
motto over the gate-way.
The increase of beautiful burial-grounds, like Mount
Auburn and Greenwood, is a good sign. Blessed be all
agencies that bring our thoughts into pleasant
companionship
with those who have ended their pilgrimage and
begun their life. Banished for ever be the sable garments,
the funeral pall, the dismal, unshaded ground. If we
must
attend to a change of garments, while our hearts are full
of sorrow, let us wear sky-blue, like the Turks, to remind
us of heaven. The horror and the gloom, with which we
surround death, indicates too surely our want of living faith
in the soul's immortality. Deeply and seriously impressed
we must needs be, whenever called to contemplate the
mysterious
close of our hood-winked march from we know
not whence, to we know not whither; but terror and
gloom ill become the disciples of Him, who asked with
such cheerful significance, Why seek ye the Living
among the Dead?
I rejoice greatly to observe that these ideas are gaining
ground in the community. Individuals of all sects, and in
many cases entire churches, are abjuring the custom of
wearing mourning; and Protestant christendom is fast
converting
its dismal, barricaded burial grounds into open,
flowery walks. The Catholics have always done so. I
know not whether the intercession of Saints, and long
continued
masses for the dead bring their imaginations into
more frequent and nearer communion, with the departed; but
for some reason or other, they keep more bright than we do
the link between those who are living here, and those who
live beyond. Hence, their tombs are constantly supplied
with garlands by the hand of affection; and the innocent
babe lying uncoffined on its bier in the open church, with
fragrant flowers in its little hand, and the mellow light
from painted windows resting on its sweet uncovered face.
Great is the power of Faith!
LETTER VIII.
October 7, 1841.
Among the many objects of interest in this great city, a
stranger cannot overlook its shipping; especially as
New-York
lays claim to superiority over other cities of the
Union, in the construction of vessels, which are remarked
for beauty of model, elegance of finish, and gracefulness of
sparring.
I have often anathematized the spirit of Trade, which
reigns triumphant, not only on 'Change, but in our halls of
legislation, and even in our churches. Thought is sold
under
the hammer, and sentiment, in its holiest forms, stands
labelled for the market. Love is offered to the highest
bidder, and sixpences are given to purchase religion for
starving souls.
In view of these things, I sometimes ask whether the age
of Commerce is better than the age of War? Whether our
merchant princes are a great advance upon feudal
chieftains
?
Whether it is better for the many to be prostrated
by force, or devoured by cunning? To the imagination,
those bloody old barons seem the nobler of the two; for it
is more manly to hunt a lion, than to entrap a fox. But
Reason acknowledges that merchandize, with all its
cunning
and its fraud,
is
a step forward in the slow march of
human improvement; and Hope announces, in prophetic
tones, that Commerce will yet fulfil its highest mission, and
encircle the world in a golden band of brotherhood.
You will not think this millenium is nigh, when I tell
you that the most graceful, fairy-like vessel in these waters
was a slaver! She floated like a sea-nymph, and cut the
waves like an arrow. I mean the Baltimore clipper, called
the Catharine; taken by British cruisers, and brought here,
with all her detestable appurtenances of chains and
padlocks
,
to be adjudged by the United States' Court,
condemned
,
and sold. For what purpose she is now used, I
know not; but no doubt this city is secretly much involved
in the slave-trade.
At the Navy Yard, Brooklyn, I saw the ship of war
Independence
,
which carried out Mr. Dallas and his family,
when he went ambassador to Russia. On their arrival
at Cronstadt, they observed a barge, containing sixteen of
the emperor's state officers, put off from a steamboat near by,
and row towards them. They came on board, leaving
behind
them the bargemen, and a tall, fine-looking man at the
helm. While the officers were in the cabin partaking
refreshments
and exchanging courtesies, the helmsman
leaped
on board, and made himself hail fellow, well met
with the sailors, accepting cuds of tobacco, and asking
various
questions. When the officers returned on deck, and he
had resumed his place, one of the sailors said to his
comrade
,
with a knowing look, I tell you what, Tom, that'ere
chap's more than we take him for. He's a
land
-lubber, I
can tell you. Old Neptune never had the dipping of
him.
An officer of the Independence overheard these remarks,
and whispered to Commodore Nicholson that he shrewdly
suspected the tall, plainly-dressed helmsman, was the
Emperor
Nicholas, in disguise; for he was said to be fond of
playing such pranks. A royal salute, forty-two guns, was
immediately ordered. The helmsman was observed to
count the guns; and after twenty-one (the common salute)
had been fired, he took off his cap and bowed. The
Russian
steamer instantly ran up the imperial flag; all the forts,
and every ship in the harbor, commenced a tremendous
cannonading; rending the air, as when from crag to crag
leaps the live thunder.
In courteous acknowledgment of his discovered disguise,
the officers of the Independence were invited to make the
palace their home, during their stay at St. Petersburg, and
the Emperor's carriages, horses, and aids, were at their
service
;
a compliment never before paid to a vessel of any
nation.
Yet was similar honour conferred on an uncouth country
boy from New England! The following is the substance
of the story, as told by Mr. Dallas, at a public dinner given
him in Philadelphia, on his return from Russia, in 1838.
One day a lad, apparently about nineteen, presented
himself
before our ambassador at St. Petersburg. He was a
pure specimen of the genus Yankee; with sleeves too short
for his bony arms, trowsers half way up to his knees, and
hands playing with coppers and ten-penny nails in his
pocket
.
He introduced himself by saying I've just come out
here to trade, with a few Yankee notions, and I want to get
sight of the Emperor.
Why do you wish to see
him?
I've brought him a present, all the way from Ameriky.
I respect him considerable, and I want to get at him, to give
it to him with my own hands.
Mr. Dallas smiled, as he answered, It is such a
common
thing, my lad, to make crowned heads a present,
expecting
something handsome in return, that I'm afraid the
Emperor will consider this only a Yankee trick. What
have you brought?
An acorn.
An acorn! what under the sun induced you to bring the
Emperor of Russia an acorn?
Why, jest before I sailed, mother and I went on to
Washington to see about a pension; and when we was
there, we thought we'd jest step over to Mount Vernon. I
picked up this acorn there; and I thought to myself I'd
bring it to the Emperor. Thinks, says I, he must have
heard a considerable deal about our General Washington,
and I expect he must admire our institutions. So now you
see I've brought it, and I want to get at him.
My lad, it's not an easy matter for a stranger to approach
the Emperor; and I am afraid he will take no notice of
your present. You had better keep it.
I tell you I want to have a talk with him. I expect I
can tell him a thing or two about Ameriky. I guess he'd
like mighty well to hear about our rail-roads, and our free
schools, and what a big swell our steamers cut. And when
he hears how well our people are getting on, may be it will
put him up to doing something. The long and the short
on't is, I shan't be easy till I get a talk with the Emperor;
and I should like to see his wife and children. I want to see
how such folks bring up a family.
Well, sir, since you are so determined upon it, I will
do what I can for you? but you must expect to be
disappointed
.
Though it will be rather an unusual proceeding, I
would advise you to call on the vice-chancellor, and state
your wishes; he may possibly assist you.
Well, that's all I want of you. I will call again, and
let you know how I get on.
In two or three days, he again appeared, and said, Well,
I've seen the Emperor, and had a talk with him. He's a
real gentleman, I can tell you. When I give him the acorn,
he said he should set a great store by it; that there was no
character in ancient or modern history he admired so much
as he did our Washington. He said he'd plant it in his
palace garden with his own hand; and he did do itfor I
see him with my own eyes. He wanted to ask me so much
about our schools and rail-roads, and one thing or another,
that he invited me to come again, and see his daughters:
for he said his wife could speak better English than he
could. So I went again, yesterday; and she's a fine,
knowing woman, I tell you; and his daughters are nice
gals.
What did the Empress say to you?
Oh, she asked me a sight o'questions. Don't you think,
she thought we had no servants in Ameriky! I told her
poor folks did their own work, but rich folks had plenty of
servants. `But then you don't
call
'em servants,' said she;
`you call 'em help.' I guess ma'am you've been reading
Mrs. Trollope? says I. We had that ere book aboard our
ship. The Emperor clapped his hands, and laughed as if
he'd kill himself. `You're right, sir,' said he, `you're
right. We sent for an English copy, and she's been
reading
it this very morning!' Then I told him all I knew
about our country, and he was mightily pleased. He
wanted
to know how long I expected to stay in these parts. I
told him I'd sold all the notions I brought over, and I
guessed I should go back in the same ship. I bid 'em good
bye, all round, and went about my business. Ain't I had
a glorious time? I expect you didn't calculate to see me
run such a rig?
No, indeed, I did not, my lad. You may well consider
yourself lucky; for it's a very uncommon thing for crowned
heads to treat a stranger with so much distinction.
A few days after, he called again, and said, I guess
I shall stay here a spell longer, I'm treated so well.
T'other day a grand officer come to my room, and told me
the Emperor had sent him to show me all the curiosities;
and I dressed myself, and he took me with him, in a mighty
fine carriage, with four horses; and I've been to the theatre
and the museum; and I expect I've seen about all there is
to be seen in St. Petersburg. What do you think of that,
Mr. Dallas?
It seemed so incredible that a poor, ungainly Yankee lad
should be thus loaded with attentions, that the ambassador
scarcely knew what to think or say.
In a short time, his strange visiter re-appeared. Well,
said he, I made up my mind to go home; so I went to thank
the Emperor, and bid him good-bye. I thought I couldn't
do no less, he'd been so civil. Says he, `Is there anything
else you'd like to see, before you go back to Ameriky?' I
told him I
should
like to get a peep at Moscow; for I'd
heard considerable about their setting fire to the Kremlin,
and I'd read a deal about General Bonaparte; but it would
cost a sight o'money to go there, and I wanted to carry my
earnings to mother. So I bid him good-bye, and come off.
Now what do you guess he did, next morning? I vow, he
sent the same man, in regimentals, to carry me to
Moscow
in one of his own carriages, and bring me back again,
when I've seen all I want to see! And we're going
to-morrow
morning, Mr Dallas. What do you think now?
And sure enough, the next morning the Yankee boy
passed the ambassador's house in a splendid coach and four,
waving his handkerchief, and shouting Good-bye!
Good-bye
!'
Mr. Dallas afterward learned from the Emperor that all
the particulars related by this adventurous youth were
strictly true. He again heard from him at Moscow, waited
upon by the public officers, and treated with as much
attention
as is usually bestowed on ambassadors.
The last tidings of him reported that he was travelling in
Circassia, and writing a Journal, which he intended to
publish
.
Now, who but a Yankee could have done all that?
While speaking of the Emperor, I must not forget the
magnificent steam frigate Kamschatka, built here to his
order
.
Her model, drafted by Captain Von Shantz, of the
Russian navy, is extremely beautiful. She sits on the
water
as gracefully as a swan; and it is said her speed is not
equalled by any sea-steamer on the Atlantic or Pacific, the
Black sea, the Indian, or the Baltic. It is supposed she
could easily make the passage from here to England in ten
days. The elegance of her rigging, and her neat, nimble
wheels have been particularly admired. These wheels are
constructed on a new plan; and though apparently slight,
have great strength and power. Her engines are of six
hundred horse power, and her tonnage about two thousand.
All the metal about her is American. In machinery and
construction she carries two hundred thousand pounds of
copper, fifty thousand of wrought iron, and three hundred
thousand of cast iron. Two hundred and fifty men were eight
months employed in building her. Her cabins are said to be
magnificent. Two drawing-rooms are fitted up in princely
style for the imperial family: the wood-work of these
consists
of mahogany, bird's-eye maple, rose-wood, and
satinwood
.
Her hull is entirely black; the bows and stern
surmounted
with a large double-headed gilt eagle, and a crown.
The machinery, made by Messrs. Dunham & Co. of this
city, is said to be of the most superb workmanship ever
produced in this country. She is considered a remarkably
cheap vessel of the kind, as she cost
only
four hundred
thousand dollars. She was built under the superintendence
of Mr. Scott, who goes in her to Russia, as chief engineer.
She sailed for Cronstadt last week, being escorted out of
the harbour by a large party of ladies and gentlemen.
Among these was Mr. Rhoades, of New-York, the Naval
Constructor. You probably recollect that he built a large
gun-ship for the Turkish Sultan; who was so much
delighted
when he saw the noble vessel launched right royally
upon the waves, that he jumped and capered, and threw his
arms about the ship-builder's neck, and gave him a golden
box, set with splendid jewels. Henry Eckford, too, one of
the most remarkable of marine architects, was of
New-York
.
He built the Kensington for the Greeks, and died
prematurely while in the employ of Mahmoud. It is
singular
,
is it not, that foreign powers send to this young country,
when they most want ingenious machinery, or skilful
workmanship
?
But I will quit this strain, lest I fall into our
national sin of boasting.
I cannot bid you farewell without mentioning the French
frigate Belle Poule, commanded by the Prince de Joinville,
son of Louis Philippe. She is an interesting object seen
from the Battery, with her tri-colour flying; for one seems
to see the rich sarcophagus, with its magnificent pall of
black velvet, sprinkled with silver stars, in which she
conveyed
the remains of Napoleon from St. Helena to Paris.
Every day, masses were said, and requiems sung on board,
for the soul of the great departed. Do not quarrel with the
phrase. In its highest significance it is ill applied to any
warrior; but, nevertheless, in the strong will, successfully
enforced, there is ever an element of greatness.
The same unrivalled band that attended the imperial
remains
,
are now on board, and sometimes refresh our
citizens
with most enchanting music. They are twenty-six
in number, paid from the Prince's own purse.
Sabbath before last, a youth of fourteen, much beloved,
died on board, far from home and kindred. It was an
impressive
sight to see the coffin of the young stranger
passing
through our streets, covered with the tri-coloured flag,
suspended upon ropes, after the manner of marine burials
in Europe, and borne by his mourning comrades.
The Prince's private state-room contains a bronze copy
of the Joan of Are, which was exquisitely sculptured by
his sister, Marie, who had great genius for the fine arts,
and was richly endowed with intellect. In the same room
are miniatures of his royal parents, by the celebrated
Madame
de Mirbel, and some very spirited sketches by his own
hand. It is worthy of remark, that the only royal family
eminently distinguished for private virtues, combined with
a high degree of intellectual cultivation, were not
educated
to be princes; and that their father had acquired wisdom
and strength in the school of severe adversity.
The keeper of Castle Garden, when he saw me
watching
the barge that came from the Belle Poule, repeated, at
least half a dozen times, that I should not know the Prince
from any other man, if I were to see him. I was amused
to hear him thus betray the state of his own mind, though
he failed to enlighten mine.
I love to linger about the Battery at sunset; to see the
flags all drop down suddenly from the mast-head, in honour
of the retreating king of day; and to hear in the stillness
of evening, some far-off song upon the waters, or the deep,
solemn sound, All's well! echoed from one to another
of those numerous ships, all lying there so hushed and
motionless
.
A thousand thoughts crowd upon my mind, as I
silently gaze on their twinkling lights, and shadowy
rigging
,
dimly relieved against the sky. I think of the human
hearts imprisoned there; of the poor sailor's toil and
suffering
;
of his repressed affections, and benighted mind;
and in that one idea of life spent without a home, I find
condensed all that my nature most shudders at. I think,
too, of the poor fugitive slave, hunted out by mercenary
agents, chained on ship-board, and perchance looking up,
3
desolate and heart-broken, to the same stars on which I fix
my free and happy gaze. Alas, how fearfully solemn must
their light be to
him,
in his hopeless sorrow, and
superstitious
ignorance.
LETTER IX.
October 14, 1841.
Last week we went to Ravenswood, to visit Grant
Thorburn's
famous garden. We left the city by Hell-gate, a
name not altogether inappropriate for an entrance to
New-York
.
The waters, though somewhat troubled and peevish,
were more composed than I had expected. This was
owing
to the high tide; and it reminded me of Washington
Irving's description: Hell gate is as pacific at low water
as any other stream; as the tide rises, it begins to fret; at
half tide it rages and roars, as if bellowing for more water;
but when the tide is full, it relapses again into quiet, and
for a time seems to sleep almost as soundly as an
alderman
after dinner. It may be compared to an inveterate
drinker, who is a peaceful fellow enough when he has no
liquor at all, or when he is skin-full; but when half-seas
over, plays the very devil. One of the steam-ferry boats
that crosses this turbulent passage, is appropriately called
the Plnto. It is odd that men should have confounded
together the deities that preside over Riches and over
Hell, and that the god of Commerce should likewise
be the god of Lies. Perhaps the ancients had sarcastic
significance in this.
The garden at Ravenswood is well worth seeing. An
admirable green-house, full of choice plants; extensive and
varied walks, neatly kept; and nearly three thousand
dahlias
in full bloomthe choicest specimens, with every
variety
of shade and hue; and a catalogue of great names,
from Lord Wellington to Kate Nickleby and Grace Darling.
I never saw any floral exhibition more superb. They stood
facing each other in regal groups, as if the court beauties
of a coronation ball had been suddenly changed into
blossoms
by an enchanter's wand. The location of the garden
is beautiful; in some places opening upon pretty rural
scenes of wood and pasture, and fronting on the broad blue
river, where, ever and anon, may be seen, through the
intervening
foliage, some little boat, or sloop, with snowy
sail, gliding gracefully along in silence and sunlight.
Grant Thorburn, you know, of course; that little spunk
o' geni, in a rickety tabernacle, on whose history Galt
built his Lawrie Todd. The story derived small aid from
fiction; the first volume being almost literally Grant
Thorburn's
history, as he tells it himself. To be sure, he never
pushed into the wilderness, to lay out Judiville, or any
other new town. Though Ravenswood has grown up
around him, and the tasteful name is of his own choosing,
he never could have endured many of the hardships of a
pioneer; for the village lies on the East River, a little south
of Hallet's Cove, not more than five miles from the city.
The name came from the Bride of Lammermoor; for
though a strict adherent of Scotland's kirk, he is a great
admirer of Sir Walter's romances. The pleasant old
gentleman
returned in the boat with us, and was highly
communicative
;
for, in the first place, he loves to talk of
himself
and his adventures, with the innocent and inoffensive
egotism of a little child; and in the next place, he favours
Boston ladies, having a pleased recollection of the great
attention
paid him there. He told us he was born near St.
Leonard's Crags, and in his boyhood was accustomed to
pass Jeannie Dean's cottage frequently. His grandfather
was alive and stirring at the time of the Porteous mob,
and he had heard him recount the leading incidents in the
heart of Mid Lothian a thousand times. I was charmed
to hear him recite, in the pure Scotch accent, Jeannie's
eloquent
and pathetic appeal to the Queen. Speaking of
Scott's fidelity to the national character, I asked him if he
had not often met with a Dandie Dinmont; he replied,
Yes, and with Dumbiedikes, too; but much oftener with
a `douce Davie Deans.'
Lawrie Todd is very true to the life; yet it is slightly
embellished with fictitious garniture, like a veritable
portrait
in masquerade dress. The old gentleman's love of
matter of fact led him to publish a biographical sketch of
himself; which, so far as it goes, is almost in the identical
language used by Galt: both being in fact the very words
in which he has been long accustomed to repeat his story.
Another motive for giving an unadorned account of himself
in his little book, probably was the very natural and not
unpleasing
propensity of an old man, to trace step by step
the adventures and efforts whereby he fashioned such a
flowery fortune from the barren sands.
The handsome country-seats of himself and son,
standing
side by side in the midst of this spacious and beautiful
garden; urns supported by Cupids, (which they say in
Yankee land should be called cupidities;) and oriental
glimpses here and there, of some verdant mound among
the winding walks, surmounted by the tufted Sago Palm, or
spreading Cactus; all this contrasted oddly enough with
his own account of himself, as a diminutive Scotch lad
with brief legs and shuffling feet, squatted down on the
deck of the emigrant ship, which brought him here, poor
and friendless, in 1794. He thus describes himself,
helping
the colored cook to prepare dinner, when they first drew
near the wharves of New-York: I sat down with Cato,
as he was called, square on the deck, his feet against my
feet, with a wooden bowl of potatoes between our legs, and
began to scrape off the skins. While thus employed, a
boat came alongside with several visiters. One inquired
for a farmer's servant, wishing to engage one; another for
a housemaid; and the third, thanks be and praise! asked
if there was a nail-maker on board. My greedy ear
snapped
the word, and looking up, I answered, `I am one.'
`You!' replied he, looking down as if I was a fairy;
`You! can you make nails?' `I'll wager a sixpence,' (all
I had) was my answer, `that I'll make more nails in one
day than any man in America.' This reply, the manner of
it, and the figure of the bragger, set all present into a roar
of laughter.
A curious sample of Scotch thrift was shown when he
first opened a little shop, without capital to buy stock.
Brick-bats, covered with iron monger's paper, with a knife
or fork tied on the outside, were ranged on the shelves
like an imposing array of new cutlery; and a dozen snuff
boxes, or shaving boxes, made a great show, fastened on
round junks of wood.
But although it must be allowed that this was a clever
and innocent artifice, says Lawrie Todd, yet, like other
dealers in the devices of cunning, I had not been
circumspect
at all points; for by mistake, I happened to tie a
round shaving box on a brick subterfuge, which a sly, pawky
old Scotchman, who sometimes stepped in for a crack,
observed
.
Ay, mon, says he, but ye hae unco queer things
here. Wha ever saw a four corner't shaving box?
Whereupon we had a hearty good laugh. Od, he
resumed
,
but ye're an auld farrant chappy, and no doot but
ye'll do weel in this country, where pawkrie is no' an ill
nest-egg to begin with.
There is, however, no pawkrie about his flowers and
garden-seeds; they are genuine, and the best of their
kind; as their celebrity throughout the country abundantly
testifies.
I begged of the gardener a single spring of acacia, whose
light, feathery, yellow foliage looked like a pet plaything
of the breezes; and which for the first time enabled me
to understand clearly Moore's poetic description of the
Desert, where The Acacia waves her yellow hair.
I likewise took with me a geranium leaf, as a memento
of the rose-geranium which Grant Thorburn accidentally
bought in the day of small beginnings, and which proved
the nucleus of his present floral fame, and blooming
fortune
.
The gardener likewise presented us with a bouquet
of dahlias, magnificent enough for the hand-screen of a
Sultana; but this politeness I think we owed to certain
beautiful young ladies who accompanied us.
Altogether, it was a charming excursion; and I came
away pleased with the garden and its environs, and pleased
with the old gentleman, whose dwarf-like figure
disappointed
me agreeably; for, from his own description, I
was prepared to find him ungainly and mis-shapen. I no
longer deem it so very marvellous that his Rebecca should
have preferred the poor, canny little Scotchman to her rich
New-York lover.
As I never deserved to be called Mrs.
Leo
Hunter,
you will, perhaps, be surprised at the degree of interest I
express in this man, whose claims to distinction are merely
the having amassed wealth by his own industry and
shrewdness
,
and having his adventures told by Galt's facetious pen.
The accumulation of dollars and cents, I grant is a form of
power the least attractive of any to the imagination; but
yet, as an indication of ability of some sort, it is attractive
to a degree; and moreover there is something in mere
success, which interests usbecause it is a stimulus which
the human mind spontaneously seeks, and without which
it cannot long retain its energies. Added to this, there is
a roseate gleam of romance, resting on the shrewd
Scotchman's
life. First, there is a sober sentiment, a quaint,
homely pathos, in his account of his first love, which wraps
the memory of his patient, quiet Rebecca in a sacred veil
of tender reverence. Secondly, he is a sort of High
Priest of Flora; and though not precisely such an one as
would have been chosen to tend the shrine of her Roman
Temple, yet this will give him a poetic claim upon my
interest, so long as the absorbing love of beauty renders
a Flower-Merchant more attractive to my fancy than a
dealer in grain.
Were I not afraid of wearying your patience with
descriptions
of scenery, I would talk of the steamboat passage
from Ravenswood; for indeed it is very beautiful. But I
forbear all allusion to the gliding boats, the vernal forests,
falling in love with their own shadows in the river, and the
cozy cottages, peeping out from the foliage with their
pleasant, friendly faces. I have placed the lovely
landscape
in the halls of memory, where I can look upon it
whenever my soul needs the bounteous refreshings of
nature
.
I congratulate myself for having added this picture
to my gallery, as a blessing for the weary months that are
coming upon us; for Summer has waved her last farewell,
as she passed away over the summit of the sunlit hills, and
I can already spy the waving white locks of old Winter, as
he comes hobbling up, before the gale, on the other side.
I could forgive him the ague-fit he bestows on poor
Summer
,
as she hurries by; but the plague of it is, he will
stand gossiping with Spring's green fairy, till every tooth
chatters in her sweet little head.
Now, of a truth, my friend, I have been meaning to write
sober sense; but what is written, is written. As the boy
said of his whistling, it did itself. I would gladly have
shown more practical good sense, and talked wisely on
the spirit of the age, progress of the species, and the
like; but I believe, in my soul, fairies keep carnival all the
year round in my poor brain; for even when I first wake,
I find a magic ring of tinted mushrooms, to show where
their midnight dance has been. But I did not bore you
with scenery, and you should give me credit for that; we
who live cooped up in cities, are so apt to forget that any
body but ourselves ever sees blue sky enough for a suit of
bed curtains, or butter-cups and greensward sufficient for a
flowered coverlet. Don't crow till you're out of the wood,
though; for the aforesaid picture hangs in the hall, and I
may yet draw aside the curtain and give you a peep, if you
are very curious.
Real
pictures, like everything else real,
cannot be bought with cash. Old Mammon buys nothing
but shadows. My gallery beats that of the Duke of
Devonshire
;
for it is filled with originals by the oldest masters,
and not a copy among them all; and, better still, the sheriff
cannot seize them, let him do his worst; others may prove
property in the same, but they lie safely beyond the reach
of trover or replevin.
As we passed Blackwell's Island, I looked with
thoughtful
sadness on the handsome stone edifice erected there
for a Lunatic Asylum. On another part of the island is a
Penitentiary; likewise a noble building, though chilling
the heart with its barred doors and grated windows. The
morally and the intellectually insaneshould they not both
be treated with great tenderness? It is a question for
serious
thought; and phrenology, with all its absurd quackery
on its back, will yet aid mankind in giving the fitting
answer
.
There has at least been kindness evinced in the
location chosen; for if free breezes, beautiful expanse of
water, quiet, rural scenery, and the blue sky that bends
o'er all, can minister to the mind diseased, then surely
these forlorn outcasts of society may here find God's best
physicians for their shattered nerves.
Another object which interested me exceedingly was the
Long-Island Farm School, for foundlings and orphans.
Six or eight hundred children are here carefully tended by
a matron and her assistants, until they are old enough to go
out to service or trades. Their extensive play-ground runs
along the shore; a place of as sweet natural influences as
could well be desired. I thought of the squalid little
wretches I had seen at Five Points, whose greatest
misfortune
was that they were not orphans. I thought of
the crowd of sickly infants in Boston alms-housethe
innocent
victims of hereditary vice. And my heart ached,
that it could see no end to all this misery, though it
heard
it, in the far-off voice of prophecy.
LETTER X.
October 21, 1841.
In a great metropolis like this, nothing is more
observable
than the infinite varieties of character. Almost
without effort, one may happen to find himself, in the
course of a few days, beside the Catholic kneeling before
the Cross, the Mohammedan bowing to the East, the Jew
veiled before the ark of the testimony, the Baptist walking
into the water, the Quaker keeping his head covered in
the presence of dignitaries and solemnities of all sorts, and
the Mormon quoting from the Golden Book which he has
never seen.
More, perhaps, than any other city, except Paris or New
Orleans, this is a place of rapid fluctuation, and
never-ceasing
change. A large portion of the population are
like mute actors, who tramp across the stage in pantomime
or pageant, and are seen no more. The enterprising, the
curious, the reckless, and the criminal, flock hither from
all quarters of the world, as to a common centre, whence
they can diverge at pleasure. Where men are little
3*
known, they are imperfectly restrained; therefore, great
numbers here live with somewhat of that wild license
which prevails in times of pestilence. Life is a reckless
game, and death is a business transaction. Warehouses
of ready-made coffins, stand beside warehouses of
ready-made
clothing, and the shroud is sold with spangled
opera-dresses
.
Nay, you may chance to see exposed at sheriffs'
sales, in public squares, piles of coffins, like nests of boxes,
one within another, with a hole bored in the topmost lid to
sustain the red flag of the auctioneer, who stands by,
describing
their conveniences and merits, with all the
exaggerating
eloquence of his tricky trade.
There is something impressive, even to painfulness, in
this dense crowding of human existence, this mercantile
familiarity with death. It has sometimes forced upon me,
for a few moments, an appalling night-mare sensation of
vanishing identity; as if I were but an unknown,
unnoticed
,
and unseparated drop in the great ocean of human
existence; as if the uncomfortable old theory were true,
and we were but portions of a Great Mundane Soul, to
which we ultimately return, to be swallowed up in its
infinity
.
But such ideas I expel at once, like phantasms of
evil, which indeed they are. Unprofitable to all, they have
a peculiarly bewildering and oppressive power over a mind
constituted like my own; so prone to eager questioning of
the infinite, and curious search into the invisible. I find
it wiser to forbear inflating this balloon of thought, lest it
roll me away through unlimited space, until I become like
the absent man, who put his clothes in bed, and hung
himself
over the chair; or like his twin-brother, who laid his
candle on the pillow, and blew himself out.
You will, at least, my dear friend, give these letters the
credit of being utterly unpremeditated; for Flibbertigibbet
himself never moved with more unexpected and incoherent
variety. I have wandered almost as far from my starting
point, as Saturn's ring is from Mercury; but I will return
to the varieties in New-York. Among them, I often meet
a tall Scotsman, with sandy hair and high cheek-bonesa
regular Sawney, with tartan plaid and bag-pipe. And
where do you guess he most frequently plies his poetic
trade? Why, in the slaughter-houses! of which a hundred
or more send forth their polluted breath into the
atmosphere
of this swarming city hive! There, if you are
curious
to witness incongruities, you may almost any day see
grunting pigs or bleating lambs, with throats cut to the tune
of Highland Mary, or Bonny Doon, or Lochaber No More.
Among those who have flitted across my path, in this
thoroughfare of nations, few have interested me more
strongly than an old sea-captain, who needed only Sir
Walter's education, his wild excursions through solitary
dells and rugged mountain-passes, and his familiarity with
legendary lore, to make him, too, a poet and a romancer.
Untutored as he was, a rough son of the ocean, he had
combined in his character the rarest elements of fun and
pathos; side by side, they glanced through his
conversation
,
in a manner almost Shakspearean. They shone,
likewise, in his weather-beaten countenance; for he had
`the eye of Wordsworth, and the mouth of Molire.'
One of his numerous stories particularly impressed my
imagination, and remains there like a cabinet picture, by
Claude. He said he was once on board a steamboat, full
of poor foreigners, going up the Mississippi to some place
of destination in the yet unsettled wilderness. The room
where these poor emigrants were huddled together, was
miserable enough. In one corner, two dissipated-looking
fellows were squatted on the floor, playing All-fours with
dirty cards; in another, lay a victim of intemperance,
senseless, with a bottle in his hand; in another, a young
Englishman, dying of consumptionkindly tended by a
venerable Swiss emigrant, with his helpful wife, and
artless
daughter. The Englishman was an intelligent,
well-informed
young man, who, being unable to marry the object
of his choice, with any chance of comfortable support in
his own country, had come to prepare a home for his
beloved
in the Eldorado of the West. A neglected cold
brought on lung fever, which left him in a rapid decline;
but still, full of hope, he was pushing on for the township
where he had planned for himself a domestic paradise.
He was now among strangers, and felt that death was nigh.
The Swiss emigrants treated him with that thoughtful,
zealous tenderness, which springs from genial hearts
deeply imbued with the religious sentiment. One wish of
his soul they could not gratify, by reason of their
ignorance
.
Being too weak to hold a pen, he earnestly
desired
to dictate to some one else a letter to his mother and
his betrothed. This, Captain T. readily consented to do;
and promised, so far as in him lay, to carry into effect any
arrangements he might wish to make.
Soon after this melancholy duty was fulfilled, the young
sufferer departed. When the steamboat arrived at its final
destination, the kind-hearted Captain T. made the best
arrangements he could for a decent burial. There was no
chaplain on board; and, unused as he was to the
performance
of religious ceremonies, he himself read the funeral
service from a book of Common Prayer, found in the young
stranger's trunk. The body was tenderly placed on a
board, and carried out, face upwards, into the silent
solitude
of the primeval forest. The sun, verging to the west,
cast oblique glances through the foliage, and played on the
pale face in flickering light and shadow. Even the most
dissipated of the emigrants were sobered by a scene so
touching and so solemn, and all followed reverently in
procession
.
Having dug the grave, they laid him carefully
within, and replaced the sods above him; then, sadly and
thoughtfully, they returned slowly to the boat.
Subdued to tender melancholy by the scene he had
witnessed
,
and the unusual service he had performed, Captain
T. avoided company, and wandered off alone into the
woods. Unquiet questionings, and far-reaching thoughts
of God and immortality, lifted his soul toward the Eternal;
and heedless of his footsteps, he lost his way in the
windings
of the forest. A widely devious and circuitous route
brought him within sound of human voices. It was a
gushing melody, taking its rest in sweetest cadences.
With pleased surprise, he followed it, and came, suddenly
and unexpectedly, in view of the new-made grave. The
kindly Swiss matron, and her innocent daughter, had woven
a large and beautiful Cross, from the broad leaves of the
papaw tree, and twined it with the pure white blossoms of
the trailing Convolvulus. They had placed it reverently
at the head of the stranger's grave, and kneeling before it,
chanted their evening hymn to the Virgin. A glowing
twilight shed its rosy flush on the consecrated symbol, and
the modest, friendly faces of those humble worshippers.
Thus beautifully they paid
their
tribute of respect to the
unknown one, of another faith, and a foreign clime, who
had left home and kindred, to die among strangers in the
wilderness.
How would the holy gracefulness of this scene have
melted the heart of his mother and his beloved!
I had many more things to say to you; but I will leave
them unsaid. I leave you alone with this sweet picture,
that your memory may consecrate it as mine has done.
LETTER XI.
December 9, 1841.
A friend passing by the Methodist church in Elizabeth
street, heard such loud and earnest noises issuing
therefrom
,
that he stepped in to ascertain the cause. A coloured
woman was preaching to a full audience, and in a manner
so remarkable that his attention was at once rivetted. The
account he gave excited my curiosity, and I sought an
interview
with the woman, whom I ascertained to be Julia
Pell, of Philadelphia. I learned from her that her father
was one of the innumerable tribe of fugitives from slavery,
assisted by that indefatigable friend of the oppressed, Isaac
T. Hopper. This was quite a pleasant surprise to the
benevolent
old gentleman, for he was not aware that any of
Zeek's descendants were living; and it was highly
interesting
to him to find one of them in the person of this
female
Whitfield. Julia never knew her father by the name
of Zeek; for that was his appellation in slavery, and she
had known him only as a freeman. Zeek, it seems, had
been sold running, as the term is; that is, a purchaser
had given a very small part of his original value, taking
the risk of not catching him. In Philadelphia, a coloured
man, named Samuel Johnson, heard a gentleman making
inquiries concerning a slave called Zeek, whom he had
bought running. I know him very well, said Samuel;
as well as I do myself; he's a good-for-nothing chap;
and you'll be better without him than with him. Do
you think so? Yes, if you gave what you say for him;
it was a bitethat's all. He's a lazy, good-for-nothing
dog; and you'd better sell your right in him the first chance
you get. After some further talk, Samuel acknowledged
that Zeek was his brother. The gentleman advised him
to buy him; but Samuel protested that he was such a lazy,
vicious dog, that he wanted nothing to do with him. The
gentleman began to have so bad an opinion of his bargain,
that he offered to sell the fugitive for sixty dollars.
Samuel
,
with great apparent indifference, accepted the terms,
and the necessary papers were drawn. Isaac T. Hopper
was in the room during the whole transaction; and the
coloured man requested him to examine the papers to see
that all was right. Being assured that everything was in
due form, he inquired, And is Zeek now free? Yes,
entirely free. Suppose I was Zeek, and that was the
man that bought me; couldn't he take me? Not any
more than he could take me, said Isaac. As soon as
Samuel received this assurance, he made a low bow to
the gentleman, and, with additional fun in a face always
roguish, said, Your servant, sir; I am Zeek! The
roguishness characteristic of her father is reflected in some
degree in Julia's intelligent face; but imagination,
uncultivated
,
yet highly poetic, is her leading characteristic.
Some have the idea that our destiny is prophesied in
early presentiments; thus, Hannah More, when a little
child, used to play, go up to London and see the bishops
an object for which she afterwards sacrificed a large
portion of her own moral independence and freedom of
thought. In Julia Pell's case, coming events cast their
shadows before. I asked her when she thought she first
experienced religion. She replied, When I was a
little girl, father and mother used to go away to meeting on
Sundays, and leave me and my brothers at home all day.
So, I thought I'd hold class-meetings, as the Methodists
did. The children all round in the neighborhood used to
come to hear me preach. The neighbours complained that
we made such a noise, shouting and singing; and every
Monday father gave us a whipping. At last, he said to
mother, `I'm tired of beating these poor children every
week, to satisfy our neighbours. I'll send for my sister to
come, and she will stay at home on Sundays, and keep
them out of mischief.' So my aunt was brought to take
care of us; and the next Sunday, when the children came
thronging to hear me preach, they were greatly
disappointed
indeed to hear me say, in a mournful way, `We can't
have any more meetings now; because aunt's come, and
she wont let us.' When my aunt heard this, she seemed
to pity me and the children; and she said if we would get
through before the folks came home, we might hold a
meeting
;
for she should like to see for herself what it was we
did, that made such a fuss among the neighbours. Then we
had a grand meeting. My aunt's heart was taken hold of
that very day; and when we all began to sing, `Come to
the Saviour, poor sinner, come!' she cried, and I cried;
and when we had done crying, the whole of us broke out
singing `Come to the Saviour.' That very instant I felt
my heart leap up, as if a great load had been taken right
off of it! That was the beginning of my getting religion;
and for many years after that, I saw all the time a blue
smoke rising before my eyesthe whole time a blue smoke,
rising, rising. As she spoke, she imitated the ascent of
smoke, by a graceful, undulating motion of her hand.
What do you suppose was the meaning of the blue
smoke? said I.
I don't know, indeed, ma'am; but I always supposed
it was my sins rising before me, from the bottomless pit.
She told me that when her mother died, some years after,
she called her to her bed-side, and said, Julia, the work
of grace is only begun in you. You haven't got religion
yet. When you can freely forgive all your enemies, and
love to do them good, then you may know that the true
work is completed within you. I thought the wisest
schools of theology could not have established a better test.
I asked Julia, if she had ever tried to learn to read. She
replied, Yes, ma'am, I tried once; because I thought it
would be such a convenience, if I could read the Bible for
myself. I made good progress, and in a short time could
spell B-a-k-e-r, as well as anybody. But it dragged my
mind
down
. It dragged it
down
. When I tried to think,
every thing scattered away like smoke, and I could do
nothing
but spell. Once I got up in an evening meeting to
speak; and when I wanted to say, `Behold the days
come,' I began `B-a.' I was dreadfully ashamed, and
concluded I'd give up trying to learn to read.
These, and several other particulars I learned of Julia,
at the house of Isaac T. Hopper. When about to leave us,
she said she felt moved to pray. Accordingly, we all
remained
in silence, while she poured forth a brief, but very
impressive prayer for her venerable host; of whom she
spoke as that good old man, whom thou, O Lord, hast
raised up to do such a blessed work for my down-trodden
people.
Julia's quiet, dignified, and even lady-like deportment in
the parlour, did not seem at all in keeping with what I had
been told of her in the pulpit, with a voice like a sailor at
mast-head, and muscular action like Garrick in Mad Tom.
On the Sunday following, I went to hear her for myself;
and in good truth, I consider the event as an era in my life
never to be forgotten. Such an odd jumbling together of
all sorts of things in Scripture, such wild fancies,
beautiful
,
sublime, or grotesque, such vehemence of gesture,
such dramatic attitudes, I never before heard and
witnessed
.
I verily thought she would have leaped over the pulpit;
and if she had, I was almost prepared to have seen her
poise herself on unseen wings, above the wondering
congregation
.
I know not whether her dress was of her own choosing;
but it was tastefully appropriate. A black silk grown, with
plain, white cuffs; a white muslin kerchief, folded neatly
over the breast, and crossed by a broad black scarf, like that
which bishops wear over the surplice.
She began with great moderation, gradually rising in her
tones, until she arrived at the shouting pitch, common with
Methodists. This she sustained for an incredible time,
without taking breath, and with a huskiness of effort, that
produced a painful sympathy in my own lungs. Imagine
the following, thus uttered; that is, spoken without
punctuation
.
Silence in Heaven! The Lord said to
Gabriel
,
bid all the angels keep silence. Go up into the third
heavens, and tell the archangels to hush their golden harps.
Let the mountains be filled with silence. Let the sea stop
its roaring, and the earth be still. What's the matter now?
Why, man has sinned, and who shall save him? Let there
be silence, while God makes search for a Messiah. Go
down to the earth; make haste, Gabriel, and inquire if any
there are worthy; and Gabriel returned and said, No, not
one. Go search among the angels, Gabriel, and inquire if
any there are worthy; make haste, Gabriel; and Gabriel
returned and said, No, not one. But don't be discouraged.
Don't be discouraged, fellow sinners. God arose in his
majesty, and he pointed to his own right hand, and said to
Gabriel, Behold the Lion of the tribe of Judah; he alone is
worthy. He shall redeem my people.
You will observe it was purely her own idea, that
silence reigned on earth and in heaven, while search was
made for a Messiah. It was a beautifully poetic
conception
,
not unworthy of Milton.
Her description of the resurrection and the day of
judgment
,
must have been terrific to most of her audience, and
was highly exciting even to me, whose religious sympathies
could never be roused by fear. Her figure looked strangely
fantastic, and even supernatural, as she loomed up above
the pulpit, to represent the spirits rising from their graves.
So powerful was her rude eloquence, that it continually
impressed
me with grandeur, and once only excited a smile;
that was when she described a saint striving to rise,
buried
perhaps twenty feet deep, with three or four sinners a
top of him.
This reminded me of a verse in Dr. Nettleton's Village
Hymns:
Oh how the resurrection light,
Will
clarify
believers' sight,
How joyful will the saints arise,
And
rub the dust
from off their eyes.
With a power of imagination singularly strong and vivid,
she described the resurrection of a young girl, who had
died a sinner. Her body came from the grave, and her
soul from the pit, where it had been tormented for many
years. The guilty spirit came up with the flames all
around itrollingrollingrolling. She suited the
action
to the word, as Siddons herself might have done. Then
she described the body wailing and shrieking, O Lord!
must I take that ghost again? Must I be tormented with
that burning ghost for ever?
Luckily for the excited feelings of her audience, she
changed the scene, and brought before us the gospel ship,
laden with saints, and bound for the heavenly shore. The
majestic motion of a vessel on the heaving sea, and the
fluttering of its pennon in the breeze, was imitated with wild
gracefulness by the motion of her hands. It touched the
strand. Oh! it was a pretty morning! and at the first tap
of Heaven's bell, the angels came crowding round, to bid
them welcome. There you and I shall meet, my beloved
fellow-travellers. FarewellFarewellI have it in my
temporal feelings that I shall never set foot in this
New-York
again. Farewell on earth, but I shall meet you
there, pointing reverently upward. May we all be
aboard that blessed ship. Shouts throughout the
audience
,
We will! We will! Stirred by such responses,
Julia broke out with redoubled fervour, Farewell
farewell
.
Let the world say what they will of me, I shall
surely meet you in Heaven's broad bay. Hell clutched
me, but it hadn't energy enough to hold me. Farewell on
earth. I shall meet you in the morning. Again and
again she tossed her arms abroad, and uttered her wild
farewell; responded to by the loud farewell of a whole
congregation, like the shouts of an excited populace. Her
last words were the poetic phrase,
I shall meet you in the
morning!
Her audience were wrought up to the highest pitch of
enthusiasm I ever witnessed. That's God's truth!
Glory! Amen! Hallelujah! resounded throughout
the crowded house. Emotion vented itself in murmuring,
stamping, shouting, singing, and wailing. It was like the
uproar of a sea lashed by the winds.
You know that religion has always come to me in
stillness
;
and that the machinery of theological excitement has
ever been as powerless over my soul, as would be the
exorcisms
of a wizard. You are likewise aware of my tendency
to
generalize;
to look at truth as
universal,
not merely in
its particular relations; to observe human nature as a
whole,
and not in fragments. This propensity, greatly
strengthened
by the education of circumstances, has taught me to
look calmly on all forms of religious opinionnot with the
indifference, or the scorn, of unbelief; but with a friendly
wish to discover everywhere the great central ideas
common
to all religious souls, though often re-appearing in the
strangest disguises, and lisping or jabbering in the most
untranslatable tones.
Yet combined as my religious character is, of quiet
mysticism
,
and the coolest rationality, will you believe me, I
could scarcely refrain from shouting Hurra! for that
heaven-bound
ship; and the tears rolled down my cheeks, as that
dusky priestess of eloquence reiterated her wild and solemn
farewell.
If she gained such power over my spirit, there is no
cause to marvel at the tremendous excitement throughout
an audience so ignorant, and so keenly susceptible to
outward
impressions. I knew not how the high-wrought
enthusiasm
would be let down in safety. The shouts died
away, and returned in shrill fragments of echoes, like the
trembling vibrations of a harp, swept with a strong hand, to
the powerful music of a war-song. Had I remembered a
lively Methodist tune, as well as I recollected the words,
I should have broke forth:
The gospel ship is sailing by!
The Ark of safety now is nigh,
Come, sinners, unto Jesus fly,
Improve the day of grace.
Oh, there'll be glory, hallelujah,
When we arrive at home!
The same instinct that guided me, impelled the audience
to seek rest in music, for their panting spirits and
quivering
nerves. All joined spontaneously in singing an old
familiar
tune, more quiet than the bounding, billowy tones of
my favourite Gospel Ship. Blessings on music! Like a
gurgling brook to feverish lips are sweet sounds to the
heated and weary soul.
Everybody round me could sing; and the tones were soft
and melodious. The gift of song is universal with
Africans
;
and the fact is a prophetic one. Sculpture
blossomed
into its fullest perfection in a Physical Age, on which
dawned the intellectual; Painting blossomed in an
Intellectual
Age, warmed by the rising sun of moral sentiment;
and now Music goes forward to its culmination in the
coming
Spiritual Age. Now is the time that Ethiopia begins
to stretch forth her hands. Her soul, so long silenced,
will yet utter itself in music's highest harmony.
When the audience paused, Mr. Matthews, their pastor,
rose to address them. He is a religious-minded man, to
whose good influence Julia owes, under God, her present
state of mind. She always calls him father, and speaks
of him with the most affectionate and grateful reverence.
At one period of her life, it seems that she was led astray
by temptations, which peculiarly infest the path of coloured
women in large cities; but ever since her conversion to
God, she has been strictly exemplary in her walk and
conversation. In her own expressive language, Hell
clutched her, but hadn't energy enough to hold her. The
missteps of her youth are now eagerly recalled by those
who love to stir polluted waters; and they are brought
forward
as reasons why she ought not to be allowed to preach.
I was surprised to learn that to this prejudice was added
another, against women's preaching. This seemed a strange
idea for Methodists, some of whose brightest ornaments
have been women preachers. As far back as Adam Clarke's
time, his objections were met by the answer, If an
Ass
reproved Balaam, and a
barn-door fowl
reproved Peter,
why shouldn't a
woman
reprove sin?
This classification with donkeys and fowls is certainly
not very complimentary. The first comparison I heard
most wittily replied to, by a coloured woman who had once
been a slave. Maybe a speaking woman
is
like an Ass,
said she; but I can tell you one thingthe Ass saw the
angel, when Balaam didn't.
Father Matthews, after apologizing for various
misquotations
of Scripture, on the ground of Julia's inability to read,
added: But the Lord has evidently called this woman to
a great work. He has made her mighty to the salvation of
many souls, as a cloud of witnesses can testify. Some
say she ought not to preach, because she is a woman. But
I say, `Let the Lord send by whom he
will
send.' Let
everybody that has a message, deliver itwhether man or
woman, white or coloured! Some say women mustn't
preach, because they were first in the transgression; but it
seems to me hard that if they helped us
into
sin, they
shouldn't be suffered to help us
out
. I say, `Let the Lord
send by whom he
will
send;' and my pulpit shall be
always
open.
Thus did the good man instil a free principle into those
uneducated minds, like gleams of light through chinks in a
prison-wall. Who can foretell its manifold and
ever-increasing
results in the history of that long-crippled race? Verily
great is the Advent of a true Idea, made manifest to men;
and great are the miracles it worksmaking the blind to
see, and the lame to walk.
LETTER XII.
January 1, 1482.
I wish you a Happy New-Year. A year of brave
conflict
with evil, within and withouta year of sinless
victories
.
Would that some fairy, whose word fulfils itself in
fate, would wish
me
such a year! Yet scarcely are the
words written, when I fall to pitying myself, in view of the
active images they have conjured up; and my soul turns,
with wistful gaze, towards the green pastures and still
waters
of spiritual quietude, and poetic ease. Yet were the
aforesaid fairy standing before me, ready to grant whatsoever
I might ask. I think I should have strength enough to choose
a year of conflict for the good of my race; but it should be
warfare without poisoned arrows, and fought on the broad
table-land of high mountains, never descending into the
narrow by-paths of personal controversy, or chasing its foe
through the crooked lanes of policy. In all ages of the
world, Truth has suffered much at the hands of her
disciples
,
because they have been ever tempted to use the
weapons her antagonists have chosen. Let us learn
wisdom
by the Past. The warnings that sigh through
experience
,
and the hope that smiles through prophecy, both
have power to strengthen us.
The Past and the Future! how vast is the sound, how
infinite the significance! Hast thou well considered of
the fact, that all the Past is reproduced in thee, and all the
Future prophesied? Had not Pharaoh's daughter saved
the Hebrew babe, and brought him up in all the learning
of the Egyptians; had not Plato's soul uttered itself in
harmony with the great choral hymn of the universe; had
not Judean shepherds listened in the deep stillness of
moon-light
,
on the mountains, to angels chanting forth the primal
notes whence all music flowsWorship, Peace, and Love;
had any one of these been silent, wouldst
thou
have been
what thou art? Nay, thou wouldst have been altogether
another; unable even to comprehend thy present self. Had
Christianity remained in dens and caves, instead of clothing
itself in outward symbols of grandeur and of beauty; had
cathedrals never risen in towered state,
And over hill and dell
Gone sounding with a royal voice
The stately minster bell;
had William the Norman, never divided Saxon lands by
force, and then united his new piratical state in solemn
marriage with the Church; had Luther never thrown his
inkstand at the Devil, and hit him hard; had Bishop Laud
never driven heretics, by fire and faggot, to the rocky shores
of New England; had William Penn taken off his hat to
the Duke of Yorkwould thy present self have been known
to thyself, couldst thou have seen its features in a mirror?
Nay, verily. Thou art made up of all that has preceded
thee; and thus was thy being predestined. And because
it is thus in the inward spirit, it is so in the outward world.
Our very shawls bear ornaments found in Egyptian
catacombs
,
and our sofas rest on the mysterious Sphinx;
Caryatides
,
which upheld the roof of Diana's ancient temple,
stand with the same quiet and graceful majesty, to sustain
the lighter burden of our candelabras and lamps; and the
water of modern wells flows into vases, whose beautiful
forms were dug from the lava of long-buried Herculaneum.
Truth is immortal. No fragment of it ever dies. From
time to time, the body dies off it; but it rises in a more
perfect form, leaving its grave-clothes behind it, to be,
perchance
,
worshipped as living things, by those who love to
watch among the tombs. Every line of beauty is the
expression of a thought, and shares the immortality of its
origin; hence the beautiful acanthus leaf is transferred
from Corinthian capitals to Parisian scarfs, and English
calicoes.
It is said that the bow of a violin drawn across the edge
of a glass covered with sand, leaves notes of music written
on the sand. Thus do the vibrations of the Present leave
its tune engraven on the soul; and in the lapse of time, we
call those written notes the language of the Past. Thus art
thou the child of the Past, and the father of the Future.
Thou standest on the Present, like the sea-bird on a rock
in mid ocean, with the immensity of waters behind him,
ready to plunge into the immensity of waters before him.
Art thou a Reformer? Beware of the dangers of thy
position
.
Let not the din of the noisy Present drown the
music of the Past. Be assured there is no tone comes to
thee from the far-off ocean of olden time, which is not a
chord in the eternal anthem of the universe; else had it
been drowned in the roaring waves, long before it came to
thee.
Reform as thou wilt; for the Present and the Future
have need of this; but let no rude scorn breathe on the
4
Past. Lay thy head lovingly in her lap, and let the glance
of her eye pass into thine; for she has been to thee a
mother
.
I can scorn nothing which a nation's heart
Hath held for ages holy: for the heart
Is alike holy in its strength and weakness;
It ought not to be jested with nor scorned.
All things to me are sacred that have been.
And though earth like a river streaked with blood,
Which tells a long and silent tale of death,
May blush her history and hide her eyes,
The Past is sacredit is God's, not ours;
Let her and us do better if we can.
At no season does the thoughtful soul so much realize
that it ever stands between two infinitiesnever does
it so distinctly recognise the presence of vast ideas, that
look before and after, as when the Old Year turns away
its familiar face, and goes off to join its veiled sisterhood
beyond the flood. It is true that
every
day ends a year,
and that which precedes our birth-day does, in an especial
manner, end
our
year; yet is there somewhat peculiarly
impressive in that epoch, which whole nations recognize as
a foot-print of departing time.
The season itself has a wailing voice. The very sky
in spring-time laughingly says, How do you do? but in
winter it looks a mute farewell. The year is dying away,
says Goethe, like the sound of bells. The wind passes
over the stubble, and finds nothing to move. Only the red
berries of that slender tree seem as if they would fain
remind
us of something cheerful; and the measured beat of
the thresher's flail calls up the thought that
in the dry and
fallen ear lies so much of nourishment and life
.
Thus Hope springs ever from the bosom of sadness. A
welcome to the New-Year mingles with our fond farewell
to the old. Hail to the Present, with all the work it brings!
Its restlessness, if looked at aright, becomes a golden
prophecy
.
We will not
read
its prose, and count our stops,
as schools have taught; but the heart shall
chant
it; and
tones shall change the words to music, that shall write itself
on all coming time.
* * * * * * * *
New-York
welcomes the new year, in much the same
style that she does every thing else. She is not prone, as
the Quakers say, to get into the stillness, to express any
of her emotions. Such a hubbub as was kept up on the
night of the 31st, I never heard. Such a firing out of the
old year, and such a firing in of the new! Fourth of July
in Boston is nothing compared to it. The continual
discharge
of guns and pistols prevented my reading or writing
in peace, and I took refuge in bed; but every five minutes
a lurid flash darted athwart the walls, followed by the
hateful
crash of fire-arms. If any good thing is expressed by
that sharp voice, it lies beyond the power of my
imagination
to discover it; why men should choose it for the
utterance
of joy, is more than I can tell.
The racket of these powder-devilkins kept me awake till
two o'clock. At five, I was roused by a stout Hibernian
voice, almost under my window, shouting Pa-ther!
Pather
!
Peter did not answer, andoff went a pistol.
Upon this, Peter was fain to put his head out of the
window
,
and inquire what was wanted. A bright New Year
to ye, Pa-ther. Get up and open the door.
The show in the shop-windows, during the week
between
Christmas and New-Year's, was splendid, I assure
you. All that Parisian taste, or English skill could furnish,
was spread out to tempt the eye. How I did want the
wealth of Rothschild, that I might make all the world a
present! and then, methinks, I could still long for another
world to endow. The happiness of Heaven must consist
in loving and giving. What else is there worth living for!
I have often involuntarily applied to myself a remark made
by Madam Roland. Reflecting upon what part I was
fitted to perform in the world, says she, I could never
think of any that quite satisfied me, but that of Divine
Providence
.
To some, this may sound blasphemous; it was,
however, merely the spontaneous and childlike utterance of
a loving and liberal soul.
Though no great observer of times and seasons, I do like
the universal custom of ushering in the new year with gifts
and gladsome wishes. I will not call these returning
seasons
notches cut in a stick, to count our prison hours, but
rather a garlanding of mile-stones on the way to our Father's
mansion.
In New-York, they observe this festival after the old
Dutch fashion; and the Dutch, you know, were famous
lovers of good eating. No lady, that
is
a lady, will be
out in the streets on the first of January. Every woman,
that
is
anybody, stays at home, dressed in her best, and
by her side is a table covered with cakes, preserves, wines,
oysters, hot coffee, &c.; and as every gentleman is in honor
bound to call on every lady, whose acquaintance he does not
intend to cut, the amount of eating and drinking done by
some fashionable beaux must of course be very considerable.
The number of calls is a matter of pride and boasting among
ladies, and there is, of course, considerable rivalry in the
magnificence and variety of the eating tables. This
custom
is eminently Dutch in its character, and will pass away
before a higher civilization.
To furnish forth this treat, the shops vied with each other
to the utmost. Confectionary abounded in the shape of
every living thing; beside many things nowhere to be
found, not even among gnomes, or fairies, or uncouth
merrows
of the sea. Cakes were of every conceivable shape
pyramids, obelisks, towers, pagodas, castles, &c. Some
frosted loaves nestled lovingly in a pretty basket of sugar
eggs; others were garlanded with flowers, or surmounted
by cooing doves, or dancing cupids. Altogether, they made
a pretty show in Broadwaytoo prettysince the object
was to minister to heartless vanity, or tempt a sated
appetite
.
But I will not moralize. Let us all
have
virtue, and then
there will be no further need to
talk
of it, as the German
wisely said.
There is one lovely feature in this annual festival. It is
a season when all past neglect, all family feuds, all
heartburning
and estrangement among friends may be forgotten
and laid aside for ever. They who have not spoken for
years may renew acquaintance, without any unpleasant
questions asked, if they signify a wish to do so by calling
on the first of January. Wishing all may copy this warm
bit of colouring in our social picture, I bid you farewell, with
my heart's best blessing, and this one scrap of morals: May
you treat every human being as you would treat him, and
speak of every one as you would speak, if sure that death
would part you before next New-Year's Day.
LETTER XIII.
January 20, 1842.
Is your memory a daguerreotype machine, taking
instantaneous
likenesses of whatsoever the light of imagination
happens to rest upon? I wish mine were not; especially
in a city like thisunless it would be more select in its
choice, and engrave only the beautiful. Though I should
greatly prefer the green fields, with cows, chewing the cud,
under shady trees, by the side of deep, quiet poolsstill I
would find no fault, to have my gallery partly filled with the
palaces of our merchant princes, built of the sparkling
Sing Sing marble, which glitters in the sunlight, like fairy
domes; but the aforesaid daguerreotype will likewise
engrave
an ugly, angular building, which stands at the corner
of Division-street, protruding its sharp corners into the
midst of things, determined that all the world shall see it,
whether it will or no, and covered with signs from cellar
to garret, to blazen forth
all
it contains. 'Tis a caricature
likeness of the nineteenth century; and like the nineteenth
century it plagues me; I would I could get quit of it.
I know certain minds, imbued with poetic philosophy,
who earnestly seek all forms of outward beauty in this
world, believing that their images become deeply impressed
on the soul that loves them, and thus constitute its scenery
through eternity. If I had faith in this theory, that large
and many-labelled thing of bricks and mortar, at the corner
of Division-street, would almost drive me mad; for though
the spirit of beauty can witness that I love it not, its lines
are branded into my mind with most disagreeable
distinctness
.
I know not why it is so; for assuredly this is not a
sinner above many other structures, built by contract, and
inhabited by trade.
Luckily, no forms can re-appear in another world, which
are not
within
the soul. The sublime landscape
there
belongs
to him who has spiritually retired apart into high
places to pray; not to the cultivated traveller with his
mind's portfolio filled with images of Alpine scenery, or of
huge Plinlimmen veiled in clouds. The gardens
there
are
not for nabobs, who exchange rupees for rare and fragrant
roses; but for humble, loving souls, who cherish those
sweet charities of life, that lie, scattered at the feet of
man like flowers. Thanks be to Him who careth for all
he hath made, the poor child running about naked in the
miserable abodes at Five Points, though the whole of his
mortal life should be of hardship and privation, may, by the
grace of God, fashion for himself as beautiful an eternity,
as Victoria's son; nay, perchance his situation bad as it
is, involves even less danger of losing that beauty which
alone remains, when the world, and all images thereof,
pass away, like mist before the rising sun. The outward
is but a seeming and a show; the inward alone is
permanent
and real.
That men have small faith in this, is witnessed by their
doings. Parents shriek with terror to see a beloved child
on the steep roof of lofty buildings, lest his body should fall
a mutilated heap upon the pavement; but they can,
without
horror, send him to grow rich by trade, in such places
as Havana or New Orleans, where his soul is almost sure
to fall, battered and crushed, till scarcely one feature of
God's image remains to be recognised. If heaven were
to them as real as earth, they could not thus make contracts
with Satan, to buy the shadow for the substance.
Alas, how few of us, even the wisest and the best, believe
in Truth, and are willing to trust it altogether.How we
pass through life in simulation and false shows! In our
pitiful anxiety how we shall appear before men, we forget
how we appear before angels. Yet is
their
public
opinion somewhat that concerns us most nearly. Passing
by the theatre, I saw announced for performance a comedy,
called the Valley de Sham. That simple sentence of
mis-spelled French brought to my mind a whole rail-road
train of busy thought. I smiled as I read it, and said
within myself, Is not that comedy New-York? Nay, is
not the whole world a Valley of Sham? Are not you, and
I, and every other mortal, the valet of some sham or
other?
I scorn this hated scene
Of masking and disguise,
Where men on men still gleam,
With falseness in their eyes;
Where all is counterfeit,
And truth hath never say;
Where hearts themselves do cheat,
Concealing hope's decay;
And writhing at the stake,
Themselves do liars make.
Go search thy heart, poor fool,
And mark its passions well;
'Twere time to go to school
'Twere time the
truth
to tell
'Twere time this world should cast
Its infant slough away,
And hearts burst forth at last,
Into the light of day:
'Twere time all learned to be
Fit for Eternity.
My friend, hast thou ever thought how pleasant, and
altogether lovely, would be a life of entire sincerity, married
to perfect love? The wildest stories of magic skill, or fairy
power, could not equal the miracles that would be wrought
by such a life; for it would change this hollow
masquerade
of veiled and restless souls into a place of divine
communion
.
Oh, let us no longer utter false, squeaking voices, through
our stifling masks. If we have attained so far as to
speak
no lie, let us make the nobler effort to
live
none. Art thou
troubled with vain fears concerning to-day's bread and
tomorrow's
garment? Let thy every word and act be
perfect
truth, uttered in genuine love; and though thou mayest
ply thy spiritual trades all unconscious of their results, yet
be assured that thus, and thus only, canst thou weave royal
robes of eternal beauty, and fill ample storehouses, to
remain
long after Wall-street and State-street have crumbled
into dust.
Be true to thyself. Let not the forms of business, or the
conventional arrangements of society, seduce thee into
falsehood
.
Have no fears of the harshness of sincerity. Truth
is harsh, only when divorced from Love. There is no
refinement
like holiness; for which humility is the other
name. Politeness is but a parrot mockery of her heavenly
tones, which the world lisps and stammers, to imitate, as
best she can, the pure language known to us only in
beautiful
fragments. Not through the copy shall the fair
original
ever be restored.
Above all, be true to thyself in religious utterance, or
remain for ever silent. Speak only according to thy own
genuine, inward experience; and look well to it, that thou
repeatest no phrase prescribed by creeds, or familiarly used
by sects, unless that phrase really conveys some truth into
thine own soul. There is far too much of this muttering
of dead language. Indeed, the least syllable of it is too
much, for him who has faith in the God of truth. Wouldst
thou give up thy plain, expressive English, to mumble Greek
phrases, without the dimmest perception of their meaning,
because schools and colleges have taught that they mean
thus and so? Or wilt thou maintain a blind reverence for
words, which really have no more life for thee than old
garments
stuffed with chaff? Multitudes who make no
profession
of religion, as the phrase is, are passively driven in the
traces of a blind sectarism from which they lack either the
energy or the courage to depart. When I see such startled
by an honest inquiry what is really meant by established
forms, or current phrases, I am reminded of the old man
in the play, who said, I speak no Greek, though I love
the sound on't; it goes so thundering, as it conjured devils.
Not against any form, or phrase, do I enter a protest; but
only against its unmeaning use. If to thy soul it really
embodies truth, to thee it should be most sacred. But
spiritual
dialects, learned and spoken by rote, are among the
worst of mockeries. The man who claims to speak as
books enable, as synods use, as fashion guides, or as
interest
commands, babbles. Let him hush.
Be true to thy friend. Never speak of his faults to
another
,
to show thy own discrimination; but open them all to
4*
him, with candor and true gentleness.
Forgive
all his
errors and his sins, be they ever so many; but do not
excuse
the slightest deviation from rectitude. Never forbear
to dissent from a false opinion, or a wrong practice, from
mistaken motives of kindness; nor seek thus to have thy
own weaknesses sustained; for these things cannot be
done without injury to the soul. God forbid, says
Emerson
,
that when I look to friendship as a firm rock to sustain
me in moral emergencies, I should find it nothing but a
mush of concession. Better be a nettle in the side of my
friend, than to be merely his echo.
As thou wouldst be true to thy friend, be so likewise to
thy country. Love her, with all her faults; but on the
faults themselves pour out thy honest censure. Thus shalt
thou truly serve her, and best rebuke the hirelings that
would make her lose her freedom for the tickling of her
ears.
Lastly, be true to the world. Benevolence, like music,
is a universal language. It cannot freely utter itself in
dialects
,
that belong to a nation, or a clan. In its large
significance
,
the human race is to thee a brother and a friend.
Posterity needs much at thy hands, and will receive much,
whether thou art aware of it, or not. Thou mayest deem
thyself without influence, and altogether unimportant.
Believe
it not. Thy simplest act, thy most casual word, is
cast into the great seed-field of human thought, and will
reappear
,
as poisonous weed, or herb-medicinal, after a
thousand years.
Many live as if they were not ashamed to adopt
practically
the selfish creed, uttered in folly or in fun, Why
should I do anything for posterity? Posterity has done
nothing for me. Ay; but the Past has done much for
thee, and has given the Future an order upon thee for the
payment. If thou hast received counterfeit coin, melt out
the dross, and return true metal.
LETTER XIV.
February 17, 1842
.
I was always eager for the spring-time, but never so much
as now.
Patience yet a little longer! and I shall find delicate bells
of the trailing arbutus, fragrant as an infant's breath, hidden
deep, under their coverlid of autumn leaves, like modest
worth in this pretending world. My spirit is weary for
rural rambles. It is sad walking in the city. The streets
shut out the sky, even as commerce comes between the soul
and heaven. The busy throng, passing and repassing,
fetter freedom, while they offer no sympathy. The
loneliness
of the soul is deeper, and far more restless, than in the
solitude of the mighty forest. Wherever are woods and
fields I find a home; each tinted leaf and shining pebble
is to me a friend; and wherever I spy a wild flower, I am
ready to leap up, clap my hands, and exclaim, Cockatoo!
he know me very well! as did the poor New Zealander,
when he recognised a bird of his native clime, in the
menageries
of London.
But amid these magnificent masses of sparkling marble,
hewn
in prison,
I am all alone. For eight weary months,
I have met in the crowded streets but two faces I had ever
seen before. Of some, I would I could say that I should
never see them again; but they haunt me in my sleep, and
come between me and the morning. Beseeching looks,
begging the comfort and the hope I have no power to give.
Hungry eyes, that look as if they had pleaded long for
sympathy, and at last gone mute in still despair. Through
what woful, what frightful masks, does the human soul look
forth, leering, peeping, and defying, in this thoroughfare of
nations. Yet in each and all lie the capacities of an
archangel
;
as the majestic oak lies enfolded in the acorn that
we tread carelessly under foot, and which decays,
perchance
,
for want of soil to root in.
The other day, I went forth for exercise merely, without
other hope of enjoyment than a farewell to the setting sun,
on the now deserted Battery, and a fresh kiss from the
breezes of the sea, ere they passed through the polluted
city, bearing healing on their wings. I had not gone far,
when I met a little ragged urchin, about four years old, with
a heap of newspapers, more big as he could carry, under
his little arm, and another clenched in his small, red fist.
The sweet voice of childhood was prematurely cracked
into
shrillness, by screaming street cries, at the top of his
lungs; and he looked blue, cold, and disconsolate. May
the angels guard him! How I wanted to warm him in my
heart. I stood, looking after him, as he went shivering
along. Imagination followed him to the miserable cellar
where he probably slept on dirty straw; I saw him flogged,
after his day of cheerless toil, because he had failed to bring
home pence enough for his parents' grog; I saw wicked
ones come muttering and beckoning between his young
soul and heaven; they tempted him to steal, to avoid the
dreaded beating. I saw him, years after, bewildered and
frightened, in the police-office, surrounded by hard faces.
Their law-jargon conveyed no meaning to his ear, awakened
no slumbering moral sense, taught him no clear distinction
between right and wrong; but from their cold, harsh tones,
and heartless merriment, he drew the inference that they
were enemies; and, as such, he hated them. At that
moment
,
one tone like a mother's voice might have wholly
changed his earthly destiny; one kind word of friendly
counsel might have saved himas if an angel, standing in
the genial sunlight, had thrown to him one end of a garland,
and gently diminishing the distance between them, had
drawn him safely out of the deep and tangled labyrinth,
where false echoes and winding paths conspired to make
him lose his way.
But watchmen and constables were around him, and
they have small fellowship with angels. The strong
impulses
that might have become overwhelming love for his
race, are perverted to the bitterest hatred. He tries the
universal
resort of weakness against force; if they are too
strong for
him,
he will be too cunning for
them. Their
cunning is roused to detect
his
cunning: and thus the
gallows
game is played, with interludes of damnable merriment
from police reports, whereat the heedless multitude laugh;
while angels weep over the slow murder of a human soul.
When, oh when, will men learn that society makes and
cherishes the very crimes it so fiercely punishes, and
in
punishing reproduces?
The key of knowledge first ye take away,
And then, because ye've robbed him, ye enslave;
Ye shut out from him the sweet light of day,
And then, because he's in the dark, ye pave
The road, that leads him to his wished for grave,
With stones of stumbling: then, if he but tread
Darkling and slow, ye call him fool and knave
Doom him to toil, and yet deny him bread:
Chains round his limbs ye throw, and curses on his head.
God grant the little shivering carrier-boy a brighter
destiny
than I have foreseen for him.
A little further on, I encountered two young boys fighting
furiously for some coppers, that had been given them and
had fallen on the pavement. They had matted black hair,
large, lustrous eyes, and an olive complexion. They were
evidently foreign children, from the sunny clime of Italy or
Spain, and nature had made them subjects for an artist's
dream. Near by on the cold stone steps, sat a ragged,
emaciated
woman, whom I conjectured, from the resemblance
of her large, dark eyes, might be their mother; but she
looked on their fight with languid indifference, as if seeing,
she saw it not. I spoke to her, and she shook her head in
a mournful way, that told me she did not understand my
language. Poor, forlorn wanderer! would I could place
thee and thy beautiful boys under shelter of sun-ripened
vines, surrounded by the music of thy mother-land! Pence
I will give thee, though political economy reprove the deed.
They can but appease the hunger of the body; they
cannot
soothe the hunger of thy heart; that I obey the kindly
impulse may make the world none the betterperchance
some iota the worse; yet I must needs follow itI cannot
otherwise.
I raised my eyes above the woman's weather-beaten head,
and saw behind the window, of clear, plate glass, large
vases
of gold and silver, curiously wrought. They spoke
significantly of the sad contrasts in this disordered world;
and excited in my mind whole volumes, not of political, but
of angelic economy. Truly, said I, if the Law of Love
prevailed, vases of gold and silver might even more abound
but no homeless outcast would sit shivering beneath their
glittering mockery. All would be richer, and no man the
poorer. When will the world learn its best wisdom? When
will the mighty discord come into heavenly harmony? I
looked at the huge stone structures of commerical wealth,
and they gave an answer that chilled my heart. Weary of
city walks, I would have turned homeward; but nature,
ever true and harmonious, beckoned to me from the Battery,
and the glowing twilight gave me friendly welcome. It
seemed as if the dancing Spring Hours had thrown their
rosy mantles on old silvery winter in the lavishness of
youthful love.
I opened my heart to the gladsome influence, and forgot
that earth was not a mirror of the heavens. It was but for
a moment; for there under the leafless trees, lay two ragged
little boys, asleep in each other's arms. I remembered
having
read in the police reports, the day before, that two little
children, thus found, had been taken up as vagabonds. They
told, with simple pathos, how both their mothers had been
dead for months; how they had formed an intimate
friendship
,
had begged together, ate together, hungered together,
and together slept uncovered beneath the steel-cold stars.
The twilight seemed no longer warm; and brushing away
a tear, I walked hastily homeward. As I turned into the
street where God has provided me with a friendly shelter,
something lay across my path. It was a woman,
apparently
dead; with garments all draggled in New-York
gutters
,
blacker than waves of the infernal rivers. Those who
gathered around, said she had fallen in intoxication, and
was rendered senseless by the force of the blow. They
carried her to the watch-house, and the doctor promised
she should be well attended. But, alas, for watch-house
charities to a breaking heart! I could not bring myself to
think otherwise than that hers
was
a breaking heart. Could
she but give a full revelation of early emotions checked in
their full and kindly flow, of affections repressed, of hopes
blighted, and energies misemployed through ignorance, the
heart would kindle and melt, as it does when genius stirs
its deepest recesses.
It seemed as if the voice of human wo was destined to
follow me through the whole of that unblest day. Late in
the night I heard the sound of voices in the street, and
raising
the window, saw a poor, staggering woman in the hands
of a watchman. My ear caught the words, Thank you
kindly, sir. I should
like
to go home. The sad and
humble accents in which the simple phrase was uttered,
the dreary image of the watch-house, which that poor
wretch dreamed was her
home,
proved too much for my
overloaded sympathies. I hid my face in the pillow, and
wept; for my heart was almost breaking with the misery
of my kind.
I thought, then, that I would walk no more abroad, till
the fields were green. But my mind and body grow alike
impatient of being enclosed within walls; both ask for the
free breeze, and the wide, blue dome that overarches and
embraces
all
. Again I rambled forth, under the February
sun, as mild and genial as the breath of June. Heart, mind,
and frame grew glad and strong, as we wandered on, past
the old Stuyvesant church, which a few years agone was
surrounded by fields and Dutch farm-houses, but now stands
in the midst of peopled streets;and past the trim, new
houses, with their green verandahs, in the airy suburbs.
Following the railroad, which lay far beneath our feet, as
we wound our way over the hills, we came to the
burying-ground
of the poor. Weeds and brambles grew along the
sides, and the stubble of last year's grass waved over it,
like dreary memories of the past; but the sun smiled on it,
like God's love on the desolate soul. It was inexpressibly
touching to see the frail memorials of affection, placed there
by hearts crushed under the weight of poverty. In one
place was a small rude cross of wood, with the initials J.
S. cut with a penknife, and apparently filled with ink. In
another a small hoop had been bent into the form of a heart,
painted green, and nailed on a stick at the head of the grave.
On one upright shingle was painted only
Mutter;
the
German word for
Mother
. On another was scrawled, as
if with charcoal,
So ruhe wohl, du unser liebes kind
.
(Rest well, our beloved child.) One recorded life's brief
history thus: H. G. born in Bavaria; died in New-York.
Another short epitaph, in French, told that the sleeper came
from the banks of the Seine.
The predominance of foreign epitaphs affected me
deeply
.
Who could now tell with what high hopes those
departed
ones had left the heart-homes of Germany, the
sunny hills of Spain, the laughing skies of Italy, or the
wild beauty of Switzerland? Would not the friends they
had left in their childhood's home, weep scalding tears to
find them in a pauper's grave, with their initials rudely
carved on a fragile shingle? Some had not even these frail
memorials. It seemed there was none to care whether
they lived or died. A wide, deep trench was open; and
there I could see piles of unpainted coffins heaped one
upon the other, left uncovered with earth, till the yawning
cavity was filled with its hundred tenants.
Returning homeward, we passed a Catholic
burying-ground
.
It belonged to the upper classes, and was filled
with marble monuments, covered with long inscriptions.
But none of them touched my heart like that rude shingle,
with the simple word Mutter inscribed thereon. The
gate was open, and hundreds of Irish, in their best Sunday
clothes, were stepping reverently among the graves, and
kissing the very sods. Tenderness for the dead is one of
the loveliest features of their nation and their church.
The evening was closing in, as we returned, thoughtful,
but not gloomy. Bright lights shone through crimson, blue,
and green, in the apothecaries' windows, and were
reflected
in prismatic beauty from the dirty pools in the street.
It was like poetic thoughts in the minds of the poor and
ignorant; like the memory of pure aspirations in the
vicious; like a rainbow of promise, that God's spirit never
leaves even the most degraded soul. I smiled, as my spirit
gratefully accepted this love-token from the outward; and
I thanked our heavenly Father for a world beyond this.
LETTER XV.
March 17, 1842.
It may seem strange to you that among the mass of
beings
in this great human hive, I should occupy an entire
letter with one whose life was like a troubled and
fantastic
dream; apparently without use to himself or others.
Yet he was one who has left a record on the public heart,
and will not be soon forgotten. For several years past the
eccentricities of Macdonald Clarke have been the city talk,
and almost every child in the street was familiar with his
countenance. In latter years the record of inexpressible
misery was written there; but he is said to have had rather
an unusual portion of beauty in his youth; and even to the
last, the heart looked out from his wild eyes with most
friendly earnestness. I saw him but twice; and now mourn
sincerely that the pressure of many avocations prevented
my seeking to see him oftener. So many forms of
unhappiness
crowd upon is in this world of perversion and
disorder
,
that it is impossible to answer all demands. But
stranger as poor Clarke was, it now makes me sad that I
did not turn out of my way to utter the simple word of
kindness, which never failed to rejoice his suffering and
childlike soul.
I was always deeply touched by the answer of the poor,
heart-broken page in Hope Leslie: Yes, lady, I
have
lost
my way! How often do I meet with those who, on the
crowded pathway of life, have lost their way. With poor
Clarke it was so from the very outset. Something that was
not quite insanity, but was nigh akin to it, marked his very
boyhood.
He was born in New London, Connecticut, and was
school-mate with our eloquent friend, Charles C. Burleigh,
who always speaks of him as the most kind-hearted of boys,
but even then characterized by the oddest vagaries. His
mother died at sea, when he was twelve years old; being
on a voyage for her health. He says
One night as the bleak October breeze
Was sighing a dirge through the leafless trees,
She was borne by rough men in the chilly dark,
Down to the wharf-side, where a bark
Waited for its precious freight.
I watched the ship-lights long and late;
When I could see them no more for tears,
I turned drooping away,
And felt that mine were darkening years.
And darkened indeed they were. That delicate boy, as
he describes himself, an only son, having been petted to
a pitiable unfitness for the sterner purposes of life, went
forth alone, to struggle with the world's unfriendliness, and
front its frowns.
He was in Philadelphia, at one period; but all we ever
heard of him there was, that he habitually slept in the
grave-yard, on Franklin's monument. In 1819, he
came to New-York, where he wrote for newspapers,
and struggled as he could with poverty; assisted from
time to time by benevolence which he never sought. A
sad situation for one who, like him, had a nerve protruding
at every pore.
In New-York he became in love with a handsome young
actress, of seventeen, by the name of Brundage. His
poverty
,
and obvious incapacity to obtain a livelihood, made the
match objectionable in the eyes of her mother; and they
eloped. The time chosen was as wild and inopportune as
most of his movements. On the very night she was to play
Ophelia, on her way to the Park theatre, she absconded
with her lover, and was married. Of course, the play could
not go on; the audience were disappointed, and the
manager
angry. The mother of the young lady, a strong,
masculine
woman, was so full of wrath, that she pulled her
daughter out of bed at midnight, and dragged her home.
The bridegroom tried to pacify the manager by the most
polite explanations; but received nothing but kicks in
return
,
with orders never to show his face within the building
again. The young couple were strongly attached to each
other, and of course were not long kept separated. But
Macdonald, who had come of a wealthy family, was too
proud to have his wife appear on the stage again; and the
remarkable powers of his own mind were rendered useless
by the jar that ran through them all; of course, poverty
came upon them like an armed man. They suffered greatly,
but still clung to each other with the most fervid affection.
Sometimes they slept in the deserted market-house; and
when the weather would permit, under the shadow of the
trees. One dreadful stormy night, they were utterly
without
shelter, and in the extremity of their need, sought the
residence of her mother. They knocked and knocked in
vain; at last, the suffering young wife proposed climbing a
shed, in order to enter the window of a chamber she used to
occupy. To accomplish this purpose, Macdonald placed
boards across a rain-water hogshead, at the corner of the
shed. He mounted first, and drew her up after him; when
suddenly the boards broke, and both fell into the water.
Their screams brought out the strong-handed and
unforgiving
mother. She seized her offending daughter by the hair,
and plunged her up and down in the water several times,
before she would help her out. She finally took her into
the house, and left Macdonald to escape as he could. They
were not allowed to live together again, and the wife
seemed
compelled to return to the stage, as a means of obtaining
bread. She was young and pretty, her affections were
blighted, she was poor, and her profession abounded with
temptations. It was a situation much to be pitied; for it
hardly admitted of other result than that which followed.
They who had loved so fondly, were divorced to meet no
more. Whenever Macdonald alluded to this part of his
strange history, as he often did to a very intimate friend,
he always added, I never blamed her; though it almost
broke my heart. She was driven to it, and I always pitied
her.
This lady is now an actress of considerable reputation in
England; by the name of Burrows, I think.
From this period, the wildness of poor Clarke's nature
increased; until he came to be generally known by the
name of the Mad Poet. His strange productions bore
about the same relation to poetry that
grotesques,
with
monkey faces jabbering out of lilly cups, and gnarled trees
with knot-holes twisted into hag's grimaces, bear to
graceful
arabesques,
with trailing vines and intertwisted blossoms.
Yet was the undoubted presence of genius always visible.
Ever and anon a light from another world shone on his
innocent
soul, kindling the holiest aspirations, which could
find for themselves no form in his bewildered intellect, and
so fell from his pen in uncouth and jagged fragments, still
sparkling with the beauty of the region whence they came.
His metaphors were at times singularly fanciful. He thus
describes the closing day:
Now twilight lets her curtain down,
And pins it with a star.
And in another place, he talks of memory that shall last
Whilst the ear of the earth hears the hymn of the ocean
.
M. B. Lamar, late President of Texas, once met this
eccentric individual at the room of William Page, the
distinguished
artist. The interview led to the following very
descriptive lines from Lamar:
Say, have you seen Macdonald Clarke,
The poet of the Moon?
He is a deccentric lark
As famous as Zip Coon.
He talks of Love and dreams of Fame,
And lauds his ministrel art;
He has a kind of zig-zag brain
But yet a straight-line heart.
Sometimes his strains so sweetly float,
His harp so sweetly sings,
You'd almost think the tuneful hand
Of Jubal touched the strings;
But soon, anon, with failing art,
The strain as rudely jars,
As if a driver tuned the harp,
In cadence with his cars.
He was himself well aware that his mind was a broken
instrument. He described himself as
A poet comfortably crazy
As pliant as a weeping-willow
Loves most everybody's girls; an't lazy
Can write an hundred lines an hour,
With a rackety, whackety railroad power.
From the phrase, loves most everybody's girls, it must
not be inferred that he was profligate. On the contrary, he
was innocent as a child. He talked of love continually;
but it was of a mystic union of souls, whispered to him by
angels, heard imperfectly in the lonely, echoing chambers
of his soul, and uttered in phrases learned on earth, all
unfit for the holy sentiment. Like the philosopher of the
East, he knew, by inward revelation, that his soul
In parting from its warm abode,
Had lost its partner on the road,
And never joined their hands.
His whole life was in fact a restless seeking for his other
half. This idea continually broke from him in plaintive,
wild, imploring tones.
I have met so much of scorn
From those to whom my thoughts were kind,
I've fancied there was never born
On earth, for me, one kindred mind.
Again he says:
The soul that now is cursed and wild,
In one fierce, wavering, ghastly flare,
Would be calm and blest as a sleeping child,
That dreams its mother's breast is there;
Calm as the deep midsummer's air
Calm as that brow so mild and fair
Calm as God's angels everywhere
For all is Heavenif Mary's there.
This restless idea often centred itself upon some young
lady, whom he followed for a long time, with troublesome
but guileless enthusiasm. The objects of his pursuit were
sometimes afraid of him; but there was no occasion for
this. As a New-York editor very happily said, He
pursued
the little Red Riding Hoods of his imagination to
bless and not to devour.
Indeed, in all respects, his nature was most kindly;
in-somuch
that he suffered continual torture in this great
Babel of misery and crime. He wanted to relieve all the
world, and was frenzied that he could not. All that he had
money, watch, rings, were given to forlorn street
wanderers
,
with a compassionate, and even deferential
gentleness
,
that sometimes brought tears to their eyes. Often,
when he had nothing to give, he would snatch up a ragged,
shivering child in the street, carry it to the door of some
princely mansion, and demand to see the lady of the house.
When she appeared, he would say, Madam, God has made
you one of the trustees of his wealth. It is His, not yours.
Take this poor child, wash it, feed it, clothe it, comfort it
in God's name.
Ladies stared at such abrupt address, and deemed the
natural action of the heart sufficient proof of madness; but
the little ones were seldom sent away uncomforted.
Clarke was simple and temperate in all his habits; and
in his deepest poverty always kept up the neat appearance
of a gentleman; if his coat was thread-bare, it was never
soiled. His tendency to refinement was shown in the
church he chose to worship in. It was Grace church, the
plainest, but most highly respectable of the Episcopal
churches in this city. He was a constant attendant, and
took comfort in the devotional frame of mind excited
by the music. He was confirmed at that church but a few
weeks before his death; and commemorated the event in
lines, of which the following are an extract:
Calmly circled round the altar,
The children of the Cross are kneeling.
Forward, brotherdo not falter,
Fast the tears of sin are stealing;
Washing memory bright and clean
Making futurity serene.
During the past winter, he raved more than usual.
The editor of the Aurora says he met him at his simple
repast of apples and milk, in a public house, on last
Christmas evening. He was absolutely mad. You think
I am Macdonald Clarke, said he; but I am not. The
mad poet dashed out his brains, last Thursday night, at
the foot of Emmet's monument. The storm that night was
the tears Heaven wept over him. God animated the body
again. I am not now Macdonald Clarke, but Afara, an
archangel of the Almighty.
I went to Grace church to-day. Misssat in the
seat behind me, and I tossed this velvet bible, with its
golden clasps, into her lap. What do you think she did?
A moment she looked surprised, and then she tossed it
back again. So they all treat me. All I want is some
religious people, that love God and love one another, to
treat me kindly. One sweet smile of Marywould
make my mind all light and peace; and I would write such
poetry as the world never saw.
Something ought to be done for me, said he; I
can't take care of myself. I ought to be sent to the
asylum
;
or, wouldn't it be better to die? The moon shines
through the willow trees on the graves in St. Paul's
churchyard
,
and they look all covered with diamondsdon't you
think they look like diamonds? Then there is a lake in
Greenwood Cemetery;
that
would be a good cool place for
meI am not afraid to die. The stars of heaven look
down on that lake, and it reflects their brightness.
The Mary to whom he alluded, was a wealthy young
lady of this city; one of those whom his distempered
imagination
fancied was his lost half. Some giddy young
persons, with thoughtless cruelty, sought to excite him on
this favourite idea, by every species of joke and trickery.
They made him believe that the young lady was dying with
love for him, but restrained by her father; they sent him
letters, purporting to be from her hand; and finally led him
to the house, on pretence of introducing him, and then left
him on the door-step. The poor fellow returned to the
Carlton House, in high frenzy. The next night but one,
he was found in the streets, kneeling before a poor beggar,
to whom he had just given all his money. The beggar,
seeing his forlorn condition, wished to return it, and said,
Poor fellow, you need it more than I. When the
watchman
encountered them, Clarke was writing busily on his
knee, the history of his companion, which he was
beseeching
him to tell. The cap was blown from his head, on
which a pitiless storm was pelting. The watchman could
make nothing of his incoherent talk, and he was taken to
the Egyptian Tombs; a prison where vagabonds and
criminals await their trial.
In the morning, he begged that the book-keeper of the
Carlton House might be sent for; saying that he was his
only friend. This gentleman conveyed him to the Lunatic
Asylum, on Blackwell's Island. Two of my friends, who
visited him there, found him as comfortable as his situation
allowed. He said he was treated with great kindness, but
his earnest desire to get out rendered the interview very
5
heart-trying. He expressed a wish to recover, that he
might write hymns and spiritual songs all the rest of his
life. In some quiet intervals, he complained of the jokes
that had been practised on him, and said it was not kind;
but he was fearfully delirious most of the timecalling
vociferously for Water! Water! and complaining that
his brain was all on fire.
He died a few days after, aged about 44. His friend of
the Carlton House took upon himself the charge of his
funeral; and it is satisfactory to think that it was all
ordered, just as the kind and simple-hearted being would
have himself desired. The body was conveyed to Grace
church, and the funeral service performed in the presence
of a few who had loved him. Among these was
Fitz-Greene
Halleck, who it is said often befriended him in the
course of his suffering life. Many children were present;
and one, with tearful eyes, brought a beautiful little bunch
of flowers, which a friend laid upon his bosom with reverent
tenderness. He was buried at Greenwood Cemetery, under
the shadow of a pine tree, next to the grave of a little child
a fitting resting place for the loving and childlike poet.
He had often expressed a wish to be buried at
Greenwood
.
Walking there with a friend of mine, they selected
a spot for his grave; and he seemed pleased as a boy,
when told of the arrangements that should be made at his
funeral. I hope the children will come, said he, I
want to be buried by the side of children. Four things I
am sure there will be in heaven; music, plenty of little
children, flowers, and pure air.
They are now getting up a subscription for a marble
monument. It seems out of keeping with his character
and destiny. It were better to plant a rose-bush by his
grave, and mark his name on a simple white cross, that
the few who loved him might know where the gentle,
sorrowing
wanderer sleeps.
LETTER XVI.
August 7, 1842
Were you ever near enough to a great fire to be in
immediate
danger! If you were not, you have missed one
form of keen excitement, and awful beauty. Last week, we
had here one of the most disastrous conflagrations that have
occurred for a long time. It caught, as is supposed, by a
spark from a furnace falling on the roof of a wheelwright's
shop. A single bucket of water, thrown on immediately,
would have extinguished it; but it was not instantly
perceived
,
roofs were dry, and the wind was blowing a perfect
March gale. Like slavery in our government, it was not put
out in the day of small beginnings, and so went on
increasing
in its rage, making a great deal of hot and disagreeable
work.
It began at the corner of Chrystie-street, not far from
our dwelling; and the blazing shingles that came flying
through the air, like a storm in the infernal regions, soon
kindled our roof. We thought to avert the danger by
buckets of water, until the block opposite us was one sheet
of fire, and the heat like that of the furnace which tried
Shadrach, Meshach and Abednego. Then we began to
pack our goods, and run with them in all haste to places of
safety; an effort more easily described than donefor the
streets all round were filled with a dense mass of living
beings, each eager in playing the engines, or saving the
lares
of his own hearth-stone.
Nothing surprised me so much as the rapidity of the
work of destruction. At three o'clock in the afternoon, there
stood before us a close neighbourhood of houses, inhabited
by those whose faces were familiar, though their names
were mostly unknown; at five the whole was a pile of
smoking ruins. The humble tenement of Jane Plato, the
coloured woman, of whose neatly-kept garden and
whitewashed
fences I wrote you last summer, has passed away
for ever. The purple iris, and yellow daffodils, and
variegated
sweet-williams, were all trampled down under heaps
of red-hot mortar. I feel a deeper sympathy for the
destruction
of Jane's little garden, than I do for those who
have lost whole blocks of houses; for I have known and
loved flowers, like the voice of a friendbut with houses
and lands I was never cumbered. In truth, I am ashamed
to say how much I grieve for that little flowery oasis in a
desert of bricks and stone. My beautiful trees, toothe
Ailanthus, whose graceful blossoms, changing their hue
from month to month, blessed me the live-long summer;
and the glossy young Catalpa, over which it threw its arms
so lovingly and freethere they stand, scorched and
blackened
;
and I know not whether nature, with her mighty
healing power, can ever make them live again.
The utilitarian and the moralist will rebuke this trifling
record, and remind me that one hundred houses were
burned
,
and not less than two thousand persons deprived of
shelter for the night. Pardon my childish lamentations.
Most gladly would I give a home to all the destitute; but I
cannot love two thousand persons; and I
loved
my trees.
Insurance stocks are to me an abstraction; but stock
gilliflowers
a most pleasant reality.
Will your kind heart be shocked that I seem to
sympathize
more with Jane Plato for the destruction of her little
garden-patch, than I do with others for loss of houses and
furniture?
Do not misunderstand me. It is simply my way of
saying
that money is not wealth. I know the universal opinion
of mankind is to the contrary; but it is nevertheless a
mistake
.
Our real losses are those in which the
heart
is
concerned
.
An autograph letter from Napoleon Bonaparte
might sell for fifty dollars; but if I possessed such a rare
document
,
would I save it from the fire, in preference to a letter
from a beloved and deceased husband, filled with dear little
household phrases? Which would a mother value most,
the price of the most elegant pair of Parisian slippers, or a
little worn-out shoe, once filled with a precious infant foot,
now walking with the angels?
Jane Plato's garden might not be worth much in dollars
and cents; but it was to her the endeared companion of
many a pleasant hour. After her daily toil, she might be
seen, till twilight deepened into evening, digging round the
roots, pruning branches, and training vines. I know by
experience
how very dear inanimate objects become under such
circumstances. I have dearly loved the house in which I
lived,
but I could not love the one I merely
owned
. The
one in which the
purse
had interest might be ten times more
valuable in the market; but let me calculate as I would, I
should mourn most for the one in which the
heart
had
invested
stock. The common wild-flower that I have brought to
my garden, and nursed, and petted, till it has lost all
homesickness
for its native woods, is
really
more valuable than
the costly exotic, purchased in full bloom from the
conservatory
.
Men of princely fortunes never known what wealth
of happiness there is in a garden.
The rich man in his garden walks,
Beneath his garden trees;
Wrapped in a dream of other things,
He seems to take his ease.
One moment he beholds his flowers,
The next they are forgot;
He eateth of his rarest fruits,
As though he ate them not.
It is not with the poor man so;
He knows each inch of ground,
And every single plant and flower,
That grows within its bound.
And though his garden-plot is small,
Him doth it satisfy;
For there's no inch of all his ground,
That does not fill his eye.
It is not with the rich man thus;
For though his grounds are wide,
He looks beyond, and yet beyond,
With soul unsatisfied.
Yes, in the poor man's garden grow
Far more than herbs and flowers;
Kind thoughts, contentment, peace of mind,
And joy for weary hours.
The reason of this difference is easily explained:
The rich man has his gardeners
His gardeners young and old;
He never takes a spade in hand,
Nor worketh in the mould.
It is not with the poor man so
Wealth, servants, he has none;
And all the work that's done for him,
Must by himself be done.
I have said this much to prove that money is
not
wealth,
and that
God's
gifts are equal; though joint-stock companies
and corporations do their worst to prevent it.
And all the highest
truths,
as well as the genuine
good,
are universal. Doctrinal dogmas may be hammered out on
theological anvils, and appropriated to spiritual corporations,
called sects. But those high and holy truths, which make
the soul at one with God and the neighbour, are by their
very nature universalopen to all who wish to receive.
Outward forms are always in harmonious correspondence
with inward realities; therefore the material types of
highest
truths defy man's efforts to monopolize. Who can bottle
up the sunlight, to sell at retail? or issue dividends of the
ocean and the breeze?
This great fire, like all calamities, public or private, has
its bright side. A portion of New-York, and that not a
small one, is for once thoroughly cleaned; a wide space is
opened for our vision, and the free passage of the air.
True, it looks desolate enough now; like a battle-field, when
waving banners and rushing steeds, and fife and trumpet
all are gone; and the dead alone remain. But the dreary
sight ever brings up images of those hundred volcanoes
spouting
flame, and of the scene at midnight, so fearful in its
beauty. Where houses so lately stood, and welcome feet
passed over the threshhold, and friendly voices cheered the
fireside, there arose the lurid gleam of mouldering fires, with
rolling masses of smoke, as if watched by giants from the
nether world; and between them all lay the thick darkness.
It was strikingly like Martin's pictures. The resemblance
renewed my old impression, that if the arts are cultivated
in the infernal regions, of such are their galleries formed;
not without a startling beauty, which impresses, while it
disturbs the mind, because it embodies the idea of Power,
and its discords bear harmonious relation to each other.
If you wanted to see the real, unqualified beauty of fire,
you should have stood with me, in the darkness of evening,
to gaze at a burning house nearly opposite. Four long
hours it sent forth flame in every variety. Now it poured
forth from the windows, like a broad banner on the wind;
then it wound round the door-posts like a brilliant wreath;
and from the open roof there ever went up a fountain of
sparks, that fell like a shower of gems. I watched it for
hours, and could not turn away from it. In my mind there
insensibly grew up a respect for that house; because it
defied
the power of the elements, so bravely and so long. It
must have been built of sound timber, well-jointed; and as
the houses round it had fallen, its conflagration was not
hastened by excessive heat, as the others had been. It was
one o'clock at night when the last tongue of flame flickered
and died reluctantly. The next day, men came by order
of the city authorities, to pull down the walls. This, too,
the brave building resisted to the utmost. Ropes were
fastened to it with grappling irons, and a hundred men
tugged
,
and tugged at it, in vain. My respect for it increased,
till it seemed to me like an heroic friend. I could not bear
that it should fall. It seemed to me, if it did, I should no
longer feel sure that J. Q. Adams and Giddings would stand
on their feet against Southern aggression. I sent up a
joyous
shout when the irons came out, bringing away only
a few bricks, and the men fell backward from the force of
the shock. But at last the walls reeled, and came down
with a thundering crash. Nevertheless, I will trust Adams
and Giddings, tug at them as they may.
By the blessing of heaven on the energy and presence of
mind of those who came to our help, our walls stand
unscathed
,
and nothing was destroyed in the tumult; but our
hearts are aching; for all round us comes a voice of
wailing
from the houseless and the impoverished.
LETTER XVII.
April 14, 1842.
In looking over some of my letters, my spirit stands
reproved
for its sadness. In this working-day world, where
the bravest have need of all their buoyancy and strength, it
is sinful to add our sorrows to the common load. Blessed
are the missionaries of cheerfulness!
Tis glorious to have one's own proud will,
And see the crown acknowledged, that we earn;
But nobler yet, and nearer to the skies,
To feel one's self, in hours serene and still,
One of the spirits chosen by Heaven to turn
The
sunny
side of things to human eyes.
The fault was in my own spirit rather than in the streets
of New-York. Who
has
no inward beauty, none
perceives
,
though all around is beautiful. Had my soul been
at one with Nature and with God, I should not have seen
only
misery and vice in my city rambles. To-day, I have
been
so
happy in Broadway! A multitude of doves went
careering before me. Now wheeling in graceful circles,
their white wings and breasts glittering in the sunshine;
now descending within the shadow of the houses, like a
cloud; now soaring high up in the sky, till they seemed
immense flocks of dusky butterflies; and ever as I walked
they went before me, with most loving companionship.
If they had anything to say to me, I surely understood
their language, though I heard it not; for through my
whole frame there went a feathery buoyancy, a joyous
uprising
from the earth, as if I too had wings, with
conscious
power to use them. Then they brought such sweet
images to my mind! I remembered the story of the pirate
hardened in blood and crime, who listened to the notes of
a turtle-dove in the stillness of evening. Perhaps he had
never before heard the soothing tones of love. They spoke
to his inmost soul, like the voice of an angel; and
wakened
such response there, that he thenceforth became a holy
man. Then I thought how I would like to have this the
mission of
my
spirit; to speak to hardened and suffering
hearts, in the tones of a turtle-dove.
My flying companions brought before me another picture
which has had a place in the halls of memory for several
years. I was once visiting a friend in prison for debt;
and through the grated window, I could see the outside of
the criminals' apartments. On the stone ledges, beneath
5*
their windows, alighted three or four doves; and hard
hands were thrust out between the iron bars, to sprinkle
crumbs for them. The sight brought tears to my eyes.
Hearts that still loved to feed doves certainly must contain
somewhat that might be reached by the voice of kindness.
I had not then reasoned on the subject; but I felt, even
then, that prisons were not such spiritual hospitals as ought
to be provided for erring brothers. The birds themselves
were not of snowy plumage; their little, rose-coloured feet
were spattered with mud, and their feathers were soiled,
as if they, too, were jail birds. The outward influences of
a city had passed over them, as the inward had over those who
fed them; nevertheless, they are doves, said I, and have
all a dove's instincts. It was a significant lesson, and I
laid it to my heart.
But these Broadway doves, ever wheeling before me in
graceful eddies, why did their arial frolic produce such
joyous elasticity in my physical frame? Was it sympathy
with nature, so intimate that her motions became my own?
Or was it a revealing that the spiritual body had wings,
wherewith I should hereafter fly?
The pleasant, buoyant sensation recalled to my mind a
dream which I read, many years ago, in Doddridge's Life
and Correspondence. I will not vouch for it, that my copy
is a likeness of the original. If anything is added, I know
not where I obtained it, unless Doddridge himself has since
told me. I surely have no
intention
to add of my own. I
do not profess to give anything like the language; for the
words have passed from my memory utterly. As I
remember
the dream, it was thus:
Dr. Doddridge had been spending the evening with his
friend, Dr. Watts. Their conversation had been
concerning
the future existence of the soul. Long and earnestly
they pursued the theme; and both came to the conclusion,
(rather a remarkable one for theologians of that day to
arrive
at) that it could not be they were to sing through all
eternity; that each soul must necessarily be an individual,
and have its appropriate employment for thought and
affection
.
As Doddridge walked home, his mind brooded over
these ideas, and took little cognizance of outward matters.
In this state he laid his head upon the pillow and fell asleep.
He dreamed that he was dying; he saw his weeping friends
round his bedside, and wanted to speak to them, but could
not. Presently there came a nightmare sensation. His
soul was about to leave the body; but how would it get
out? More and more anxiously rose the query, how could
it get out? This uneasy state passed away; and he found
that the soul
had
left his body. He himself stood beside the
bed, looking at his own corpse, as if it were an old garment,
laid aside as useless. His friends wept round the mortal
covering, but could not see him.
While he was reflecting upon this, he passed out of the
room, he knew not how; but presently he found himself
floating over London, as if pillowed on a cloud borne by
gentle breezes. Far below him, the busy multitude were
hurrying hither and thither, like rats and mice scampering
for crumbs. Ah, thought the emancipated spirit, how
worse than foolish appears this feverish scramble. For
what do they toil? and what do they obtain?
London passed away beneath him, and he found himself
floating over green fields and blooming gardens. How is
it that I am borne through the air? thought he. He
looked
,
and saw a large purple wing; and then he knew that
he was carried by an angel. Whither are we going?
said he. To Heaven, was the reply. He asked no
more questions; but remained in delicious quietude, as if
they floated on a strain of music. At length they paused
before a white marble temple, of exquisite beauty. The
angel lowered his flight, and gently placed him on the steps.
I thought you were taking me to Heaven, said the spirit.
This is Heaven, replied the angel. This! Assuredly
this temple is of rare beauty; but I could imagine just such
built on earth. Nevertheless, it is Heaven, replied the
angel.
They entered a room just within the temple. A table
stood in the centre, on which was a golden vase, filled with
sparkling wine. Drink of this, said the angel, offering
the vase; for all who would know spiritual things, must
first drink of spiritual wine. Scarcely had the ruby liquid
wet his lips, when the Saviour of men stood before him,
smiling most benignly. The spirit instantly dropped on
his knees, and bowed down his head before Him. The
holy hands of the Purest were folded over him in blessing;
and his voice said, You will see me seldom now;
hereafter
,
you will see me more frequently. In the meantime,
observe well the wonders of this temple!
The sounds ceased. The spirit remained awhile in
stillness. When he raised his head, the Saviour no longer
appeared. He turned to ask the angel what this could
mean; but the angel had departed also. The soul stood
alone, in its own unveiled presence! Why did the Holy
One tell me to observe well the wonders of this temple?
thought he. He looked slowly round. A sudden start of
joy and wonder!
There, painted on the walls, in most
marvellous
beauty, stood recorded the whole of his spiritual life!
Every doubt, and every clear perception, every conflict and
every victory, were there before him! and though forgotten
for years, he knew them at a glance. Even thus had a
sunbeam pierced the darkest cloud, and thrown a rainbow
bridge from the finite to the infinite; thus had he slept
peacefully in green valleys, by the side of running brooks;
and such had been his visions from the mountain tops. He
knew them all. They had been always painted within the
chambers of his soul; but now, for the first time, was the
veil removed.
To those who
think
on spiritual things, this remarkable
dream is too deeply and beautifully significant ever to be
forgotten.
We shape
ourselves
the joy or fear
Of which the coming life is made,
And fill our Future's atmosphere
With sunshine or with shade.
Still shall the soul around it call
The shadows which it gathered here,
And painted on the eternal wall
The Past shall reappear.
I do not mean that the
paintings,
and
statues,
and
houses,
which a man has made on earth, will form his environment
in the world of souls; this would monopolize Heaven for
the wealthy and the cultivated. I mean that the
spiritual
combats and victories of our pilgrimage, write themselves
there above, in infinite variations of form, colour, and tone;
and thus shall every word and thought be brought unto
judgment
.
Of these things inscribed in Heaven, who can tell
what may be the action upon souls newly born into time?
Perhaps all lovely forms of Art are mere ultimates of
spiritual
victories in individual souls. It may be that all
genius
derives its life from some
holiness,
which preceded it, in
the attainment of another spirit. Who shall venture to
assert that Beethoven
could
have produced his strangely
powerful music, had not souls gone before him on earth,
who with infinite struggling against temptation, aspired
toward
the Highest, and in some degree realized their
aspiration
?
The music thus brought from the eternal world
kindles still higher spiritual aspirations in mortals, to be
realized in this life, and again written above, to inspire
anew some gifted spirit, who stands a ready recipient
in the far-off time. Upon this ladder, how beautifully the
angels are seen ascending and descending!
LETTER XVIII.
May 26, 1842.
The Battery is growing charming again, now that Nature
has laid aside her pearls, and put on her emeralds. The
worst of it is, crowds are flocking there morning and
evening
;
yet I am ashamed of that anti-social sentiment. It
does my heart good to see the throng of children trundling
their hoops and rolling on the grass; some, with tattered
garments and dirty hands, come up from narrow lanes and
stifled courts, and others with pale faces and weak limbs,
the sickly occupants of heated drawing-rooms. But while
I rejoice for their sakes, I cannot overcome my aversion to
a multitude. It is so pleasant to run and jump, and throw
pebbles, and make up faces at a friend, without having a
platoon of well-dressed people turn round and stare, and
ask, Who
is
that strange woman, that acts so like a child?
Those who are truly enamoured of Nature, love to be alone
with her. It is with them as with other lovers; the
intrusion
of strangers puts to flight a thousand sweet fancies, as
fairies are said to scamper at the approach of a mortal
footstep.
I rarely see the Battery, without thinking how beautiful
it must have been before the white man looked upon it;
when the tall, solemn forest came down to the water's edge,
and bathed in the moonlight stillness. The solitary Indian
came out from the dense shadows, and stood in the glorious
brightness. As he leaned thoughtfully on his bow, his
crest of eagles' feathers waved slowly in the gentle evening
breeze; and voices from the world of spirits spoke into his
heart, and stirred it with a troubled reverence, which he
felt, but could not comprehend. To us, likewise, they are
ever speaking through many-voiced Nature; the soul, in
its quiet hour, listens intently to the friendly entreaty, and
strives to guess its meaning. All round us, on hill and dale,
the surging ocean and the evening cloud, they have spread
open the illuminated copy of their scripturesrevealing all
things, if we could but learn the language!
The Indian did not
think
this; but he
felt
it, even as I
do. What have we gained by civilization? It is a circling
question, the beginning and end of which everywhere touch
each other. One thing is certain; they who pass through
the ordeal of high civilization, with garments unspotted by
the crowd, will make far higher and holier angels; will love
more, and know more, than they who went to their Father's
house through the lonely forest-path. But looking at it
only in relation to this earth, there is much to be said in
favour of that wild life of savage freedom, as well as much
against it. It would be so pleasant to get rid of that
nightmare
of civilized lifeWhat will Mrs. Smith say? and
Do you suppose folks will think strange? It is true that
phantom troubles
me
but little; having snapped my fingers
in its face years ago, it mainly vexes me by keeping me
for ever from a full insight into the souls of others.
Should I have learned more of the spirit's life, could I
have wandered at midnight with Pocahontas, on this fair
island of Manhattan? I should have, at least, learned
all;
the soul of Nature's child might have lisped, and
stammered
in broken sentences, but it would not have muttered
through a mask.
The very name of this island brings me back to
civilization
,
by a most unpleasant path. It was in the autumn of
1609 that the celebrated Hudson first entered the
magnificent
river that now bears his name, in his adventurous
yacht, The Half Moon. The simple Indians were
attracted
by the red garments and bright buttons of the strangers;
and as usual, their new friendship was soon sealed with the
accursed fire-water. On the island where the city now
stands, they had a great carouse; and the Indians, in
commemoration
thereof, named it Manahachtanienks,
abbreviated
,
by rapid speech, to Manhattan. The meaning of it
is,
The Place where all got Drunk Together
. As I walk
through the crowded streets, I am sometimes inclined to
think the name is by no means misapplied at the present day.
New-York is beautiful now, with its broad rivers glancing
in the sunbeams, its numerous islands, like fairy homes, and
verdant headlands jutting out in graceful curves into its
spacious harbour, where float the vessels of a hundred
nations
.
But oh, how beautiful it must have been, when the
thick forest hung all round Hudson's lonely bark! When
the wild deer bounded through paths where swine now
grunt and grovel!
That
chapter of the world's history was
left unrecorded here below; but historians above have it
on their tablets; for it wrote itself there in daguerreotype.
Of times far less ancient, the vestiges are passing away;
recalled sometimes by names bringing the most
contradictory
associations. Maiden-lane is now one of the busiest
of commercial streets; the sky shut out with bricks and
mortar; gutters on either side, black as the ancients
imagined
the rivers of hell; thronged with sailors and draymen;
and redolent of all wharf-like smells. Its name, significant
of innocence and youthful beauty, was given in the olden
time, when a clear, sparkling rivulet here flowed from an
abundant spring, and the young Dutch girls went and came
with baskets on their heads, to wash and bleach linen in
the flowing stream, and on the verdant grass.
Greenwich-street, which now rears its huge masses of
brick, and shows only a long vista of dirt and paving-stones,
was once a beautiful beach, where boys and horses went
in to bathe. In the middle of what is now the street, was
a large rock, on which was built a rude summer-house,
from which the merry bathers loved to jump, with splash
and ringing shouts of laughter.
I know not from what Pearl-street derives its name; but,
in more snesen than one, it is now obviously a pearl cast
before swine.
The Bowery, with name so flowery, where the discord
of a thousand wheels is overtooped by shrill street-cries,
was a line of orchards and mowing-land, in rear of the olden
city, called in Dutch, the Bouwerys, or Farms; and in
populat phrase, The High Road to Boston. In 1631,
old Governor Stuyvesant bought the Bouwerys, (now so
immensely vauable, in the market sense,) for 6,400 guilders,
or 1,066; houses, barn, six cows, two horses, and two
young negro slaves, were included with the land. He built
a Reformed Dutch church at his own expense, on his farm,
within the walls of which was the family vault. The
church of St. Mark now occupies the same site, and on the
outside wall stands his original grave stone, thus inscribed:
In this vault lies buried Petrus Stuyvesant, late Captain
General and Commander-in-Chief of Amsterdam in
New-Netherland
,
now called New-York, and the Dutch West
India Islands. Died August, A. D. 1682, aged 80 years.
A pear tree stand without the wall, still vigorous, though
brought from Holland and planted there by the governor
himself. His family, still among the wealthiest of our city
aristocracy, have preserved some curious memorials of their
venerable Dutch ancestor. A prtrait in armour, well
executed
in Holland, probably while he was admiral there,
represents him as a dark complexioned man, with strong,
bold features, and mustaches on the upper lip. They
likewise preserve the shirt in which he was christened; of
the finest Holland linen, edged with narrow lace.
Near the Battery is an inclosure, called the Bowling
Green, where once stood a leaden statue of George II.;
an appropriate metal for the heavy house of Hanover.
During the revolution, the poor king was pulled down and
dragged irreverently through the streets, to be melted into
bullets for the war. He would have deemed this worse
than being
Turned to clay,
To stop a hole to keep the wind away.
However, the purpose to which his image was applied,
would probably have been less abhorent to him, than it
would be to the apostles to know the uses to which
they
are
applied by modern Christians.
The
antiquities
of New-York! In this new and
ever-changing
country, what ridiculous associations are aroused
by that word! For us, tradition has no desolate arches,
no dim and cloistered aisles. People change their abodes
so often, that, as Washington Irving wittily suggests, the
very ghosts, if they are disposed to keep up an ancient
custom
,
don't know where to call upon them.
This newness, combined with all surrounding social
influences
,
tends to make us an irreverential people. It was
the frequent remark of Mr. Combe, that of all nations,
whose heads he had ever had an opportunity to observe,
the Americans had the organ of veneration the least
developed
.
No wonder that it is so. Instead of moss-grown
ruins, we have trim brick houses; instead of cathedrals,
with their dim, religious light, we have new
meeting-houses
,
built on speculation, with four-and-twenty windows
on each side, and at both ends, for the full enjoyment of
cross-lights; instead of the dark and echoing recesses of
the cloister, we have ready-made coffins in the
shop-windows
;
instead of the rainbow halo of poetic philosophy,
we have Franklin's maxims for Poor Richard; and in
lieu of kings divinely ordained, or governments
heaven-descended
,
we have administrations turned in and out of office
at every whirl of the ballot-box.
This democratic experiment will prove a failure, said
an old-fashioned federalist; before fifty years are ended,
we shall be governed by a king in this country. And
where will you get the blood? inquired an Irishman, with
earnest simplicity; sure you will have to send over the
water to get some of the blood. Whereupon, irreverent
listeners laughed outright, and asked wherein a king's blood
differed from that of an Irish ditch-digger. The poor fellow
was puzzled. Could he have comprehended the question,
I would have asked, And if we could import the kingly
blood, how could we import the sentiment of loyalty?
The social world, as well as the world of matter, must
have its centrifugal as well as centripetal force; and we
Americans must perform that office; an honourable and
useful one it is, yet not the most beautiful, nor in all
respects
the most desirable. Reverence is the highest
quality
of man's nature; and that individual, or nation, which
has it slightly developed, is so far unfortunate. It is a
strong spiritual instinct, and seeks to form channels for
itself where none exists; thus Americans, in the dearth of
other objects to worship, fall to worshipping themselves.
Now don't laugh, if you can help it, at what I bring forth
as
antiquities
. Just keep the Parthenon, the Alhambra, and
the ruins of Melrose out of your head, if you please; and
pay due respect to my
American
antiquities. At the corner
of Bayard and Bowery, you will see a hotel, called the
North American; and on the top thereof you may spy a
wooden image of a lad with ragged knees and elbows,
whose mother doesn't know they're out. That image
commemorates
the history of a Yankee boy, by the name of
David Reynolds. Some fifty years ago, he came here at
the age of twelve or fourteen, without a copper in his
pocket
.
I think he had run away; at all events, he was alone
and friendless. Weary and hungry, he leaned against a
tree, where the hotel now stands; every eye looked strange
upon him, and he felt utterly forlorn and disheartened.
While he was trying to devise some honest means to obtain
food, a gentleman inquired for a boy to carry his trunk to
the wharf; and the Yankee eagerly offered his services.
For this job he received twenty-five cents; most of which
he spent in purchasing fruit to sell again. He stationed
himself by the friendly tree, where he had first obtained
employment, and soon disposed of his little stock to
advantage
.
With increased capital he increased his stock. He
must have managed his business with Yankee shrewdness,
or perhaps he was a cross of Scotch and Yankee; for he
soon established a respectable fruit stall under the tree; and
then he bought a small shop, that stood within its shade;
and then he purchased a lot of land, including several
buildings
round; and finally he pulled down the old shop, and
the old houses, and built the large hotel which now stands
there. The old tree seemed to him like home. There he
had met with his first good luck in a strange city; and from
day to day, and month to month, those friendly boughs had
still looked down upon his rising fortune. He would not
desert that which had stood by him in the dreary days of
poverty and trial. It must be removed, to make room for
the big mansion; but it should not be destroyed. From its
beloved trunk he caused his image to be carved, as a
memento
of his own forlorn beginnings, and his grateful
recollections
.
That it might tell a truthful tale, and remind
him of early struggles, the rich citizen of New-York caused
it to be carved, with ragged trowsers, and jacket out at
elbows
.
There is a curious relic of bygone days over the door of
a public house in Hudson street, between Hamersley street
and Greenwich Bank, of which few guess the origin. It
is the sign of a fish, with a ring in its mouth. Tradition
says, that in the year 1743, a young nobleman, disguised
as a sailor, won the heart of a beautiful village maiden, on
the western coast of England. It is the old story of
woman's
fondness, and woman's faith. She trusted him, and
he deceived her. At their parting, they exchanged rings
of betrothal. Time passed on, and she heard no more from
him; till at last there came the insulting offer of money, as
a remuneration for her ruined happiness, and support for
herself and child. Some time after, she learned, to her
great surprise, that he was a nobleman of high rank, in the
royal navy, and that his ship was lying near the coast.
She sought his vessel, and conjured him by all
recollections
of her confiding love, and of his own earnest
protestations
,
to do her justice. At first, he was moved; but her
pertinacity vexed him, until he treated her with angry scorn,
for presuming to think she could ever become his wife.
God forgive you, said the weeping beauty; let us
exchange our rings again; give me back the one I gave
you. It was my mother's; and I could not have parted
with it to any but my betrothed husband. There is your
money; not a penny of it will I ever use; it cannot restore
my good name, or heal my broken heart. I will labour to
support your child. In a sudden fit of anger, he threw
the ring into the sea, saying, When you can recover that
bauble from the fishes, you may expect to be the wife of a
British nobleman. I give you my word of honour to marry
you then, and not till then.
Sadly and wearily the maiden walked home with her
poor old father. On their way, the old man bought a fish
that was offered him, just taken from the sea. When the
fish was prepared for supper that night, lo! the ring was
found in its stomach!
When informed of this fact, the young nobleman was so
strongly impressed with the idea that it was a direct
interposition
of Providence, that he did not venture to break the
promise he had given. He married the village belle, and
they lived long and happily together. When he died, an
obelisk was erected to his memory, surmounted by the
effigy
of a fish with a ring in its mouth. Such a story was of
course sung and told by wandering beggars and travelling
merchants, until it became universal tradition. Some old
emigrant brought it over to this country; and there in
Hudson
street hang the Fish and the Ring, to commemorate the
loves of a past century.
Now laugh if you will; I think I have made out quite
a respectable collection of American antiquities. If I seem
to you at times to look back too lovingly on the Past, do
not understand me as quarrelling with the Present.
Sometimes
,
it is true, I am tempted to say of the Nineteenth
Century, as the exile from New Zealand did of the huge
scramble in London streets, Me no like London. Shove
me about.
Often, too, I am disgusted to see men trying to pull down
the false, not for love of the true, but for their own selfish
purposes. But notwithstanding these drawbacks, I
gratefully
acknowledge my own age and country as
pre-eminently
marked by activity and progress. Brave spirits are
everywhere
at work for freedom, peace, temperance, and
education
.
Everywhere the walls of caste and sect are
melting
before them; everywhere dawns the golden twilight of
universal love! Many are working for all these things,
who have the dimmest insight into the infinity of their
relations
,
and the eternity of their results; some, perchance,
could they perceive the relation that each bears to all, would
eagerly strive to undo what they are now doing; but
luckily
,
heart and hand often work for better things than the head
wots of.
LETTER XIX.
June 2, 1842.
You seem very curious to learn what I think of recent
phenomena in animal magnetism, or mesmerism, which
you have described to me. They have probably impressed
your mind more than my own; because I was ten years
ago convinced that animal magnetism was destined to
produce
great changes in the science of medicine, and in the
whole philosophy of spirit and matter. The reports of
French physicians, guarded as they were on every side by
the scepticism that characterizes their profession and their
country, contained amply enough to convince me that
animal
magnetism was not a nine-days' wonder. That there
has been a great deal of trickery, collusion and imposture,
in connection with this subject, is obvious enough. Its very
nature renders it peculiarly liable to this; whatsoever
relates
to spiritual existence cannot be explained by the laws
of matter, and therefore becomes at once a powerful
temptation to deception. For this reason, I have taken
too little interest in public exhibitions of animal magnetism
ever to attend one; I should always observe them with
distrust.
But it appears to me that nothing can be more
unphilosophic
than the ridicule attached to a belief in mesmerism.
Phenomena of the most extraordinary character have
occurred
,
proved by a cloud of witnesses. If these things
have really happened, (as thousands of intelligent and
rational
people testify,) they are governed by laws as fixed
and certain as the laws that govern matter. We call them
miracles, simply because we do not understand the causes
that produce them; and what
do
we fully understand?
Our knowledge is exceedingly imperfect, even with regard
to the laws of matter; though the world has had the
experience
of several thousand years to help its
investigations
.
We cannot see that the majestic oak lies folded up
in the acorn; still less can we tell how it came there. We
have observed that a piece of wood decays in the damp
ground, while a nut generates and becomes a tree; and we
say it is because there is a principle of vitality in the nut,
which is not in the wood; but explain, if you can, what
is
a principle of vitality? and how
came
it in the acorn?
They, who reject the supernatural, claim to be the only
philosophers, in these days, when, as Peter Parley says,
every little child knows all about the rainbow.
Satisfied
with the tangible inclosures of their own penfold, these
are not aware that whosoever
did
know
all
about the
rainbow
,
would know enough to make a world. Supernatural
simply means
above
the natural. Between the laws that
govern the higher and the lower, there is doubtless the
most perfect harmony; and this we should perceive and
understand, if we had the enlarged faculties of angels.
There is something exceedingly arrogant and
shortsighted
in the pretensions of those who ridicule everything
not capable of being proved to the senses. They are like
a man who holds a penny close to his eye, and then denies
that there is a glorious firmament of stars, because
he
cannot
see them. Carlyle gives the following sharp rebuke to
this annoying class of thinkers:Thou wilt have no
mystery
and mysticism? Wilt walk through the world by the
sunshine of what thou callest logic? Thou wilt
explain
all
account
for all, or believe nothing of it? Nay, thou
wilt even attempt laughter?
Whoso recognises the unfathomable, all-pervading
domain
of mystery, which is everywhere under our feet and
among our hands; to whom the universe is an
oracle
and a
temple,
as well as
kitchen
and
cattle-stall
he shall be called
a mystic, and delirious? To him thou, with sniffing
charity
,
wilt protrusively proffer thy hand-lamp, and shriek, as
one injured, when he kicks his foot through it? Wert thou
not
born?
Wilt thou not
die?
Explain me all
this
or
do one of two things: retire into private places with thy
foolish cackle; or, what were better, give it up; and weep
not that the reign of wonder is done, and God's world all
disembellished and prosaic, but that thou thyself art hitherto
a sand-blind pedant.
But if there be any truth in the wonders of animal
magnetism
,
why has not the world heard of them before? asks
the inquirer. The world
did
hear of them, centuries ago;
and from time to time they have re-appeared, and arrested
local and temporary attention; but not being understood,
and not being conveyed to the human mind through the
medium of religious belief, they were soon rejected as
fabulous
stories, or idle superstitions; no one thought of
examining
them, as phenomena governed by laws which
regulate the universe.
It is recorded that when the plague raged in Athens, in
the days of Plato, many recovered from it with a total
oblivion
of all
outward
things; they seemed to themselves to
be living among other scenes, which were as real to them,
as the material world was to others. The wisdom of
angels
,
perchance, perceived it to be far
more
real.
Ancient history records that a learned Persian Magus
who resided among the mountains that overlooked Taoces,
recovered from the plague with a perpetual oblivion of all
outward forms, while he often had knowledge of the
thoughts passing in the minds of those around him. If an
unknown scroll were placed before him, he would read it,
though a brazen shield were interposed between him and
the parchment; and if figures were drawn on the water,
he at once recognised the forms, of which no visible trace
remained.
6
In Taylor's Plato, mention is made of one Clearchus, who
related an experiment tried in the presence of Aristotle and
his disciples at the Lyceum. He declares that a man, by
means of moving a wand up and down, over the body of a
lad, led the soul out of it, and left the form perfectly
rigid and senseless; when he afterward led the soul back,
it told, with wonderful accuracy, all that had been said and
done.
This reminds me of a singular circumstance which
happened
to a venerable friend of mine. I had it from her
own lips. She was taken suddenly ill one day, and
swooned. To all appearance, she was entirely lifeless;
insomuch that her friends feared she was really dead. A
physician was sent for and a variety of experiments tried,
before there were any symptoms of returning animation.
She herself was merely aware of a dizzy and peculiar
sensation, and then she found herself standing by her own
lifeless body, watching all their efforts to resuscitate it. It
seemed to her strange, and she was too confused to know
whether she were in that body, or out of it. In the
meantime
,
her anxious friends could not make the slightest
impression
on the rigid form, either by sight, hearing, touch,
taste, or smell; it was to all appearance dead. The five
outward gates of entrance to the soul were shut and barred.
Yet when the body revived, she told everything that had
been done in the room, every word that had been said, and
the very expression of their countenances. The soul had
stood by all the while, and observed what was done to the
body. How did it see when the eyes were closed, like a
corpse? Answer that, before you disbelieve a thing because
you cannot understand it. Could I comprehend how the
simplest violet came into existence, I too would urge that
plea. It were as wise for a child of four years old to deny
that the planets move round the sun, because its infant mind
cannot receive the explanation, as for you and me to
ridicule
arcana of the soul's connection with the body, because
we cannot comprehend them, in this imperfect state of
existence. Beings so ignorant, should be more humble
and reverential; this frame of mind has no affinity
whatever
with the greedy superstition that is eager to believe
everything, merely
because
it is wonderful.
It is deemed incredible that people in magnetic sleep can
describe objects at a distance, and scenes which they never
looked upon while waking; yet nobody doubts the common
form of somnambulism, called sleep walking. You may
singe the eye lashes of a sleep walker with a candle, and
he will perceive neither you nor the light. His eyes have
no expression; they are like those of a corpse. Yet he
will walk out in the dense darkness, avoiding chairs, tables
and all other obstructions; he will tread the ridge-pole of a
roof, far more securely than he could in a natural state, at
mid-day; he will harness horses, pack wood, make shoes,
&c. all in the darkness of midnight. Can you tell me with
what
eyes
he sees to do these things? and what
light
directs
him? If you cannot, be humble enough to acknowledge
that God governs the universe by many laws
incomprehensible
to you; and be wise enough to conclude that these
phenomena are not deviations from the divine order of
things, but occasional manifestations of principles always
at work in the great scale of being, made visible at times,
by causes as yet unrevealed.
Allowing very largely for falsehood, trickery,
superstitions
fear, and stimulated imagination, I still believe most
fully that many things now rejected as foolish superstitions,
will hereafter take their appropriate place in a new science
of spiritual philosophy. From the progress of animal
magnetism, there may perhaps be evolved much that will
throw light upon old stories of oracles, witchcraft, and
second-sight. A large portion of these stories are
doubtless
falsehoods, fabricated for the most selfish and
mischievous
purposes; others may be an honest record of
things as they actually seemed to the narrator. Those
which are true, assuredly have a
cause;
and are
miraculous
only as our whole being is miraculous. Is not
life
itself the highest miracle? Everybody can tell you what
it
does,
but where is the wise man who can explain what
it
is? When
did the infant receive that mysterious gift?
Whence
did it come?
Whither
does it go, when it leaves
the body?
Scottish legends abound with instances of second-sight,
oftentimes supported by a formidable array of evidence;
but I have met only one individual who was the subject of
such a story.
She is a woman of plain practical sense, very
unimaginative
,
intelligent, extremely well-informed, and as
truthful
as the sun. I tell the story as she told it to me.
One of her relatives was seized with rapid consumption.
He had for some weeks been perfectly resigned to die;
but one morning, when she called upon him, she found his
eyes brilliant, his cheeks flushed with an unnatural bloom,
and his mind full of belief that he should recover health.
He talked eagerly of voyages he would take, and of the
renovating influence of warmer climes. She listened to
him with sadness; for she was well acquainted with his
treacherous disease, and in all these things she saw
symptoms
of approaching death. She said this to her mother
and sisters, when she returned home. In the afternoon of
the same day, as she sat sewing in the usual family circle,
she accidentally looked upand gave a sudden start, which
immediately attracted attention and inquiry. She replied,
Don't you see cousin?
They thought she had been dreaming; but she said, I
certainly am not asleep. It is strange you do not see him;
he is there. The next thought was that she was seized
with sudden insanity; but she assured them that she never
was more rational in her life: that she could not account
for the circumstance, any more than they could; but her
cousin certainly was there, and looking at her with a very
pleasant countenance. Her mother tried to turn it off as a
delusion; but nevertheless, she was so much impressed by
it, that she looked at her watch, and immediately sent to
inquire how the invalid did. The messenger returned with
news that he was dead, and had died at that moment.
My friend told me that at first she saw only the bust;
but gradually the whole form became visible, as if some
imperceptible cloud, or veil, had slowly rolled away; the
invisible veil again rose, till only the bust remained; and
then that vanished.
She said the vision did not terrify her at the time; it
simply perplexed her, as a thing incomprehensible. Why
she
saw it, she could explain no better than why her
mother and sisters did
not
see it. She simply told it to me
just as it appeared to her; as distinct and real as any other
individual in the room.
Men would not be afraid to see spirits, if they were
better
acquainted with their own. It is because we live so
entirely in the body, that we are startled at a revelation
of the soul.
Animal magnetism will come out from all the shams and
quackery that have made it ridiculous, and will yet be
acacknowledged
as an important aid to science, an additional
proof of immortality, and a means, in the hands of Divine
Providence, to arrest the progress of materialism.
For myself, I am deeply thankful for
any
agency, that
even momentarily blows aside the thick veil between the
Finite and the Infinite, and gives me never so hurried and
imperfect a glimpse of realities which lie beyond this
valley
of shadows.
LETTER XX.
June 9, 1842.
There is nothing which makes me feel the imprisonment
of a city, like the absence of birds. Blessings on the little
warblers! Lovely types are they of all winged and
graceful
thoughts. Dr. Follen used to say, I feel dependent for
a vigorous and hopeful spirit on now and then a kind word,
the loud laugh of a child, or the silent greeting of a flower.
Fully do I sympathize with this utterance of his gentle, and
loving spirit; but more than the benediction of the flower,
more perhaps than even the mirth of childhood, is the clear,
joyous note of the bird, a refreshment to my soul.
The birds! the birds of summer hours
They bring a gush of glee,
To the child among the fragrant flowers,
To the sailor on the sea.
We hear their thrilling voices
In their swift and airy flight,
And the inmost heart rejoices
With a calm and pure delight.
Amid the morning's fragrant dew,
Amidst the mists of even,
They warble on, as if they drew
Their music down from Heaven.
And when their holy anthems
Come pealing through the air,
Our hearts leap forth to meet them,
With a blessing and a prayer.
But alas! like the free voices of fresh youth, they come not
on the city air. Thus should it be; where mammon
imprisons
all thoughts and feelings that would fly upward,
their winged types should be in cages too. Walk down
Mulberry street, and you may see, in one small room,
hundreds
of little feathered songsters, each hopping about
restlessly
in his gilded and garlanded cage, like a dyspeptic
merchant in his marble mansion. I always turn my head
away when I pass; for the sight of the little captives goes
through my heart like an arrow. The darling little
creatures
have such visible delight in freedom;
In the joyous song they sing;
In the liquid air they cleave;
In the sunshine; in the shower;
In the nests they weave.
I seldom see a bird encaged, without being reminded of
Petion, a truly great man, the popular idol of Haiti, as
Washington is of the United States.
While Petion administered the government of the island,
some distinguished foreigner sent his little daughter a
beautiful
bird, in a very handsome cage. The child was
delighted, and with great exultation exhibited the present
to her father. It is indeed very beautiful, my daughter,
said he; but it makes my heart ache to look at it. I hope
you will never show it to me again.
With great astonishment, she inquired his reasons. He
replied, When this island was called St. Domingo, we
were all slaves. It makes me think of it to look at that
bird; for
he
is a slave.
The little girl's eyes filled with tears, and her lips
quivered
,
as she exclaimed, Why, father! he has such a
large, handsome cage; and as much as ever he can eat
and drink.
And would
you
be a slave, said he, if you could live
in a great house, and be fed on frosted cake?
After a moment's thought, the child began to say, half
reluctantly, Would he be happier, if I opened the door of
his cage? He would be
free!
was the emphatic
reply
.
Without another word, she took the cage to the open
window, and a moment after, she saw her prisoner playing
with the humming-birds among the honey-suckles.
One of the most remarkable cases of instinctive
knowledge
in birds was often related by my grandfather, who
witnessed the fact with his own eyes. He was attracted
to the door, one summer day, by a troubled twittering,
indicating
distress and terror. A bird, who had built her
nest in a tree near the door, was flying back and forth with
the utmost speed, uttering wailing cries as she went. He
was at first at a loss to account for her strange movements;
but they were soon explained by the sight of a snake slowly
winding up the tree.
Animal magnetism was then unheard of; and whosoever
had dared to mention it, would doubtless have been hung
on Witch's Hill, without benefit of clergy. Nevertheless,
marvellous and altogether unaccountable stories had been
told of the snake's power to charm birds. The popular
belief
was that the serpent charmed the bird by
looking
steadily
at it; and that such a sympathy was thereby established,
that if the snake were struck, the bird felt the blow, and
writhed under it
.
These traditions excited my grandfather's curiosity to
watch the progress of things; but, being a humane man,
he resolved to kill the snake before he had a chance to
despoil
the nest. The distressed mother meanwhile continued
her rapid movements and troubled cries; and he soon
discovered
that she went and came continually, with
something
in her bill, from one particular treea white ash.
The snake wound his way up; but the instant his head
came near the nest, his folds relaxed, and he fell to the
ground rigid, and apparently lifeless. My grandfather made
sure of his death by cutting off his head, and then mounted
the tree to examine into the mystery. The sung little nest
was filled with eggs, and covered with leaves of the white
ash!
That little bird knew, if my readers do not, that contact
with the white ash is deadly to a snake. This is no idle
superstition, but a veritable fact in natural history. The
Indians are aware of it, and twist garlands of white ash
leaves about their ankles, as a protection against rattlesnakes.
Slaves often take the same precaution when they travel
through swamps and forests, guided by the north star; or
to the cabin of some poor white man, who teaches them to
read and write by the light of pine splinters, and receives
his pay in massa's corn or tobacco.
I have never heard any explanation of the effect
produced
by the white ash; but I know that settlers in the
wilderness
like to have these trees round their log houses,
being convinced that no snake will voluntarily come near
them. When touched with the boughs, they are said to
grow suddenly rigid, with strong convulsions; after a while
they slowly recover, but seem sickly for some time.
The following well authenticated anecdote has something
wonderfully human about it:
A parrot had been caught young, and trained by a
Spanish
lady, who sold it to an English sea-captain. For a
time the bird seemed sad among the fogs of England, where
birds and men all spoke to her in a foreign tongue. By
degrees, however, she learned the language, forgot her
Spanish
phrases, and seemed to feel at home. Years passed on,
and found Pretty Poll the pet of the captain's family. At
last her brilliant feathers began to turn gray with age; she
could take no food but soft pulp, and had not strength
enough to mount her perch. But no one had the heart to
kill the old favourite, she was entwined with so many
pleasant household recollections. She had been some
time in this feeble condition, when a Spanish gentleman
called one day to see her master. It was the first time
6*
she had heard the language for many years. It probably
brought back to memory the scenes of her youth in that
beautiful region of vines and sunshine. She spread forth
her wings with a wild scream of joy, rapidly ran over the
Spanish phrases, which she had not uttered for years, and
fell down dead.
There is something strangely like reason in this. It
makes one want to know whence comes the bird's soul,
and whither goes it.
There are different theories on the subject of instinct.
Some consider it a special revelation to each creature;
others believe it is founded on traditions handed down
among animals, from generation to generation, and is
therefore
a matter of education. My own observation, two years
ago, tends to confirm the latter theory. Two barn-swallows
came into our wood-shed in the spring time. Their busy,
earnest twitterings led me at once to suspect that they were
looking out a building-spot; but as a carpenter's bench was
under the window, and frequent hammering, sawing, and
planing were going on, I had little hope they would choose
a location under our roof. To my surprise, however, they
soon began to build in the crotch of a beam, over the open
door-way. I was delighted, and spent more time watching
them, than penny-wise people would have approved. It
was, in fact, a beautiful little drama of domestic love. The
mother-bird was
so
busy, and
so
important; and her mate
was
so
attentive! Never did any newly-married couple take
more satisfaction with their first nicely-arranged drawer of
baby-clothes, than these did in fashioning their little woven
cradle.
The father-bird scarcely ever left the side of the nest.
There he was, all day long, twittering in tones that were
most obviously the outpourings of love. Sometimes he
would bring in a straw, or a hair, to be inwoven in the
precious little fabric. One day my attention was arrested
l
by a very unusual twittering, and I saw him circling round
with a large downy feather in his bill. He bent over the
unfinished nest, and offered it to his mate with the most
graceful and loving air imaginable; and when she put up
her mouth to take it, he poured forth
such
a gush of
gladsome
sound! It seemed as if pride and affection had
swelled his heart, till it was almost too big for his little
bosom. The whole transaction was the prettiest piece of
fond coquetry, on both sides, that it was ever my good luck
to witness.
It was evident that the father-bird had formed correct
opinions on the woman question; for during the process
of incubation he volunteered to perform his share of
household
duty. Three or four times a day would he, with
coaxing twitterings, persuade his patient mate to fly abroad
for food; and the moment she left the eggs, he would take
the maternal station, and give a loud alarm whenever cat
or dog came about the premises. He certainly performed
the office with far less ease and grace than she did; it was
something in the style of an old bachelor tending a babe;
but nevertheless it showed that his heart was kind, and his
principles correct, concerning division of labour. When
the young ones came forth, he pursued the same equalizing
policy, and brought at least half the food for his greedy little
family.
But when they became old enough to fly, the veriest
misanthrope would have laughed to watch their man
uvres
!
Such chirping and twittering! Such diving down
from the nest, and flying up again! Such wheeling round
in circles, talking to the young ones all the while! Such
clinging to the sides of the shed with their sharp claws, to
show the timid little fledgelings that there was no need of
falling!
For three days all this was carried on with increasing
activity. It was obviously an infant flying school. But
all their talking and fussing was of no avail. The little
downy things looked down, and then looked up, and
alarmed
at the infinity of space, sunk down into the nest again.
At length the parents grew impatient, and summoned their
neighbours. As I was picking up chips one day. I found
my head encircled with a swarm of swallows. They flew
up to the nest, and chaned away to the young ones; they
clung to the walls, looking back to tell how the thing was
done; they dived, and wheeled. and balanced, and floated,
in a manner perfectly beautiful to behold.
The pupils were evidently much excited. They jumped
up on the edge of the nest, and twittered, and shook their
feathers, and waved their wings; and then hopped back
again, saying, It's pretty sport, but we can't do it.
Three times the neighbours came in and repeated their
graceful lessons. The third time, two of the young birds
gave a sudden plunge downward, and then fluttered and
hopped, till they alighted on a small upright log. And oh,
such praises as were warbled by the whole troop! The
air was filled with their joy! Some were flying round,
swift as a ray of light; others were perched on the
hoe-handle
,
and the teeth of the rake; multitudes clung to the
wall, after the fashion of their pretty kind; and two were
swinging, in most graceful style, on a pendant hoop. Never
while memory lasts, shall I forget that swallow party! I
have frolicked with blessed Nature much and often; but this,
above all her gambols, spoke into my inmost heart, like the
glad voices of little children. That beautiful family
continued
to be our playmates, until the falling leaves gave
token of approaching winter. For some time, the little
ones came home regularly to their nest at night. I was
ever on the watch to welcome them, and count that none
were missing. A sculptor might have taken a lesson in
his art, from those little creatures perched so gracefully on
the edge of their clay-built cradle, fast asleep, with heads
hidden under their folded wings. Their familiarity was
wonderful. If I hung my gown on a nail, I found a little
swallow perched on the sleeve. If I took a nap in the
afternoon, my waking eyes were greeted by a swallow on
the bed-post; in the summer twilight, they flew about the
sitting-room in search of flies, and sometimes lighted on
chairs and tables. I almost thought they knew how much
I loved them. But at last they flew away to more genial
skies, with a whole troop of relations and neighbours. It
was a deep pain to me, that I should never know them
from other swallows, and that they would have no
recollection
of me. We had lived so friendly together, that I
wanted to meet them in another world, if I could not in this;
and I wept, as a child weeps at its first grief.
There was somewhat, too, in their beautiful life of loving
freedom which was a reproach to me. Why was not
my
life as happy and as graceful as theirs? Because they
were innocent, confiding, and unconscious, they fulfilled all
the laws of their being without obstruction.
Inward, inward to thy heart,
Kindly Nature, take me;
Lovely, even as thou art,
Full of loving, make me.
Thou knowest nought of dead-cold forms,
Knowest nought of littleness;
Lifeful truth
thy
being warms,
Majesty and earnestness.
The old Greeks observed a beautiful festival, called
The Welcome of the Swallows. When these social
birds first returned in the spring-time, the children went
about in procession, with music and garlands; receiving
presents at every door, where they stopped to sing a
welcome
to the swallows, in that graceful old language, so
melodious even in its ruins, that the listener feels as if the
brilliant azure of Grecian skies, the breezy motion of their
olive groves, and the gush of their silvery fountains, had all
passed into a monument of liquid and harmonious sounds.
LETTER XXI.
June 16, 1842.
If you want refreshment for the eye, and the luxury of
pure breezes, go to Staten Island. This beautiful little
spot, which lies so gracefully on the waters, was sold by
the Indians to the Dutch, in 1657, for ten shirts, thirty pairs
of stockings, ten guns, thirty bars of lead for balls, thirty
pounds of powder, twelve coats, two pieces of duffil, thirty
kettles, thirty hatchets, twenty hoes, and a case of knives
and awls. This was then considered a fair compensation
for a tract eighteen miles long, and seven broad; and
compared
with most of our business transactions with the
Indians
,
it will not appear illiberal. The facilities for fishing,
the abundance of oysters, the pleasantness of the situation,
and old associations, all endeared it to the natives. They
lingered about the island, like reluctant ghosts, until 1670;
when, being urged to depart, they made a new requisition
of four hundred fathoms of wampum, and a large number of
guns and axes; a demand which was very wisely complied
with, for the sake of a final ratification of the treaty.
On this island is a quarantine ground, unrivalled for the
airiness of its situation and the comfort and cleanliness of
its arrangements. Of the foreigners from all nations which
flood our shores, an immense proportion here take their first
footstep on American soil; and judging from the welcome
Nature gives them, they might well believe they had arrived
in Paradise. From the high grounds, three hundred feet
above the level of the sea, may be seen a most beautiful
variety of land and sea, of rural quiet, and city splendor,
Long Island spreads before you her vernal forests, and fields
of golden grain; the North and East rivers sparkle in the
distance; and the magnificent Hudson is seen flowing on
in joyful freedom. The city itself seems clean and bright
in the distanceits deformities hidden, and its beauties
exaggerated, like the fame of far-off heroes. When the sun
shines on its steeples, windows, and roofs of glittering tin,
it is as if the Fire Spirits had suddenly created a city of
fairy palaces. And when the still shadows creep over it, and
the distant lights shine like descended constellations,
twinkling
to the moaning music of the sea, there is something
oppressive in its solemn beauty. Then comes the golden
morning light, as if God suddenly unveiled his glory!
There on the bright waters float a thousand snowy sails,
like a troop of beautiful sea birds; and imagination, strong
in morning freshness, flies off through the outlet to the
distant
sea, and circles all the globe with its wreath of flowers.
Amid these images of joy, reposes the quarantine
burying-ground
;
bringing sad association, like the bass-note in a
music-box. How many who leave their distant homes, full
of golden visions, come here to take their first and last look
of the promised land. What to them are all the fair, broad,
acres of this new world? They need but the narrow
heritage
of a grave. But every soul that goes hence, apart from
friends and kindred, carries with it a whole unrevealed epic
of joy and sorrow, of gentle sympathies and passion's fiery
depths. O, how rich in more than Shakspearean beauty
would be the literature of that quarantine ground, if all the
images that pass in procession before those dying eyes,
would write themselves in daguerreotype!
One of the most interesting places on this island, is the
Sailor's Snug Harbor. A few years ago, a gentleman by
the name of Randall, left a small farm, that rented for two
or three hundred dollars, at the corner of Eleventh-street
and Broadway, for the benefit of old and worn-out sailors.
This property increased in value, until it enabled the
trustees
to purchase a farm on Staten Island, and erect a noble
stone edifice, as a hospital for disabled seamen; with an
annual income of nearly thirty thousand dollars. The
building has a very handsome exterior, and is large, airy,
and convenient. The front door opens into a spacious hall,
at the extremity of which flowers and evergreens are
arranged
one above another, like the terrace of a
conservatory
;
and from the entries above, you look down into this
pretty nook of greenery. The whole aspect of things is
extremely pleasantwith the exception of the sailors
themselves
.
There is a sort of torpid resignation in
countenance
and movement, painful to witness. They reminded
me of what some one said of the Greenwich pensioners:
they seemed to be waiting for death. No outward
comfort
seemed wanting, except the constant prospect of the
sea: but they stood
alone
in the worldno wives, no
children. Connected by no link with the ever-active
Present
,
a monotonous Future stretched before them, made
more dreary by its contrast with the keen excitement and
ever-shifting variety of their Past life of peril and pleasure.
I have always thought too little provision was made for this
lassitude of the mind, in most benevolent institutions. Men
accustomed to excitement, cannot do altogether without it.
It is a necessity of nature, and should be ministered to in
all innocent forms. Those poor old tars should have
sea-songs
and instrumental music, once in a while, to stir their
sluggish blood; and a feast might be given on great
occasions
,
to younger sailors from temperance boarding-houses,
that the Past might have a chance to hear from the
Present
.
We perform but a half charity, when we comfort the
body and leave the soul desolate.
Within the precincts of the city, too, are pleasant and
safe homes provided for sailors; spacious, well-ventilated,
and supplied with libraries and museums.
After all, this nineteenth century, with all its turmoil and
clatter, has some lovely features about it? If evil spreads
with unexampled rapidity, good is abroad, too, with
miraculous
and omnipresent activity. Unless we are struck by
the tail of a comet, or swallowed by the sun meanwhile,
we certainly shall get the world right side up, by and by.
Among the many instrumentalities at work to produce
this, increasing interest in the sailor's welfare is a cheering
omen. Of all classes, except the negro slaves, they have
been the most neglected and the most abused. The book
of judgement can alone reveal how much they have suffered
on the wide, deep ocean, with no door to escape from
tyranny
,
no friendly forest to hide them from the hunter;
doomed, at their best estate, to suffer almost continued
deprivation
of
home,
that worst feature in the curse of Cain;
their minds shut up in caves of ignorance so deep, that if
religion enters with a friendly lamp, it too frequently
terrifies
them with the shadows it makes visible. Religious
they
must
be, in some sense, even when they know it not;
for no man with a human soul within him, can be
unconscious
of the Divine Presence, with infinite space round
him, the blue sky overhead, with its million world-lamps,
and everywhere, beneath and around him,
Great ocean, strangest of creation's sons!
Unconquerable, unreposed, untired!
That rolls the wild, profound, eternal bass
In Nature's anthem, and makes music such
As pleaseth the ear of God.
Thus circumstanced, the sailor cannot be ignorant, without
being superstitious too. The Infinite comes continually
before him, in the sublimest symbols of sight and sound.
He does not know the language, but he feels the tone.
Goethe has told us, in most beautiful allegory, of two
bridges, whereby earnest souls pass from the Finite to the
Infinite. One is a rainbow, which spans the dark river;
and this is Faith; the other is a shadow cast quite over by
the giant Superstition, when he stands between the setting
sun and the unknown shore.
Blessings on all friendly hands that are leading the sailor
to the rainbow bridge. His spirit is made reverential in
the great temple of Nature, resounding with the wild voices
of the winds, and strange music of the storm-organ; too
long has it been left trembling and shivering on the bridge
of shadows. For him, too, the rainbow spans the dark
stream, and becomes at last a bridge of gems.
LETTER XXII.
June 23, 1842.
The highest gifts my soul has received, during its
world-pilgrimage
,
have often been bestowed by those who were
poor, both in money and intellectual cultivation. Among
these donors, I particularly remember a hard-working,
uneducated
mechanic, from Indiana or Illinois. He told me that
he was one of thirty or forty New Englanders, who, twelve
years before, had gone out to settle in the western
wilderness
.
They were mostly neighbours; and had been drawn
to unite together in emigration from a general unity of
opinion
on various subjects. For some years previous, they
had been in the habit of meeting occasionally at each
others' houses, to talk over their duties to God and man, in
all simplicity of heart. Their library was the gospel, their
priesthood the inward light. There were then no
antislavery
societies; but thus taught, and reverently willing to
learn, they had no need of such agency, to discover that it
was wicked to enslave. The efforts of peace societies had
reached this secluded band only in broken echoes, and
nonresistance
societies had no existence. But with the
volume
of the Prince of Peace, and hearts open to his
influence
,
what need had they of preambles and resolutions?
Rich in spiritual culture, this little band started for the far
West. Their inward homes were blooming gardens; they
made their outward in a wilderness. They were
industrious
and frugal, and all things prospered under their hands.
But soon wolves came near the fold, in the shape of
reckless
,
unprincipled adventurers; believers in force and
cunning
,
who acted according to their creed. The colony of
practical Christians spoke of their depredations in terms of
gentlest remonstrance, and repaid them with unvarying
kindness. They went fartherthey openly announced,
You may do us what evil you choose, we will return
nothing
but good. Lawyers came into the neighbourhood, and
offered their services to settle disputes. They answered,
We have no need of you. As neighbours, we receive you
in the most friendly spirit; but for us, your occupation has
ceased to exist. What will you do, if rascals burn your
barns, and steal your harvests? We will return good for
evil. We believe this is the highest truth, and therefore the
best expediency.
When the rascals heard this, they considered it a
marvellous
good joke, and said and did many provoking things,
which to them seemed witty. Bars were taken down in
the night, and cows let into the cornfields. The Christians
repaired the damage as well as they could, put the cows in
the barn, and at twilight drove them gently home, saying,
Neighbour, your cows have been in my field. I have fed
them well during the day, but I would not keep them all
night, lest the children should suffer for their milk.
If this was fun, they who planned the joke found no heart
to laugh at it. By degrees, a visible change came over
these troublesome neighbours. They ceased to cut off
horses' tails, and break the legs of poultry. Rude boys
would say to a younger brother, Don't throw that stone,
Bill! When I killed the chicken last week, didn't they
send it to mother, because they thought chicken-broth would
be good for poor Mary? I should think you'd be ashamed
to throw stones at
their
chickens. Thus was evil
overcome
with good, till not one was found to do them wilful
injury.
Years passed on, and saw them thriving in worldly
substance
,
beyond their neighbours, yet beloved by all. From
them the lawyer and the constable obtained no fees. The
sheriff stammered and apologized, when he took their
hard-earned
goods in payment for the war-tax. They mildly
replied,  'Tis a bad trade, friend. Examine it in the light
of conscience and see if it be not so. But while they
refused
to pay such fees and taxes, they were liberal to a
proverb
in their contributions for all useful and benevolent
purposes
.
At the end of ten years, the public lands, which they
had chosen for their farms, were advertised for sale by
auction
.
According to custom, those who had settled and
cultivated
the soil, were considered to have a right to bid it in
at the government price; which at that time was $1,25
per acre. But the fever of land-speculation then chanced
to run unusually high. Adventurers from all parts of the
country were flocking to the auction; and capitalists in
Baltimore, Philadelphia, New-York, and Boston, were
sending agents to buy up western lands. No one supposed
that custom, or equity, would be regarded. The first day's
sale showed that speculation ran to the verge of insanity.
Land was eagerly bought in, at seventeen, twenty-five, and
thirty dollars an acre. The Christian colony had small
hope of retaining their farms. As first settlers, they had
chosen the best land; and persevering industry had brought
it into the highest cultivation. Its market-value was much
greater than the acres already sold, at exorbitant prices.
In view of these facts, they had prepared their minds for
another remove into the wilderness, perhaps to be again
ejected by a similar process. But the morning their lot
was offered for sale, they observed, with grateful surprise,
that their neighbours were everywhere busy among the
crowd, begging and expostulating: Don't bid on
these
lands! These men have been working hard on them for
ten years. During all that time, they never did harm to
man or brute. They are always ready to do good for evil.
They are a blessing to any neighbourhood. It would be a
sin and a shame to bid on
their
lands. Let them go, at the
government price.
The sale came on; the cultivators of the soil offered
$1,25; intending to bid higher if necessary. But among
all that crowd of selfish, reckless speculators,
not one bid
over them!
Without an opposing voice, the fair acres
returned
to them! I do not know a more remarkable instance
of evil overcome with good. The wisest political economy
lies folded up in the maxims of Christ.
With delighted reverence, I listened to this unlettered
backwoodsman, as he explained his philosophy of
universal
love. What would you do, said I, if an idle,
thieving
vagabond came among you, resolved to stay, but
determined
not to work? We would give him food when
hungry, shelter him when cold, and always treat him as a
brother. Would not this process attract such characters?
How would you avoid being overrun with them? Such
characters would either reform, or not remain with us. We
should never speak an angry word, or refuse to minister to
their necessities; but we should invariably regard them
with the deepest sadness, as we would a guilty, but beloved
son. This is harder for the human soul to bear, than whips
or prisons. They could not stand it; I am sure they could
not. It would either melt them, or drive them away. In
nine cases out of ten, I believe it would melt them.
I felt rebuked for my want of faith, and consequent
shallowness
of insight. That hard-handed labourer brought
greater riches to my soul than an Eastern merchant laden
with pearls. Again I repeat, money is
not
wealth.
LETTER XXIII.
July 7, 1842.
It has been my fortune, in the course of a changing life,
to meet with many strange characters; but I never, till
lately, met with one altogether unaccountable.
Some six or eight years ago, I read a very odd pamphlet,
called The Patriarchal System of Society, as it exists
under the name of Slavery; with its necessity and
advantages
.
By an inhabitant of Florida. The writer assumes
that the patriarchal system constitutes the bond of social
compact; and is better adapted for strength, durability, and
independence, than any state of society hitherto adopted.
The prosperous state of our northern neighbours, says
he, proceeds, in many instances, indirectly from southern
slave labour; though they are not aware of it. This was
written in 1829; read in these days of universal southern
bankruptcy, it seems ludicrous; as if it had been intended
for sarcasm, rather than sober earnest.
But the main object of this singular production is to prove
that
colour
ought not to be the badge of degradation; that
the only distinction should be between
slave
and
free
not
between
white
and
coloured
. That the free people of colour,
instead of being persecuted, and driven from the Southern
States, ought to be made eligible to all offices and means of
wealth. This would form, he thinks, a grand chain of
security
,
by which the interests of the two castes would
become
united, and the slaves be kept in permanent
subordination
.
Intermarriage between the races he strongly
advocates; not only as strengthening the bond of union
between
castes that otherwise naturally war upon each other,
but as a great improvement of the human race. The
intermediate
grades of colour, says he, are not only healthy,
but, when condition is favourable, they are improved in
shape, strength, and beauty. Daily experience shows that
there is no natural antipathy between the castes on account
of colour. It only requires to repeal laws as impolitic as
they are unjust and unnaturallaws which confound
beauty
,
merit, and condition, in one state of infamy and
degradation
on account of complexion. It is only required to
leave nature to find out a safe and wholesome remedy for
evils, which of all others are the most deplorable, because
they are morally irreconcileable with the fundamental
principles
of happiness and self-preservation.
I afterwards heard that Z. Kinsley, the author of this
pamphlet, lived with a coloured wife, and treated her and
her children with kindness and consideration. A traveller,
writing from Florida, stated that he visited a planter, whose
coloured wife sat at the head of the table, surrounded by
healthy and handsome children. That the parlour was full
of portraits of African beauties, to which the gentleman
drew his attention, with much exultation; dwelling with
great earnestness on the superior physical endowments of
the coloured race, and the obvious advantages of
amalgamation
.
I at once conjectured that this eccentric planter was
the author of the pamphlet on the patriarchal system.
Soon after, it was rumoured that Mr. Kinsley had
purchased
a large tract of land of the Haitien government; that
he had carried his slaves there, and given them lots. Then
I heard that it was a colony, established for the advantage
of his own mulatto sons; that the workmen were in a
qualified
kind of slavery, by consent of the government; and
that he still held a large number of slaves in Florida.
Last week, this individual, who had so much excited my
curiosity, was in the city; and I sought an interview. I
found his conversation entertaining, but marked by the same
incongruity, that characterizes his writings and his
practice
.
His head is a peculiar one; it would, I think, prove
as great a puzzle to phrenologists, as he himself is to
moralists
and philosophers.
I told him of the traveller's letter, and asked if he were
the gentleman described.
I never saw the letter; he replied; but from what
you say, I have no doubt that I am the man. I always
thought and said, that the coloured race were superior to us,
physically and morally. They are more healthy, have more
graceful forms, softer skins, and sweeter voices. They are
more docile and affectionate, more faithful in their
attachments
,
and less prone to mischief, than the white race. If
it were not so, they could not have been kept in slavery.
It is a shameful and a shocking thought. said I, that
we should keep them in slavery by reason of their very
virtues
.
It is so, ma'am; but, like many other shameful things,
it is true.
Where did you obtain your portraits of coloured
beauties
?
In various places. Some of them I got on the coast of
Africa. If you want to see beautiful specimens of the
human
race, you should see some of the native women there.
Then you have been on the coast of Africa?
Yes, ma'am; I carried on the slave trade several
years.
You announce that fact very coolly, said I. Do you
you know that, in New England, men look upon a
slave-trader
with as much horror as they do upon a pirate?
Yes; and I am glad of it. They will look upon a
slaveholder just so, by and by. Slave trading was very
respectable business when I was young. The first
merchants
in England and America were engaged in it. Some
people hide things which they think other people don't like.
I never conceal anything.
Where did you become acquainted with your wife?
On the coast of Africa, ma'am. She was a new nigger,
when I first saw her.
What led you to become attached to her?
She was a fine, tall figure, black as jet, but very
handsome
.
She was very capable, and could carry on all the
affairs of the plantation in my absence, as well as I could
myself. She was affectionate and faithful, and I could trust
her. I have fixed her nicely in my Haitien colony. I
wish you would go there. She would give you the best in
the house. You ought to go, to see how happy the human
race can be. It is in a fine, rich valley, about thirty miles
from Port Platte; heavily timbered with mahogany all
round; well watered; flowers so beautiful; fruits in
abundance, so delicious that you could not refrain from
stopping
to eat, till you could eat no more. My son has laid
out good roads, and built bridges and mills; the people are
improving, and everything is prosperous. I am anxious to
establish a good school there. I engaged a teacher; but
somebody persuaded him it was mean to teach niggers,
and so he fell off from his bargain.
I have heard that you hold your labourers in a sort of
qualified slavery; and some friends of the coloured race
have apprehensions that you may sell them again.
My labourers in Haiti are not slaves. They are a kind
of indented apprentices. I give them land, and they bind
themselves to work for me. I have no power to take them
away from that island; and you know very well that I
could not sell them there.
7
I am glad you have relinquished the power to make
slaves of them again. I had charge of a fine, intelligent
fugitive, about a year ago. I wanted to send him to your
colony; but I did not dare to trust you.
You need not have been afraid, ma'am. I should be
the last man on earth to give up a runaway. If my own
were to run away, I wouldn't go after'em.
If these are your feelings, why don't you take all your
slaves to Haiti?
I have thought that subject all over, ma'am; and I have
settled it in my own mind. All we can do in this world is
to balance evils. I want to do great things for Haiti; and
in order to do them, I must have money. If I have no
negroes
to cultivate my Florida lands they will run to waste;
and then I can raise no money from them for the benefit of
Haiti. I do all I can to make them comfortable, and they
love me like a father. They would do any thing on earth
to please me. Once I stayed away longer than usual, and
they thought I was dead. When I reached home, they
overwhelmed me with their caresses; I could hardly stand
it.
Does it not grieve you to think of leaving these faithful,
kind-hearted people to the cruel chances of slavery?
Yes, it does; but I hope to get all my plans settled in
a few years.
You tell me you are seventy-six years old; what if
you should die before your plans are completed?
Likely enough I shall. In that case, my heirs would
break my will, I dare say, and my poor niggers would be
badly off.
Then manumit them now; and avoid this dreadful risk.
I have thought that all over, ma'am; and I have
settled it that I can do more good by keeping them in
slavery
a few years more. The best we can do in this world
is to balance evils judiciously.
But you do not balance wisely. Remember that all
the descendants of your slaves, through all coming time,
will be affected by your decision.
So will all Haiti be affected, through all coming time,
if I can carry out my plans. To do good in the world, we
must
have money. That's the way I reasoned when I
carried on the slave trade. It was very profitable then.
And do you have no remorse of conscience, in
recollecting
that bad business?
Some
things I do not like to remember; but they were
not things in which I was to blame; they were inevitably
attendant on the trade.
I argued that any trade must be wicked, that
had
such
inevitable consequences. He admitted it; but still clung
to his balance of evils. If that theory is admitted in morals
at all, I confess that his practice seems to me a legitimate,
though an extreme result. But it was altogether vain to
argue with him about fixed principles of right and wrong;
one might as well fire small shot at the hide of a rhinoceros.
Yet were there admirable points about him;perseverance,
that would conquer the world; an heroic candour, that
avowed all things, creditable and discreditable; and kindly
sympathies, toothough it must be confessed that they go
groping and floundering about in the strangest fashion.
He came from Scotland; no other country, perhaps,
except
New-England, could have produced such a character.
His father was a Quaker: and he still loves to attend
Quaker meetings; particularly silent ones, where he says
he has planned some of his best bargains. To complete
the circle of contradictions, he likes the abolitionists, and
is a prodigious admirer of George Thompson.
My neighbours call me an abolitionist, said he; I
tell them they may do so, in welcome; for it is a pity they
shouldn't have
one
case of amalgamation to point at.
This singular individual has been conversant with all
sorts of people, and seen almost all parts of the world.
I have known the Malay and the African, the North
American Indian, and the European, said he; and the
more I've seen of the world, the less I understand it. It's
a queer place; that's a fact.
Probably this mixture with people of all creeds and
customs
,
combined with the habit of looking
outward
for his
guide of action, may have bewildered his moral sense, and
produced his system of balancing evils! A theory
obviously
absurd, as well as slippery in its application; for
none but God
can
balance evils; it requires omniscience
and omnipresence to do it.
His conversation produced great activity of thought on
the subject of conscience, and of that light that lighteth
every man who cometh into the world. Whether this
utilitarian remembers it or not, he must have stifled many
convictions before he arrived at his present state of mind.
And so it must have been with the pious John Newton,
whose devotional letters from the coast of Africa, while he
was slave-trading there, record sweet seasons of
communion
with his God. That
he
was not left without a
witness within him, is proved by the fact, that in his
journal he expresses gratitude to God for opening the door
for him to leave the slave trade, by providing other
employment
.
The monitor
within
did not deceive him; but his
education
was at war with its dictates, because it taught him
that whatever was
legalized
was
right
. Plain as the guilt
of the slave trade now is, to every man, woman, and child,
it was not so in the time of Clarkson; had it been
otherwise
,
there would have been no need of his labours. He
was accused of planning treason and insurrection, plots were
laid against his life, and the difficulty of combating his
obviously
just principles, led to the vilest misrepresentations
and the most false assumptions. Thus it must always be
with those who attack a very corrupt public opinion.
The slave
trade,
which all civilized laws now denounce
as piracy, was defended in precisely the same spirit that
slavery
is now. Witness the following remarks from
Boswell
,
the biographer of Dr. Johnson, whose opinions echo
the tone of genteel society:
I beg leave to enter my most solemn protest against
Dr. Johnson's general doctrine with respect to the slave
trade. I will resolutely say that his unfavourable notion of
it was owing to prejudice, and imperfect or false
information
.
The
wild
and
dangerous
attempt which has for
some time been persisted in, to obtain an act of our
legislature
to abolish so very
important and necessary a branch of
commercial interest,
must have been crushed at once, had
not the
insignificance
of the zealots, who vainly took the
lead in it, made the vast body of planters, merchants, and
others, whose immense properties are involved in that
trade, reasonably enough suppose that there could be no
danger. The encouragement which the attempt has
received
,
excites my wonder and indignation; and though
some men of superior abilities have supported it, (whether
from a love of temporary popularity when prosperous, or a
love of general mischief when desperate,) my opinion is
unshaken. To abolish a status which in all ages
God has
sanctioned,
and man continued, would not only be robbery
to an innumerable class of our fellow subjects, but it would
be extreme cruelty to African savages; a portion of whom
it saves from massacre, or intolerable bondage in their own
country, and introduces into a much happier state of life;
especially now, when their passage to the West Indies,
and their treatment there, is humanely regulated.
To
abolish that trade, would be to shut the gates of mercy on
mankind
.
These changes in the code of morals adopted by society,
by no means unsettle my belief in eternal and
unchangeable
principles of right and wrong; neither do they lead
me to doubt that in all these cases men inwardly know
better
than they act. The slaveholder, when he manumits on
his death-bed, thereby acknowledges that he has known he
was doing wrong. Public opinion expresses what men
will
to do; not their inward
perceptions.
All kinds of
crimes have been countenanced by public opinion, in some
age or nation; but we cannot as easily show how far they
were sustained by reason and conscience in each individual.
I believe the lamp never goes out, though it may shine
dimly through a foggy atmosphere.
This consideration should renew our zeal to purify public
opinion; to let no act or word of ours help to corrupt it, in
the slightest degree. How shall we fulfil this sacred trust,
which each holds for the good of all? Not by calculating
consequences; not by balancing evils; but by reverent
obedience to our own highest convictions of individual duty.
Few men ask concerning right and wrong of their
own
hearts. Few listen to the oracle
within,
which can only be
heard in the stillness. The merchant seeks his moral
standard on 'Changea fitting name for a thing so
fluctuating
;
the sectary in the opinion of his small theological
department; the politician in the tumultuous echo of his
party; the worldling in the buzz of saloons. In a word,
each man inquires of
his
public; what wonder, then, that
the answers are selfish as trading interest, blind as local
prejudice, and various as human whim?
A German drawing-master once told me of a lad who
wished to sketch landscapes from nature. The teacher told
him that the first object was to choose some
fixed point of
view
. The sagacious pupil chose a cow grazing beneath
the trees. Of course, his
fixed point
soon began to move
hither and thither, as she was attracted by the sweetness of
the pasturage; and the lines of his drawing fell into strange
confusion.
This a correct type of those who choose public opinion
for their moral fixed point of view. It moves according to
the provender before it, and they who trust to it have but a
whirling and distorted landscape.
Coleridge defines public opinion as the average
prejudices
of the community. Wo unto those who have no
safer guide of principle and practice than this average of
prejudices. Wo unto them in an especial manner, in these
latter days, when The windows of heaven are opened,
and
therefore
the foundations of the earth do
shake!
Feeble wanderers are they, following a flickering
Jack-o'lantern
,
when there is a calm, bright pole-star for ever
above the horizon, to guide their steps, if they would but
look to it.
LETTER XXIV.
July 28, 1842
When the spirit is at war with its outward environment,
because it is not inwardly dwelling in trustful obedience to
its God, how often does some very slight incident bring it
back, humble, and repentant, to the Father's footstool! A
few days since, cities seemed to me such hateful places,
that I deemed it the greatest of hardships to be pent up
therein. As usual, the outward grew more and more
detestable
,
as it reflected the restlessness of the inward.
Piles of stones and rubbish, left by the desolating fire,
looked more hot and dreary than ever; they were building
brick houses between me and the sunsetand in my
requiring
selfishness, I felt as if it were
my
sunset, and no
man had a
right
to shut it out; and then to add the last
drop to my vexation, they painted the roof of house and
piazza as fierce a red as if the mantle of the great fire, that
destroyed its predecessor, had fallen over them. The wise
course would have been, to try to find something agreeable
in a red roof, since it suited my neighbour's convenience to
have one. But the head was not in a mood to be wise,
because the heart was not humble and obedient; so I
fretted
inwardly about the red roof, more than I would care to
tell in words; I even thought to myself, that it would be
no more than just and right if people with such bad taste
should be sent to live by themselves on a quarantine island.
Then I began to think of myself as a most unfortunate and
ill-used individual, to be for ever pent up within brick walls
without even a dandelion to gaze upon; from that I fell to
thinking of many fierce encounters between my will and
necessity, and how will had always been conquered,
chained
,
and sent to the treadmill to work. The more I thought
after this fashion, hotter glared the bricks, and fiercer
glowed the red roof, under the scorching sun. I was
making a desert within, to paint its desolate likeness on the
scene without.
A friend found me thus, and having faith in Nature's
healing power, he said, Let us seek green fields and
flowery nooks. So we walked abroad; and while yet
amid the rattle and glare of the city, close by the iron
railway
,
I saw a very little, ragged child stooping over a small
patch of stinted, dusty grass. She rose up with a broad
smile over her hot face, for she had found a white clover!
The tears were in my eyes. God bless thee, poor
child! said I; thou hast taught my soul a lesson, which
it will not soon forget. Thou, poor neglected one, can't
find blossoms by the dusty wayside, and rejoice in thy
hard path, as if it were a mossy bank strewn with violets.
I felt humbled before that ragged, gladsome child. Then
saw I plainly that walls of brick and mortar did not, and
could not, hem me in. I thought of those who loved me,
and every remembered kindness was a flower in my path;
I thought of intellectual gardens, where this child might
perchance never enter, but where I could wander at will
over acres broad as the world; and if even there, the
restless
spirit felt a limit, lo, poetry had but to throw a ray
thereon, and the fair gardens of earth were reflected in the
heavens like the
fata morgana
of Italian skies, in a
drapery
of rainbows. Because I was poor in spirit,
straightway
there was none so rich as I. Then was it revealed
to me that only the soul which gathers flowers by the dusty
wayside can truly love the fresh anemone by the running
brook, or the trailing arbutus hiding its sweet face among
the fallen leaves. I returned home a better and wiser
woman
,
thanks to the ministry of that little one. I saw that I
was not ill-used and unfortunate, but blessed beyond others;
one of Nature's favourites, whom she ever took to her
kindly heart, and comforted in all seasons of distress and
waywardness. Though the sunset was shut out, there still
remained the roseate flush of twilight, as if the sun, in
answer to my love, had written to me a farewell message
on the sky. The red piazza stood there, blushing for him
who painted it; but it no longer pained my eyesight; I
thought what a friendly warmth it would have, seen through
the wintry snows. Oh, blessed indeed are little children!
Mortals do not understand half they owe them; for the
good they do us is a spiritual gift, and few perceive how it
intertwines the mystery of life. They form a ladder of
garlands on which the angels descend to our souls; and
without them, such communication would be utterly lost.
Let us strive to be like little children.
As I mused on the altered aspect of the outward world,
according to the state of him who looked upon it, I raised to
my eye a drop from a broken chandelier. That glass
fragment
was like a fairy wand, or Aladdin's wondrous lamp.
The line of tumbling wooden shantees, which I had often
blamed the capricious fire for sparing, the piles of lime and
7*
stones that wearied my eyesight, were at once changed
to rainbows; even the offensive red roof smiled upon me
in the softened beauty of purple and gold. Not earth, but
the medium through which earth is seen, produces beauty.
I said to myself, Whereunto shall I liken this angular bit
of glass? The answer came to me in musicin words
and tones of song: The faith touching all things with
hues of heaven. Then prayed I earnestly for that faith,
as a perpetual gift. Prayer, earnest and true, rose from
that fragment of broken glass; thus from things most
common
and trivial, spring the highest and the holiest.
I thought then that I would never again look on outward
circumstances, except in the cheerful light of a trusting and
grateful heart. Yet within a week, came the restless
comparing
of
me
with
thee
. If I could only be situated as such
an one was, how good I could
be,
and how much good I
would
do
. I said within myself, This must not be. If
I indulge this train of thought, the walls will again crowd
upon me, and the bricks glare worse than ever. So I
walked to the Battery, to look at moonlight on the water;
in full faith that Nature never did betray the heart that
loved her. The moon had not yet risen; but softly from
the recesses of Castle Garden came tones of music,
welcome
to my soul as a mother's voice. We walked in,
thinking only to hear the band, and lounge quietly on a
seat overhanging the water. All pleasure in this world is
but the cessation of some pain; and they only who work
unto weariness, in mind or body, can fully enjoy the luxury
of repose. And this repose was so perfect, so
strengthening
!
Instead of the pent-up, stifling air of the central city,
was a cool, evening breeze, gentle as if a thousand winged
messengers fanned one's cheeks for love; below, the
ever-flowing
water laved the stones with a refreshing sound;
round us floated music, so plaintive and so shadowy! It
sung The light of other daysthe very voice of
moonlight
,
soft and trembling over the dim waters of the Past;
and then, as if the atmosphere were not already bathed in
sufficient beauty, slowly rose the mild, majestic moon; and
the water-spirits hailed her presence with mazy, undulating
dance, as if rejoicing in the glittering wealth of jewelry she
gave. At such an hour, beyond all others, does nature
seem to be filled with an inward, hidden life; in serious and
beseeching tones, she seems to say, Lo I reveal unto you
a great mystery, lying at the foundation of all being. I
speak it in all tones, I write it in all colours. When will
the mortal arise who understands my language? And a
sacred voice answers, When His will is done on
earth,
as it is done in
heaven
. In the midst of such communion,
the soul feels that
This visible nature and this common world,
Is all too narrow.
Wings wave in the air, voices speak through the sea, and
the rustling trees are whispering spirits. It was this
yearning
after the spiritual that pervades all things, whose
presence
,
never found, is constantly revealed in so many
echoesit is this dim longing, which of old peopled space
with life and mystical predominance; this filled the grove
with dryads, the waves with nymphs, the earth with fairies,
the sky with angels. The external and the sensual call
this the ravings of Imagination; and they know not that
she is the priestess of high Truth.
All this I did not
think
of, as I leaned over the waters of
Castle Garden; but this, and far more, was spoken into
my
heart;
and I shall find it all recorded in rainbow
letters
,
on my journal there beyond.
In such listening mood, when the outward lay before me,
in hieroglyphic symbols of a volume so infinite, I turned
with a feeling of sadness toward a painted representation
of Vera Cruz, which the bill proclaimed was to be taken
by the French fleet that evening, for the amusement of
spectators. The imitation of a distant city was certainly
good, speaking according to the theatrical standard: but it
seemed to me desecration, that Art should thus intrude
her delusions into the sanctuary of Nature. In a mood
less elevated, I might have scorned her pretensions, with a
proud impatience; but as it was, I simply felt sad at the
incongruity. I looked at the moon in her serene beauty,
at the little boats, here floating across the veil of silver
blonde, which she had thrown over the dancing waves, and
there, with lanterns, gliding like fire-flies among the deep
distant shadows; and I said if Art ventures into this
presence
,
let her come only as the Greek Diana, or marble
nymph sleeping on her urn.
But Art revenged herself for the slight estimation in
which I held her. She could not satisfy me with beauty
harmonious with Nature; but she charmed with the
brilliancy
of contrast. Opposite me I saw a light mildly
splendid, as if seen through an atmosphere of motionless
water. It had a fairy look, and I could not otherwise than
observe it, from time to time, though the moonbeams played
so gracefully and still. Anon, with a whizzing sound, it
became a wheel of fire; then it changed to a hexagon, set
with emeralds, topaz, and rubies; then circles of orange,
white, and crimson light revolved swiftly round a
resplendent
centre of amethyst; then it became flowers made of
gems; and after manifold changes of unexpected beauty, it
revolved a large star, set with jewels of all rainbow hues,
over which there fell a continual fountain of golden rain.
It was called the kaleidescope; and its fairy splendour far
exceeded anything I ever imagined of fireworks. I asked
pardon of insulted
Art,
and thanked
her,
too, for the pleasure
she had given me.
I turned again to moonlight and silence, and my happy
spirit carried no discord there. Even when I thought of
returning to the hot and crowded city, I said, This too
will I do in cheerfulness. I will learn of Nature to love
all, and do all. Slowly, and with loving reluctance, we
turned away from the moon-lighted waters; then came
across the waves the liquid melody of a flute; it called us
back with such friendly, sweet intreaty, that we could not
otherwise than stop to listen to its last silvery cadence.
Again we turned away, and had nearly made our escape,
when an accordion from a distant boat, in softened accents
begged us still to linger. Then a band on board the
newly-arrived
French frigate struck up the Cracovienne, the
expressive dance of Poland, bringing with it images of
romantic
grace, and strange, deep thoughts of the destiny of
nations.We lingered and lingered. Nature and Art
seemed to have conspired that night to do their best to
please us. At last, the sounds died away; and stepping
to their echo in our memories, we passed out; the iron gate
of the Battery clanked behind us; the streets reared their
brick walls between us and the loveliness of earth and
heaven
.
But they could not shut it out; for it had passed
into
our souls.
You will smile, and say the amount of all this romancing
is a confession that I was a tired and wayward child,
needing
moonlight and a show to restore my serenity. And
what of that? If I am not too perfect to
be
in a wayward
humour, I surely will not be too dignified to
tell
of it. I
say, as Bettine does to Gunderode: How glad I am to be
so insignificant. I need not fork up discreet thoughts when
I write to thee, but just narrate how things are. Once I
thought I must not write unless I could give importance to
the letter by a bit of moral, or some discreet thought; now
I think not to chisel out, or glue together my thoughts.
Let others do that. If I must write so, I cannot think.
LETTER XXV.
August 4, 1842.
Last week, for a single day, I hid myself in the green
sanctuary of Nature; and from the rising of the sun till the
going down of the moon, took no more thought of cities,
than if such excrescences never existed on the surface of
the globe. A huge wagon, traversing our streets, under
the midsummer sun, bearing in immense letters, the words,
Ice from Rockland Lake,
had frequently attracted my
attention, and become associated with images of freshness
and romantic beauty. Therefore, in seeking the country
for a day, I said our course should be up the Hudson, to
Rockland Lake. The noontide sun was scorching, and our
heads were dizzy with the motion of the boat; but these
inconviences, so irksome at the moment, are faintly traced
on the tablet of memory. She engraves only the beautiful
in lasting characters; for beauty alone is immortal and
divine
.
We stopped at Piermont, on the widest part of Tappan
bay, where the Hudson extends itself to the width of three
miles. On the opposite side, in full view from the Hotel,
is Tarrytown, where poor Andre was captured. Tradition
says, that a very large white-wood tree, under which he
was taken, was struck by lightning, on the very day that
news of Arnold's death was received at Tarrytown. As I
sat gazing on the opposite woods, dark in the shadows of
moonlight, I thought upon how very slight a circumstance
often depends the fate of individuals, and the destiny of
nations. In the autumn of 1780, a farmer chanced to be
making cider at a mill, on the east bank of the Hudson,
near that part of Haverstraw Bay, called Mother's Lap.
Two young men, carrying muskets, as usual in those
troubled times, stopped for a draught of sweet cider, and
seated themselves on a log to wait for it. The farmer found
them looking very intently on some distant object, and
inquired
what they saw. Hush! hush! they replied;
The red coats are yonder, just within the Lap, pointing
to an English gun boat, with twenty-four men, lying on
their oars. Behind the shelter of a rock they fired into the
boat, and killed two persons. The British, returned a
random shot; but ignorant of the number of their opponents,
and seeing that it was useless to waste ammunition on a
hidden foe, they returned whence they came, with all
possible
speed. This boat had been sent to convey Major
Andre to the British sloop-of-war, Vulture, then lying at
anchor off Teller's point. Shortly after, Andre arrived,
and finding the boat gone, he, in attempting to proceed
through the interior, was captured. Had not those men
stopped to drink sweet cider, it is probable that Andre
would not have been hung; the American revolution might
have terminated in quite different fashion; men now deified
as heroes, might have been handed down to posterity as
traitors; our citizens might be proud of claiming descent from
tories; and slavery have been abolished eight years ago,
by virtue of our being British colonies. So much may
depend
on a draught of cider! But would England herself
have abolished slavery, had it not been for the impulse given
to free principles by the American revolution? Probably
not. It is not easy to calculate the consequences involved
even in a draught of cider; for no fact stands alone; each
has infinite relations.
A very pleasant ride at sunset brought us to Orangetown,
to the lone field where Major Andre was executed. It is
planted with potatoes, but the plough spares the spot on which
was once his gallows and his grave. A rude heap of stones,
with the remains of a dead fir tree in the midst, are all that
mark it; but tree and stones are covered with names. It
is on an eminence, commanding a view of the country for
miles. I gazed on the surrounding woods, and remembered
that on this self same spot, the beautiful and accomplished
young man walked back and forth, a few minutes
preceding
his execution, taking an earnest farewell look of earth and
sky. My heart was sad within me. Our guide pointed to
a house in full view, at half a mile's distance, which he
told us was at that time the head-quarters of General
Washington
.
I turned my back suddenly upon it. The last
place on earth where I would wish to think of Washington,
is at the grave of Andre. I know that military men not
only sanction, but applaud the deed; and reasoning
according
to the maxims of war, I am well aware how much can
be said in its defence. That Washington considered it a
duty, the discharge of which was most painful to him, I
doubt not. But, thank God, the instincts of my childhood
are unvitiated by any such maxims. From the first hour I
read of the dead, until the present day, I never did, and
never could, look upon it as otherwise than cool, deliberate
murder. That the theory and practice of war commends
the transaction, only serves to prove the infernal nature of
war itself.
Milton (stern moralist as he was, in many respects)
maintains, in his
Christian
Doctrine, that falsehoods are
sometimes not only allowable, but necessary. It is
scarcely possible, says he, to execute any of the
artifices
of war without openly uttering the greatest untruths,
with the undisputable intention of deceiving. And because
war
requires lies, we are told by a
Christian
moralist that
lies must, therefore, be lawful! It is observable that Milton
is obliged to defend the necessity of falsehoods in the same
way that fighting is defended; he makes many references
to the
Jewish
scriptures, but none to the
Christian
.
Having
established his position, that wilful, deliberate
deception
was a necessary ingredient of war, it is strange,
indeed
,
that his enlightened mind did not at once draw the
inference that war itself must be evil. It would have been
so, had not the instincts of heart and conscience been
perverted
by the maxims of men, and the customs of that fierce
period.
The soul may be brought into military drill service, like
the limbs of the body; and such a one, perchance, might
stand on Andre's grave, and glory in his capture; but I
would rather suffer his inglorious death, than attain to such
a state of mind.
A few years ago, the Duke of York requested the British
consul to send the remains of Major Andre to England.
At that time, two thriving firs were found near the grave,
and a peach tree, which a lady in the neighbourhood had
planted there, in the kindness of her heart. The farmers,
who came to witness the interesting ceremony, generally
evinced the most respectful tenderness for the memory of
the unfortunate dead; and many of the women and children
wept. A few loafers, educated by militia trainings, and
Fourth of July declamation, begun to murmur that the
memory of General Washington was insulted by any
respect
shown to the remains of Andre; but the offer of a
treat lured them to the tavern, where they soon became too
drunk to guard the character of Washington. It was a
beautiful day: and these disturbing spirits being removed,
the impressive ceremony proceeded in solemn silence. The
coffin was in good preservation, and contained all the
bones, with a small quantity of dust. The roots of the
peach tree had entirely interwoven the skull with their fine
network. His hair, so much praised for its uncommon
beauty, was tied, on the day of his execution, according
to the fashion of the times. When his grave was opened,
half a century afterward, the ribbon was found in perfect
preservation, and sent to his sister in England. When it
was known that the sarcophagus, containing his remains,
had arrived in New-York, on its way to London, many
ladies sent garlands, and emblematic devices, to be
wreathed
around it, in memory of the beloved and lamented
Andre. In their compassionate hearts, the teachings of
nature were unperverted by maxims of war, or that selfish
jealousy, which dignifies itself with the name of patriotism.
Blessed be God, that custom forbids women to electioneer
or fight. May the sentiment remain, till war and politics
have passed away. Had not women and children been
kept free from their polluting influence, the medium of
communication
between earth and heaven would have been
completely cut off.
At the foot of the eminence where the gallows had been
erected, we found an old Dutch farm-house, occupied by a
man who witnessed the execution, and whose father often
sold peaches to the unhappy prisoner. He confirmed the
accounts of Andre's uncommon personal beauty; and had a
vivid remembrance of the pale, but calm, heroism with
which he met his untimely death. Everything about this
dwelling was antiquated. Two prim pictures of George III.
and his homely queen, taken at the period when we owed
allegiance to them, as the government ordained of God,
marked plainly the progress of Art since that period; for
the portraits of Victoria on our cotton-spools, are graceful
in comparison. An ancient clock, which has ticked
uninterrupted
good time on the same ground for more than a
hundred years, stood in one corner of the little parlour. It
was brought from the East Indies, by an old Dutch sea
captain, great grandfather of the present owner. In those
nations, where
opinions
are transmitted unchanged, the
outward
forms
and
symbols
of thought remain so likewise.
The gilded figures, which entirely cover the body of this
old clock, are precisely the same, in perspective, outline,
and expression, as East India figures of the present day.
My observations, as a traveller, are limited to a very small
portion of the new world; and therefore, it has never been
my lot to visit scenes so decidedly bearing the impress of
former days, as this Dutch county.
Life, on a soil inhabited in olden time, and once
glorious
in its industry, activity, and attachment to noble
pursuits
,
has a peculiar charm, says Novalis. Nature seems
to have become there more human, more rational; a dim
remembrance
throws back, through the transparent present,
the images of the world in marked outline; and thus you
enjoy a two-fold world, purged by this very process from
the rude and disagreeable, and made the magic poetry and
fable of the mind. Who knows whether also an indefinable
influence of the former inhabitants, now departed, does not
conspire to this end?
The solemn impression, so eloquently described by
Novalis
,
is what I have desired above all things to experience;
but the times seen through the transparent present of
these thatched farm houses, and that red Dutch church, are
not far
enough
in the distance; far removed from us, it is
true; but still farther from mitred priest, crusading knight,
and graceful troubadour. An indefinable influence of the
former inhabitants, is indeed most visible; but then it needs
no ghost to tell us that these inhabitants were thoroughly
Dutch. Since the New-York and Erie railroad passed
through their midst, careful observers say, that the surface
of the stagnant social pool begins to ripple, in very small
whirlpools, as if an insect stirred the waters. But
before
that period, a century produced no visible change in
theology, agriculture, dress, or cooking. They were the
very type of conservatism; immoveable in the midst of
incessant
change. The same family live on the same home,
stead, generation after generation. Brothers married, and
came home to father's to live, so long as the old house
would contain wives and swarming children; and when house
and barn were both overrun, a new tenement, of the
selfsame
construction, was put up, within stone's throw. To
sell
an acre of land received from their fathers, would be
downright
desecration. It is now literally impossible for a stranger
to buy of them at any price. A mother might be coaxed to
sell her babies, as easily as they to sell their farms.
Consider
what consternation such a people must have been in,
when informed that the New-York and Erie railroad was
to be cut straight through their beloved, hereditary acres!
They swore, by donner and blitzen, that not a rail should
ever be laid on their premises. The railroad company,
however, by aid of chancery, compelled them to acquiesce;
and their grief was really pitiful to behold. Neighbours
went to each others' stoops, to spend a
social
evening;
and, as their wont had ever been, they sat and smoked at
each other, without the unprofitable interruption of a single
word of conversation: but
not
according to custom, they now
grasped each other's hands tightly at parting, and tears
rolled down their weather-beaten cheeks. The iron of
the railroad had entered their souls. And well it might;
for it not only divided orchards, pastures, and gardens;
but, in many instances, cut right through the old
homesteads
.
Clocks that didn't know how to tick, except on the
sinking floor where they had stood for years, were now
removed to other premises, and went mute with sorrow.
Heavy old tables, that hadn't stirred one of their countless
legs for half a century, were now compelled to budge: and
potatoes, whose grandfathers and great grandfathers had slept
together in the same bed, were now removed beyond
nodding
distance. Joking apart, it was a cruel case. The
women and children wept, and some of the old settlers
actully died of a broken heart. Several years have
elapsed
since the fire king first went whizzing through on his
wings of steam; but the Dutch farmers have not yet learned
to look on him without a muttered curse; with fear and
trembling, they guide their sleek horses and slow-and-sure
wagons over the crossings, expecting, every instant, to be
reduced to impalpable powder.
Poor old men! what will they say when railroads are
carried through all their old seed-fields of opinion,
theological
and political? As yet, there are no twilight
fore-shadowings
of such possibilities; but assuredly, the day will come,
when ideas, like potatoes, will not be allowed to sprout up
peaceably in the same hillock where their venerable
progenitors
vegetated from time immemorial.
As yet, no rival spires here point to the same heaven.
There stands the Dutch Reformed Church, with its red
body, and low white tower, just where stood the small
stone church, in which Major Andre was tried and sentenced.
The modern church (I mean the
building
) is larger than
the one of olden time; but creed and customs, somewhat
of the sternest, have not changed one hair's breadth. I
thought of this, as I looked at the unsightly edifice; and
suddenly there rose up before me the image of some of our
modern disturbers, stalking in among these worshipping
antediluvians, and pricking their ears with the astounding
intelligence, that they were a den of thieves, and a
hill of hell. 'Tis a misfortune to have an imagination too
vivid. I cannot think of that red Dutch church, without a
crowd of images that make me laugh till the tears come.
Not far from the church is a small stone building, used
as a tavern. Here they showed me the identical room
where Andre was imprisoned. With the exception of new
plastering, it remains the same as then. It is long, low,
and narrow, and being without furniture or fireplace, it still
has rather a jail-like look. I was sorry for the new
plastering
;
for I hoped to find some record of prison thoughts cut
in the walls. Two doves were cuddled together on a
bench in one corner, and looked in somewhat melancholy
mood. These mates were all alone in that silent
apartment
,
where Andre shed bitter tears over the miniature of
his beloved. Alas for mated human hearts! This world
is too often for them a pilgrimage of sorrow.
The miniature, which Andre made such strong efforts to
preserve, when everything else was taken from him, and
which he carried next his heart till the last fatal moment,
is generally supposed to have been a likeness of the
beautiful
,
graceful, and highly-gifted Honora Sneyd, who married
Richard Lovel Edgeworth, and thus became step-mother
to the celebrated Maria Edgeworth. A strong youthful
attachment existed between her and Major Andre; but for
some reason or other they separated. He entered the
army, and died the death of a felon.
Was
he a felon?
No. He was generous, kind, and brave. His noble nature
was perverted by the maxims of war; but the act he
committed
for the British army was what an American officer
would have gloried in doing for his own. Washington
employed
spies; nor is it probable that he, or any other
military commander, would have hesitated to
become
one,
if by so doing so he could get the enemy completely into
his power. It is not therefore a sense of justice, but a
wish to inspire terror, which leads to the execution of spies.
War is a game, in which the devil plays at nine-pins with
the souls of men.
Early the next morning, we rose before the sun, and took
a wagon ride, of ten miles, to Rockland Lake. The road
was exceedingly romantic. On one side, high, precipitous
hills, covered with luxuriant foliage, or rising in
perpendicular
masses of stone, singularly like the faade of some
ruined castle; on the other side, almost near enough to dip
our hands in its waters, flowed the broad Hudson, with a
line of glittering light along its edge, announcing the
coming
sun. Our path lay straight over the high hills, full of
rolling stones, and innumerable elbows; for it went round
about to avoid every rock, as a good, old-fashioned Dutch
path should, in prophetic contempt of railroads. But all
around was verdure, abundance, and beauty; and we could
have been well content to wind round and round among
those picturesque hills, like Peter Rugg, in his everlasting
ride, had not the advancing sun given premonitory symptoms
of the fiercest heat. We plainly saw that he was pulling
the corn up by the hair of its head, and making the grass
grow with a forty horse power. At last, the lake itself
opened upon us, with whole troops of lilies. This pure
sheet of water, more than a mile long, is inclosed by a
most graceful sweep of hills, verdant with foliage,
and dotted with golden grain. It is as beautiful a scene
as my eye ever rested on. A piece of heaven let
fall to earth. At the farm where we lodged, a
summer
house was placed on a verdant curve, which
swelled
out into the lake, as if a breeze had floated it there in
play. There I sat all day long, too happy to talk. Never
did I thus throw myself on the bosom of Nature, as it were
on the heart of my dearest friend. The cool rippling of the
water, the whirring of a humming-bird, and the happy notes
of some little warbler, tending her nest directly over our
heads, was all that broke silence in that most beautiful
temple.
After a while, our landlord came among us. He had
been a sailor, soldier, Indian doctor, and farmer; but the
incidents of his changing life had for him no deeper
significance
than the accumulation of money.
I sighed, that man alone should be at discord with the
harmony of nature. But the bird again piped a welcome
to her young; and no other false note intruded on the
universal
hymn of earth, and air, and sky.
At twilight, we took boat, and went paddling about among
the shadows of the green hills. I wept when I gave a
farewell look to Rockland Lake; for I had no hope that I
should ever again see her lovely face, or listen to her
friendly
voice; and none but Him, who speaks through Nature,
can ever know what heavenly things she whispered in my
ear, that happy summer's day.
LETTER XXVI.
September 1, 1842.
From childhood, I have had a most absorbing passion
for flowers. What unheard of quantities of moss and
violets
have I trailed from their shady birthplace, to some little
nook, which fate allowed me, for the time being, to call my
home! And then, how I have pitied the poor things, and
feared they would not be so happy, as if I had left them
alone. Yet flowers ever seemed to thrive with me, as if
they knew I loved them. Perchance they did; for
invisible
radii, inaudible language, go forth from the souls of
all things. Nature ever sees and hears it; as man would,
were it not for his
self-listening
.
The flowers have spoken to me more than I can tell in
written words. They are the hieroglyphics of angels,
loved by all men for the beauty of the character, though
few can decypher even fragments of their meaning.
Minerals
,
flowers, and birds, among a thousand other tri-une
ideas, ever speak to me of the Past, the Present, and the
Future. The Past, like minerals, with their fixed forms of
gorgeous but unchanging beauty; the Present, like flowers,
growing and ever changingbud, blossom, and seed-vessel
seed, bud, and blossom, in endless progression; the
Future, like birds, with winged aspirations, and a voice
that sings into the clouds. Not separate are past, present,
and future; but one evolved from the other, like the
continuous
,
ever-rising line of the spiral: and not separate
are minerals, vegetables, and animals. The same soul
pervades them all; they are but higher and higher types
of the self-same Ideas; spirally they rise, one out of the
other. Strike away one curve in the great growth of the
universe, and the stars themselves would fall. Some
glimpses of these arcana were revealed to the ancients;
hence the spiral line occurs frequently among the sacred
and mysterious emblems in their temples.
There is an astronomical theory that this earth, by a
succession
of spiral movements, is changing its position, until
its poles will be brought into harmonious relation with the
poles of the heavens; then sunshine will equally
overspread
the globe, and Spring become perpetual. I know
not whether this theory be correct; but I think it isfor
reasons not at all allied with astronomical knowledge. If
the millenium, so long prophesied, ever comes, if the lion
and the lamb ever lie down together within the souls of
men, the outward world must likewise come into divine
order
,
and the poles of the earth will harmonize with the poles
of the heavens; then shall universal Spring reign without,
the emblem and offspring of universal Peace within.
Everywhere in creation, we find visible types of these
ascending series. Everything is interlinked; each reaches
one hand upward and one downward, and touching palms,
each is interclasped with all above and all below. Plainly
is this truth written on the human soul, both in its
individual
and universal progress; and
therefore
it is inscribed
on all material forms. But yesterday, I saw a plant called
the Crab Cactus, most singularly like the animal from which
it takes its name. My companion said it was a strange
freak of Nature. But I knew it was no
freak
. I saw
that the cactus and the crab meant the same thingone on a
higher plane than the other. The singular plant was the
point where fish and vegetable touched palms; where
the ascending spiral circles passed into each other. There
is another Cactus that resembles the Sea Urchin; and
another
,
like the Star-fish. In fact, they all seem allied to
8
the crustaceous tribe of animals; and from the idea, which
this embodies, sprung the fancy that fairies of the earth
sometimes formed strange union with merrows of the sea.
Every fancy, the wildest and the strangest, is somewhere
in the universe of God, a fact.
Another indication of interlinking series is found in the
zoophytes, the strangest of all links between the vegetable
and animal world; sometimes growing from a stem like a
plant, and radiating like a blossom, yet devouring insects
and digesting them, like an animal. Behold minerals in
their dark mines! how they strive toward efflorescence,
in picturesque imitation of foliage and tendrils, and roots,
and tangled vines. Such minerals are approaching the
circle of creation that lies above them, and from which they
receive their life; mineral and vegetable here touch palms,
and pass the electric fluid that pervades all life.
As the approach of different planes in existence is
indicated
in forms, so is it in character and uses. Among
minerals, the magnet points ever to the North; so is there
a plant in the prairies, called by travellers the Polar Plant,
or Indian Compass, because the plane of its leaf points due
North and South, without other variation than the
temporary
ruffling of the breeze.
If these secrets were clearly read, they might throw
much light on the science of healing, and perhaps
reconcile
the clashing claims of mineral and vegetable
medicines
.
Doubtless every substance in Nature is an antidote
to some physical evil; owing to some spiritual cause, as
fixed as the laws of mathematics, but not as easily
perceived
.
The toad, when bitten by a spider, goes to the
plantain
leaf, and is cured; the bird, when stung by the yellow
serpent, flies to the Guaco plant, and is healed. If we
knew what spiritual evil was represented by the spider's
poison, and what spiritual good by the plantain leaf, we
should probably see the mystery revealed. Good always
overcomes the evil, which is its perverted form; thus love
casteth out hatred, truth overcomes falsehood, and
suspicion
cannot live before perfect frankness. Always and
everywhere is evil overcome with good; and because it is
so in the soul of man, it is and must be so in all the laws and
operations of Nature.
There are influences yet unthought, and virtues, and many inventions,
And uses, above and around, which man hath not yet regarded.
There be virtues yet unknown in the wasted foliage of the elm,
In the sun-dried harebell of the downs, and the hyacinth drinking in
the meadows;
In the sycamore's winged fruit, and the facet-cut cones of the cedar;
And the pansy and bright geranium live not alone for beauty,
Nor the waxen flower of the arbute, though it dieth in a day;
Nor the sculptured crest of the fir, unseen but by the stars;
And the meanest weed of the garden serveth unto many uses;
The salt tamarisk, and juicy flag, the freckled arum, and the daisy.
For every green herb, from the lotus to the darnel,
Is rich with delicate aids to help incurious man.
There is a final
cause
for the aromatic gum, that congealeth the moss
around a rose;
A
reason
for each blade of grass, that reareth its small spire.
How knoweth discontented man what a train of ills might follow,
If the lowest menial of nature knew not her secret office?
In the perfect circle of creation not an atom could be spared,
From earth's magnetic zone to the bindweed round a hawthorn.
The briar and the palm have the wages of life, rendering secret service.
I did not
intend
to write thus mystically; and I feel that
these are thoughts that should be spoken into your private
ear, not published to the world. To some few they may,
perchance, awaken a series of aspiring thoughts, till the
highest touch the golden harps of heaven, and fill the world
with celestial echoes. But to most they will seem an
ambitious
attempt to write something, which is in fact nothing.
Be it so. I have spoken in a language which few
understand
,
and none can teach or learn. It writes itself in
sunbeams
,
on flowers, gems, and an infinity of forms. I know
it at a glance; but I learned it in no school. When I go
home and shut the door, it speaks to me, as if it were a
voice; but amid the multitude, the sound is hushed.
This which people call the real world, is not real to me;
all its sights seem to me shadows, all its sounds echoes. I
live at service in it, and sweep dead leaves out of paths,
and dust mirrors, and do errands, as I am bid; but glad am
I when work is done, to go
home
to rest. Then do I enter
a golden palace, with light let in only from above; and all
forms of beauty are on the walls, from the seraph before
God's throne, to the rose-tinted shell on the sea-shore.
I strove
not
to speak in mysticism; and lo, here I am, as
the Germans would say, up in the blue again. I know
not how it is, my thoughts to-day are like birds of paradise;
they have no feet, and will not light on earth.
I began to write about flowers with the utmost simplicity;
not meaning to twine of them a spiral ladder of garlands
from earth to heaven. The whole fabric arose from my
looking into the blue eyes of my German Forget-me-not,
which seems so much like a babe just wakening from a
pleasant dream. Then my heart blessed flowers from its
inmost depths. I thought of the beautiful story of the
Italian child laid on the bed of death with a wreath among
his golden ringlets, and a bouquet in his little cold hand.
They had decked him thus for the angels; but when they
went to place him in his coffin, to, the little cherub was
sitting up playing with the flowers.
How the universal heart of man blesses flowers! They
are wreathed round the cradle, the marriage altar, and the
tomb. The Persian in the far East, delights in their
perfume
,
and writes his love in nosegays; while the Indian
child of the far west clasps his hands with glee, as he
gathers the abundant blossomsthe illuminated scripture
of the prairies. The Cupid of the ancient Hindoos tipped
his arrows with flowers, and orange buds are the bridal
crown with us, a nation of yesterday. Flowers garlanded
the Grecian altar, and they hang in votive wreaths before
the Christian shrine.
All these are appropriate uses. Flowers should deck
the brow of the youthful bride, for they are in themselves a
lovely type of marriage. They should twine round the
tomb, for their perpetually renewed beauty is a symbol of
the resurrection. They should festoon the altar, for their
fragrance and their beauty ascend in perpetual worship
before
the Most High.
LETTER XXVII.
September 8, 1842.
It is curious to observe by what laws ideas are associated;
how, from the tiniest seed of thought, rises the umbrageous
tree, with moss about its foot, blossoms on its head, and
birds among its branches. Reading my last letter,
concerning
the spiral series of the universe, some busy little
spirit suggested that there should, somewhere in creation,
be a flower that made music. But I said, do they not
all
make melody? The Persians write their music in colours;
and perchance, in the arrangement of flowers, angels may
perceive songs and anthems. The close relationship
between
light and music has been more or less dimly
perceived
by the human mind everywhere. The Persian,
when he gave to each
note
a
colour,
probably embodied a
greater mystery than he understood. The same undefined
perception makes us talk of the
harmony
of colours, and the
tone
of a picture; it led the blind man to say that his idea
of red was like the sound of a trumpet; and it taught Festus
to speak of a rainbow of sweet sounds. John S. Dwight
was inspired with the same idea, when he eloquently
described
music as a prophecy of what life is to be; the
rainbow of promise, translated out of seeing into hearing.
But I must not trust myself to trace the beautiful analogy
between light and music. As I muse upon it, it is like an
opening between clouds, so transparent, and so deep,
deep,
that it seems as if one could see through it beyond the
farthest
starif one
could
but gaze long and earnestly enough.
Every flower writes music on the air; and every tree
that grows enshrines a tone within its heart. Do you
doubt it? Try the willow and the oak, the elm and the
poplar, and see whether each has not its own peculiar
sound, waiting only for the master's hand to make them
discourse sweet music. One of the most remarkable
instruments
ever invented gives proof of this. M. Guzikow
was a Polish Jew; a shepherd in the service of a
nobleman
.
From earliest childhood, music seemed to pervade
his whole being. As he tended his flocks in the loneliness
of the fields, he was for ever fashioning flutes and reeds
from the trees that grew around him. He soon observed
that the tone of the flute varied according to the wood he
used; by degrees he came to know every tree by its sound;
and the forests stood round him a silent oratorio. The skill
with which he played on his rustic flutes attracted
attention
.
The nobility invited him to their houses, and he
became
a favourite of fortune. Men never grew weary of
hearing him. But soon it was perceived that he was
pouring
forth the fountains of his life in song. Physicians said
he must abjure the flute, or die. It was a dreadful
sacrifice
;
for music to him
was
life. His old familiarity with
tones of the forest came to his aid. He took four round
sticks of wood, and bound them closely together with bands
of straw; across these he arranged numerous pieces of
round, smooth wood, of different kinds. They were
arranged
irregularly to the eye, though harmoniously to the ear;
for some jutted beyond the straw-bound foundation at one
end, and some at the other; in and out, in apparent
confusion
.
The whole was lashed together with twine, as
men would fasten a raft. This was laid on a common
table
,
and struck with two small ebony sticks. Rude as the
instrument appeared, Guzikow brought from it such rich and
liquid melody, that it seemed to take the heart of man on
its wings, and bear it aloft to the throne of God. They
who have heard it, describe it as far exceeding even the
miraculous warblings of Paganini's violin. The emperor
of Austria heard it, and forth with took the Polish peasant
into his own especial service. In some of the large cities,
he now and then gave a concert, by royal permission; and
on such an occasion he was heard by a friend of mine at
Hamburg.
The countenance of the musician was very pale and
haggard, and his large dark eyes wildly expressive. He
covered his head, according to the custom of the Jews;
but the small cap of black velvet was not to be
distinguished
in colour from the jet black hair that fell from under it,
and flowed over his shoulders in glossy, natural ringlets.
He wore the costume of his people, an ample robe, that
fell about him in graceful folds. From head to foot all was
black, as his own hair and eyes, relieved only by the
burning
brilliancy of a diamond on his breast. The
butterflies
of fashion were of course attracted by the unusual and
poetic beauty of his appearance; and ringlets  la
Guzikow
were the order of the day.
Before this singularly gifted being stood a common
wooden
table, on which reposed his rude-looking invention.
He touched it with the ebony sticks. At first you heard a
sound as of wood; the orchestra rose higher and higher,
till it drowned its voice: then gradually subsiding, the
wonderful instrument rose above other sounds,
clear-warbling
,
like a nightingale; the orchestra rose higher, like the
coming of the breezebut above them all, swelled the
sweet tones of the magic instrument, rich, liquid, and strong,
like a sky-lark piercing the heavens! They who heard it
listened in delighted wonder, that the trees could be made
to speak thus under the touch of genius.
There is something pleasant to my imagination in the
fact that every tree has its own peculiar note, and is a
performer
in the great concert of the universe, which for ever
rises before the throne of Jehovah. But when the idea is
applied to
man,
it is painful in the extreme. The emperor
of Russia is said to have an imperial band, in which each
man is doomed all his life long to sound
one
note, that he
may acquire the greatest possible perfection. The effect
of the whole is said to be admirable; but nothing would
tempt me to hear this human musical machine. A
tree
is
a
unit
in creation; though, like everything else, it stands
in relation to all things. But every human
soul
represents
the
universe
. There is horrible profanation in compelling
a living spirit to utter but one note. Theological sects
strive to do this continually; for they
are
sects because
they magnify some
one
attribute of deity, or see but
one
aspect of the divine government. To me, their
fragmentary
echoes are most discordant; but doubtless the angels
listen to them as a
whole,
and perhaps they hear a pleasant
chorus.
Music, whether I listen to it, or try to analyse it, ever
fills me with thoughts which I cannot expressbecause
I cannot
sing;
for nothing but music can express the
emotions
to which it gives birth. Language, even the richest
flow of metaphor, is too poor to do it. That the universe
moves to music, I have no doubt; and could I but
penetrate
this mystery, where the finite passes into the infinite,
I should surely know how the world was created.
Pythagoras
supposed that the heavenly bodies, in their motion,
produced music inaudible to mortal ears. These motions
he believed conformed to certain fixed laws, that could be
stated in numbers, corresponding to the numbers which
express
the harmony of sounds. This music of the spheres
has been considered an idea altogether fanciful; but the
immortal Kepler applied the Pythagorean theory of
numbers
,
and musical intervals, to the distances of the planets;
and a long time after, Newton discovered and acknowledged
the importance of the application. Said I not that the
universe
moved to music? The planets dance before
Jehovah
;
and music is the echo of their motions. Surely the
ear of Beethoven had listened to it, when he wrote those
misnamed waltzes of his, which, as John S. Dwight says,
remind us of no dance, unless it be the dances of the
heavenly
systems in their sublime career through space.
Have you ever seen Retszch's illustration of Schiller's
Song of a Bell? If you have, and know how to
appreciate
its speaking gracefulness, its earnest depth of life, you
are richer than Rothschild or Astor; for a vision of beauty
is an everlasting inheritance. Perhaps none but a German,
would have thus entwined the sound of a bell with the
whole of human life; for with them the bell mingles with
all of mirth, sorrow, and worship. Almost all the German
and Belgian towns are provided with chiming bells, which
play at noon and evening. There was such a set of
musical
bells on the church of St. Nicholas, at Hamburg.
The bell-player was a gray-headed man, who had for many
years rung forth the sonorous chimes, that told the hours
to the busy throng below. When the church was on fire,
either from infirmity, or want of thought, the old man
remained
at his post. In the terrible confusion of the blazing
city, no one thought of him, till the high steeple was seen
wreathed with flame. As the throng gazed upward, the
firm walls of the old church, that had stood for ages, began to
shake. At that moment the bells sounded the well-known
German Choral, which usually concludes the Protestant
8*
service, Nun danket alle GottNow all thank God.
Another moment, and there was an awful crash! The
bells, which had spoken into the hearts of so many
generations
,
went silent for ever. They and the old musician sunk
together into a fiery grave; but the echo of their chimes
goes sounding on through the far eternity.
They have a beautiful custom at Hamburg. At ten o'clock
in the morning, when men are hurrying hither and yon
in the great whirlpool of business, from the high church
tower comes down the sound of sacred music, from a large
and powerful horn appropriated to that service. It is as if
an angel spake from the clouds, reminding them of
immortality
.
You have doubtless heard of the mysterious music that
peals over the bay at West Pascagoula. It has for a long
time been one of the greatest wonders of the Southwest.
Multitudes have heard it, rising as it were from the water,
like the drone of a bagpipe, then floating awayaway
awayin the distancesoft, plaintive, and fairy-like, as if
olian harps sounded with richer melody through the
liquid element; but none have been able to account for the
beautiful phenomenon.
There are several legends touching these mysterious
sounds. One of them relates to the extinction of the
Pascagoula
tribe of Indians; the remnant of which, many years
ago, it is said, deliberately entered the waters of the bay
and drowned themselves, to escape capture and torture,
when attacked by a neighbouring formidable tribe. There
is another legend, as well authenticated as traditionary
history
can well be, to the effect, that about one hundred years
ago, three families of Spaniards, who had provoked the
resentment
of the Indians, were beset by the savages, and
to avoid massacre and pollution, marched into the bay, and
were drownedmen, women, and children. Tradition
adds, that the Spaniards went down to the waters following
a drum and pipe, and singing, as enthusiasts are said to do,
when about to commit self-immolation. Slaves in the
neighbourhood believe that the sounds, which sweep with
mournful cadence over the bay, are uttered by the spirits
of those hapless families; nor will any remonstrance against
the superstition abate their terror, when the wailing is
heard. Formerly, neither threats nor blows could induce
them to venture out after night; and to this day, it is
exceedingly
difficult to induce one of them to go in a boat alone
upon the quiet waters of Pascagoula Bay. One of them,
being asked by a recent traveller what he thought
occasioned
that music, replied:
Wall, I tinks it's dead folks come back agin; dat's
what I does. White people say it's dis ting and dat ting;
but it's noting, massa, but de ghosts of people wat didn't die
nat'rally in dere beds, long time agoIndians or Spaniards,
I believes dey was.
But does the music never frighten you?
Well, it does. Sometimes wen I'se out alone on de
bay in a skiff, and I hears it about, I always finds myself
in a perspiration; and de way I works my way home, is of
de fastest kind. I declare, de way I'se frightened
sometimes
,
is so bad, I doesn't know myself.
But in these days, few things are allowed to remain
mysterious
.
A correspondent of the Baltimore Republican
thus explains the music of the water-spirits:
During several of my voyages on the Spanish main, in
the neighbourhood of `Paraguay,' and San Juan de
Nicaragua
,
from the nature of the coast, we were compelled to
anchor at a considerable distance from the shore; and
every evening, from dark to late night, our ears were
delighted
with olian music, that could be heard beneath the
counter of our schooner. At first, I thought it was the
seabreeze
sweeping through the strings of my violin, (the
bridge of which I had inadvertently left standing;) but
after
examination, I found it was not so. I then placed my
ear on the rail of the vessel, when I was continually
charmed
with the most heavenly strains that ever fell upon my
ear. They did not sound as close to us, but were sweet,
mellow, and arial; like the soft breathings of a thousand
lutes, touched by fingers of the deep sea-nymphs, at an
immense
distance.
Although I have considerable `music in my soul,' one
night I became tired, and determined to fish. My luck in
half an hour was astonishing; I had half filled my bucket
with the finest white cat-fish I ever saw; and it being late,
and the cook asleep, and the moon shining, I filled my
bucket with water, and took fish and all into my cabin for
the night.
I had not yet fallen asleep, when the same sweet notes
fell upon my ear; and getting up, what was my surprise
to find my `cat fish' discoursing sweet sounds to the sides
of my bucket.
I examined them closely, and discovered that there was
attached to each lower lip an excrescence, divided by soft,
wiry fibres. By the pressure of the upper lip thereon,
and by the exhalation and discharge of breath, a vibration
was created, similar to that produced by the breath on the
tongue of the jew's-harp.
So you see the Naiads have a band to dance by. I
should like to have the mocking bird try his skill at
imitating
this submarine melody. You know the Bob-o'link
with his inimitable strain of linked sweetness, long drawn
out? At a farm-house occupied by my father-in-law, one
of these rich warblers came and seated himself on a rail
near the window, and began to sing. A cat-bird (our New
England mocking-bird) perched near, and began to imitate
the notes. The short, quick, bob-a-link, bob-a-link,
he could master very well; but when it came to the
prolonged
trill of gushing melody, at the close of the strain
the imitator stopped in the midst. Again the bob-o'-link
poured forth his soul in song; the mocking-bird hopped
nearer, and listened most intently. Again he tried; but it
was all in vain. The bob-o'-link, as if conscious that none
could imitate his God-given tune, sent forth a clearer,
stronger, richer strain than ever. The mocking bird
evidently
felt that his reputation was at stake. He warbled
all kinds of notes in quick succession. You would have
thought the house was surrounded by robins, sparrows,
whippowills, black-birds, and linnets. Having shown off
his accomplishments, he again tried his powers on the
alltogether
inimitable trill. The effort he made was
prodigious
;
but it was mere talent trying to copy genius. He
couldn't do it. He stopped, gasping, in the midst of the
prolonged melody, and flew away abruptly, in evident
vexation
.
Music, like everything else, is now passing from the
few to the many. The art of printing has laid before the
multitude the written wisdom of ages, once locked up in
the elaborate manuscripts of the cloister. Engraving and
daguerreotype spread the productions of the pencil before
the whole people. Music is taught in our common schools,
and the cheap accordion brings its delights to the humblest
class of citizens. All these things are full of prophecy.
Slowly, slowly, to the measured sound of the spirit's
music
,
there goes round the world the golden band of
brotherhood
;
slowly, slowly, the earth comes to its place, and
makes a chord with heaven.
Sing on, thou true-hearted, and be not discouraged! If
a harp be in perfect tune, and a flute, or other instrument
of music, be near it, and in perfect tune also, thou canst
not play on one without wakening an answer from the
other. Behold, thou shalt hear its sweet echo in the air,
as if played on by the invisible. Even so shall other
spirits
vibrate to the harmony of thine. Utter what God
giveth
thee to say. In the sunny West Indies, in gay and
graceful Paris, in frozen Iceland, and the deep stillness of
the Hindoo jungle, thou wilt wake a slumbering echo, to
be carried on for ever through the universe. In word and
act sing thou of united truth and love; another voice shall
take up the strain over the waters; soon it will become a
WORLD CONCERT;and thou above there, in that realm of
light and love, well pleased wilt hear thy early song, in
earth's sweet vibration to the harps of heaven.
LETTER XXVIII.
September 29, 1842.
I wish I could walk abroad without having misery forced
on my notice, which I have no power to relieve. The
other day, I looked out of my window, and saw a tall,
gaunt-looking woman leading a little ragged girl, of five or
six years old. The child carried a dirty little basket, and
I observed that she went up to every door, and stood on
tiptoe to reach the bell. From every one, as she held up
her little basket, she turned away, and came down the steps
so wearily, and looked so sadso very sad. I saw this
repeated at four or five doors, and my heart began to swell
within me. I cannot endure this, thought I: I must
buy whatever her basket contains. Then prudence
answered
,
Where's the use? Don't you meet twenty
objects
more wretched every day? Where can you stop?
I moved from my window; but as I did so, I saw my
guardian angel turn away in sorrow. I felt that neither
incense nor anthem would rise before God from that selfish
second thought. I went to the door. Another group of
suffering wretches were coming from the other end of the
street; and I turned away again, with the feeling that there
was no use in attending to the hopeless mass of misery
around me. I should have closed the door, perhaps, but
as the little girl came near, I saw on her neck a cross, with
a rudely carved image of the crucified Saviour. Oh,
blessed Jesus! friend of the poor, the suffering, and the
guilty, who is like thee to guide the erring soul, and soften
the selfish heart? The tears gushed to my eyes. I
bought from the little basket a store of matches for a year.
The woman offered me change; but I could not take it in
sight of that cross. In the Saviour's name, take it all,
I said, and buy clothes for that little one. A gleam
lighted up the woman's hard features; she looked surprised
and grateful. But the child grabbed at the money, with a
hungry avarice, that made my very heart ache. Hardship,
privation, and perchance severity, had changed the genial
heart-warmth, the gladsome thoughtlessness of childhood,
into the grasping sensuality of a world-trodden soul. It
seemed to me the saddest thing, that in all God's creation
there should be one such little child. I almost feared they
had driven the angels away from her. But it is not so.
Her
angel, too, does always stand before the face of her
Father, who is in Heaven.
This time, I yielded to the melting of my heart; but a
hundred times a week, I drive back the generous impulse,
because I have not the means to gratify it. This is the
misery of a city like New-York, that a kindly spirit not only
suffers continual pain, but is obliged to do itself perpetual
wrong. At times, I almost fancy I can feel myself turning
to stone by inches. Gladly, oh, how gladly, do I hail any
little sunbeam of love, that breaks through this cloud of
misery and wrong.
The other day, as I came down Broome-street, I saw a
street musician, playing near the door of a genteel dwelling.
The organ was uncommonly sweet and mellow in its tones,
the tunes were slow and plaintive, and I fancied that I saw
in the woman's Italian face an expression that indicated
sufficient refinement to prefer the tender and the
melancholy
,
to the lively trainer tunes in vogue with the
populace
.
She looked like one who had suffered much, and the
sorrowful music seemed her own appropriate voice. A
little
girl clung to her scanty garments, as if afraid of all
things but her mother. As I looked at them, a young lady
of pleasing countenance opened the window, and began to
sing like a bird, in keeping with the street organ. Two
other young girls came and leaned on her shoulder; and still
she sang on. Blessings on her gentle heart! It was
evidently
the spontaneous gush of human love and sympathy.
The beauty of the incident attracted attention. A group of
gentlemen gradually collected round the organist; and
ever as the tune ended, they bowed respectfully toward the
window, waved their hats, and called out, More, if you
please! One, whom I knew well for the kindest and truest
soul, passed round his hat; hearts were kindled, and the
silver fell in freely. In a minute, four or five dollars were
collected for the poor woman. She spoke no word of
gratitude, but she gave
such
a look! Will you go to the
next street, and play to a friend of mine? said my
kindhearted
friend. She answered, in tones expressing the
deepest
emotion, No, sir, God bless you allGod bless you
all,
(making a courtesy to the young lady, who had stept
back, and stood sheltered by the curtain of the window,)
I will play no more to-day; I will go home, now. The
tears trickled down her cheeks, and as she walked away,
she ever and anon wiped her eyes with the corner of her
shawl. The group of gentlemen lingered a moment to look
after her, then turning toward the now closed window, they
gave three enthusiastic cheers, and departed, better than
they came. The pavement on which they stood had been
a church to them; and for the next hour, at least, their
hearts were more than usually prepared for deeds of
gentleness
and mercy. Why are such scenes so uncommon?
Why do we thus repress our sympathies, and chill the
genial current of nature, by formal observances and restraints?
I thank my heavenly Father for every manifestation of
human love. I thank him for all experiences, be they
sweet or bitter, which help me to forgive all things, and to
enfold the whole world with blessing. What shall be our
reward, says Swedenborg, for loving our neighbour
as
ourselves in this life? That when we become angels, we
shall be enabled to love him
better
than ourselves. This
is a reward pure and holy; the only one, which my heart
has not rejected, whenever offered as an incitement to
goodness
.
It is this chiefly which makes the happiness of
lovers more nearly allied to heaven, than any other emotions
experienced by the human heart. Each loves the other
better than himself; each is willing to sacrifice all to the
othernay, finds joy therein. This it is that surrounds
them with a golden atmosphere, and tinges the world with
rose-colour. A mother's love has the same angelic
character
;
more completely unselfish, but lacking the charm
of perfect reciprocity.
The cure for all the ills and wrongs, the cares, the
sorrows
,
and the crimes of humanity, all lie in that one word,
LOVE. It is the divine vitality that everywhere produces
and restores life. To each and every one of us it gives the
power of working miracles, if we will.
Love is the story without an end, that angels throng to hear;
The word, the king of words, carved on Jehovah's heart.
From the highest to the lowest, all feel its influence, all
acknowledge its sway. Even the poor, despised donkey is
changed by its magic influence. When coerced and beaten,
he is vicious, obstinate, and stupid. With the peasantry
of Spain, he is a petted favourite, almost an inmate of the
household. The children bid him welcome home, and the
wife feeds him from her hands. He knows them all, and
he loves them all, for he feels in his inmost heart that they
all love him. He will follow his master, and come and go
at his bidding, like a faithful dog; and he delights to take
the baby on his back, and walk him round, gently, on the
greensward. His intellect expands, too, in the sunshine
of affection; and he that is called the stupidest of animals
becomes sagacious. A Spanish peasant had for many years
carried milk into Madrid, to supply a set of customers.
Every morning, he and his donkey, with loaded panniers,
trudged the well known round. At last, the peasant became
very ill, and had no one to send to market. His wife
proposed
to send the faithful old animal by himself. The
panniers
were accordingly filled with cannisters of milk, an
inscription, written by the priest, requested customers to
measure their own milk, and return the vessels; and the
donkey was instructed to set off with his load. He went,
and returned in due time with empty cannisters; and this
he continued to do for several days. The house bells in
Madrid are usually so constructed that you pull downward
to make them ring. The peasant afterward learned that
his sagacious animal stopped before the door of every
customer
,
and after waiting what he deemed a sufficient time,
pulled the bell with his mouth. If affectionate treatment
will thus idealize the jackass, what may it not do?
Assuredly
there is no limit to its power. It can banish crime,
and make this earth an Eden.
The best tamer of colts that was ever known in
Massachusetts
,
never allowed whip or spur to be used; and the
horses he trained never
needed
the whip. Their spirits
were unbroken by severity, and they obeyed the slightest
impulse of the voice or rein, with the most animated
promptitude
;
but rendered obedient to affection, their vivacity
was always restrained by graceful docility. He said it
was with horses as with children; if accustomed to beating,
they would not obey without it. But if managed with
untiring
gentleness, united with consistent and very equable
firmness, the victory once gained over them, was gained
for ever.
In the face of all these facts, the world goes on
manufacturing
whips, spurs, the gallows, and chains; while each
one carries within his own soul a divine substitute for these
devil's inventions, with which he
might
work miracles,
inward
and outward, if he
would
. Unto this end let us work
with unfaltering faith. Great is the strength of an
individual
soul, true to its high trust;mighty is it even to the
redemption of a world.
A German, whose sense of sound was exceedingly
acute, was passing by a church, a day or two after he had
landed in this country, and the sound of music attracted
him to enter, though he had no knowledge of our
language
.
The music proved to be a piece of nasal
psalmody
,
sung in most discordant fashion; and the sensitive
German would fain have covered his ears. As this was
scarcely civil, and might appear like insanity, his next
impulse was to rush into the open air, and leave the hated
sounds behind him. But this, too, I feared to do, said
he, lest offence might be given; so I resolved to endure
the torture with the best fortitude I could assume; when
lo! I distinguished, amid the din, the soft clear voice of a
woman singing in perfect tune. She made no effort to
drown the voices of her companions, neither was she
disturbed
by their noisy discord; but patiently and sweetly
she sang in full, rich tones: one after another yielded to
the gentle influence; and before the tune was finished, all
were in perfect harmony.
I have often thought of this story as conveying an
instructive
lesson for reformers. The spirit that
can
thus
sing patiently and sweetly in a world of discord, must
indeed be of the strongest, as well as the gentlest kind.
One scarce can hear his own soft voice amid the braying
of the multitude; and ever and anon comes the temptation
to sing louder than they, and drown the voices that
cannot
thus be
forced
into perfect tune. But this were a pitiful
experiment; the melodious tones, cracked into shrillness,
would only increase the tumult.
Stronger, and more frequently, comes the temptation to
stop singing, and let discord do its own wild work. But
blessed are they that endure to the endsinging patiently
and sweetly, till all join in with loving acquiescence, and
universal harmony prevails, without forcing into submission
the free discord of a single voice.
This is the hardest and the bravest task, which a true
soul has to perform amid the clashing elements of time.
But
once
has it been done perfectly, unto the end; and that
voice, so clear in its meekness, is heard above all the din
of a tumultuous world; one after another chimes in with
its patient sweetness; and, through infinite discords, the
listening soul can perceive that the great tune is slowly
coming into harmony.
LETTER XXIX.
October 6, 1842.
I went last week to Blackwell's island, in the East river,
between the city and Long Island. The environs of the
city are unusually beautiful, considering how far Autumn
has advanced upon us. Frequent rains have coaxed
vegetation
into abundance, and preserved it in verdant beauty.
The trees are hung with a profusion of vines, the rocks are
dressed in nature's green velvet of moss, and from every little
cleft peeps the rich foliage of some wind-scattered seed.
The island itself presents a quiet loveliness of scenery,
unsurpassed
by anything I have ever witnessed; though
Nature
and I are old friends, and she has shown me many of
her choicest pictures, in a light let in only from above. No
form of gracefulness can compare with the bend of flowing
waters all round and round a verdant island. The circle
typifies Love; and they who read the spiritual alphabet,
will see that a circle of
waters
must needs be very beautiful.
Beautiful it
is,
even when the language it speaks is an
unknown
tongue. Then the green hills beyond look so very
pleasant in the sunshine, with
homes
nestling among them,
like dimples on a smiling face. The island itself abounds
with charming nooksopen wells in shady places,
screened
by large weeping willows; gardens and arbors running
down to the river's edge, to look at themselves in the
waters
;
and pretty boats, like white-winged birds, chased by
their shadows, and breaking the waves into gems.
But man has profaned this charming retreat. He has
brought the screech-owl, the bat, and the vulture, into the
holy temple of Nature. The island belongs to government;
and the only buildings on it are penitentiary, mad house,
and hospital; with a few dwellings occupied by people
connected with those institutions. The discord between
man and nature never before struck me so painfully; yet it
is wise and kind to place the erring and the diseased in the
midst of such calm, bright influences. Man may curse, but
Nature for ever blesses. The guiltiest of her wandering
children she would fain enfold within her arms to the
friendly
heart-warmth of a mother's bosom. She speaks to them
ever in the soft, low tones of earnest love; but they, alas,
tossed on the roaring, stunning surge of society, forget the
quiet language.
As I looked up at the massive walls of the prison, it did
my heart good to see doves nestling within the shelter of
the deep, narrow, grated windows. I thought what blessed
little messengers of heaven they would appear to me, if I
were in prison; but instantly a shadow passed over the
sunshine
of my thought. Alas, doves do not speak to their
souls, as they would to mine; for they have lost their love
for child-like, and gentle things.
How
have they lost it?
Society with its unequal distribution, its perverted
education
,
its manifold injustice, its cold neglect, its biting
mockery, has taken from them the gifts of God. They are
placed here, in the midst of green hills, and flowing streams,
and cooing doves, after the heart is petrified against the
genial
influence of all such sights and sounds.
As usual, the organ of justice (which phrenologists say
is unusually developed in my head) was roused into great
activity by the sight of prisoners. Would you have them
prey on society? said one of my companions. I
answered
,
I am troubled that society has preyed upon them. I
will not enter into an argument about the right of society
to punish these sinners; but I say she
made
them sinners.
How much I have done toward it, by yielding to popular
prejudices, obeying false customs, and suppressing vital
truths, I know not; but doubtless I have done, and am
doing
,
my share. God forgive me. If He dealt with us, as
we deal with our brother, who could stand before Him?
While I was there, they brought in the editors of the
Flash, the Libertine, and the Weekly Rake. My very soul
loathes such polluted publications; yet a sense of justice
again made me refractory. These men were perhaps
trained to such service by all the social influences they had
ever known. They dared to
publish
what nine tenths of
all around them lived unreproved. Why should they be
imprisoned, whileflourished in the full tide of
editorial success, circulating a paper as immoral, and
perhaps
more dangerous, because its indecency is slightly
veiled? Why should the Weekly Rake be shut up, when
daily rakes walk Broadway in fine broadcloth and silk
velvet?
Many more than half the inmates of the penitentiary
were women; and of course a large proportion of them
were taken up as street-walkers. The men who made
them such, who, perchance, caused the love of a human
heart to be its ruin, and changed tenderness into sensuality
and crimethese men live in the ceiled houses of
Broadway
,
and sit in council in the City Hall, and pass
regulations
to clear the streets they have filled with sin. And
do you suppose their poor victims do not
feel
the injustice
of society thus regulated? Think you they respect the
laws?
Vicious they are, and they may be both ignorant
and foolish; but, nevertheless, they are too wise to respect
such laws. Their whole being cries out that it is a
mockery
;
all their experience proves that society is a game of
chance, where the cunning slip through, and the strong
leap over. The criminal
feels
this, even when incapable
of
reasoning
upon it. The laws do not secure his
reverence
,
because he sees that their operation is unjust. The
secrets of prisons, so far as they are revealed, all tend to
show that the prevailing feeling of criminals, of all grades,
is that they are
wronged
. What we call
justice,
they
regard
as an unlucky
chance;
and whosoever looks calmly
and wisely into the foundations on which society rolls and
tumbles, (I cannot say on which it
rests,
for its foundations
heave like the sea,) will perceive that they are victims of
chance.
For instance, everything in school-books, social remarks,
domestic conversation, literature, public festivals,
legislative
proceedings, and popular honours, all teach the young
soul that it is noble to retaliate, mean to forgive an insult,
and unmanly not to resent a wrong. Animal instincts,
instead
of being brought into subjection to the higher
powers
of the soul, are thus cherished into more than natural
activity. Of three men thus educated, one enters the army,
kills a hundred Indians, hangs their scalps on a tree, is
made major general, and considered a fitting candidate for
the presidency. The second goes to the Southwest to
reside
;
some roarer calls him a rascala phrase not
misapplied, perhaps, but necessary to be resented; he
agrees to settle the question of honour at ten paces, shoots
his insulter through the heart, and is hailed by society as a
brave man. The third lives in New-York; a man enters
his office, and, true or untrue, calls him a knave. He fights,
kills his adversary, is tried by the laws of the land, and
hung. These three men indulged the same passion, acted
from the same motives, and illustrated the same education;
yet how different their fate!
With regard to dishonesty, toothe maxims of trade, the
customs of society, and the general unreflecting tone of
public conversation, all tend to promote it. The man who
has made good bargains, is wealthy and honoured; yet
the details of those bargains few would dare to pronounce
good. Of two young men nurtured under such influences,
one becomes a successful merchant; five thousand dollars
are borrowed of him; he takes a mortgage on a house
worth twenty thousand dollars; in the absence of the
owner, when sales are very dull, he offers the house for
sale, to pay his mortgage; he bids it in himself, for four
thousand dollars; and afterwards persecutes and
imprisons
his debtor for the remaining thousand. Society
calls him a shrewd business man, and pronounces his
dinners
excellent; the chance is, he will be a magistrate
before
he dies.The other young man is unsuccessful; his
necessities are great; he borrows some money from his
employer's drawer, perhaps resolving to restore the same;
the loss is discovered before he has a chance to refund it;
and society sends him to Blackwell's island, to hammer
stone with highway robbers. Society made both these men
thieves; but punished the one, while she rewarded the
other. That criminals so universally
feel
themselves
victims
of injustice, is one strong proof that it is true; for
impressions
entirely without foundation are not apt to become
universal. If society does make its own criminals, how
shall she cease to do it? It can be done only by a change
in the structure of society, that will diminish the
temptations
to vice, and increase the encouragements to virtue.
If we can abolish
poverty,
we shall have taken the greatest
step toward the abolition of
crime;
and this will be the
final triumph of the gospel of Christ. Diversities of gifts
will doubtless always exist; for the law written on spirit, as
well as matter, is infinite variety. But when the kingdom
of God comes on earth as it is in heaven, there will
not be found in any corner of it that poverty which hardens
the heart under the severe pressure of physical suffering,
and stultifies the intellect with toil for mere animal wants.
When public opinion regards wealth as a
means,
and not
as an
end,
men will no longer deem penitentiaries a
necessary
evil; for society will then cease to be a great school
for crime. In the meantime, do penitentiaries and prisons
increase or diminish the evils they are intended to remedy?
The superintendent at Blackwell told me, unasked, that
ten years' experience had convinced him that the whole
system tended to
increase
crime. He said of the lads who
came there, a large proportion had already been in the
house of refuge; and a large proportion of those who left,
afterward went to Sing Sing. It is as regular a
succession
as the classes in a college, said he, from the house
of refuge to the penitentiary, and from the penitentiary to the
State prison. I remarked that coercion tended to rouse all
the bad passions in man's nature, and if long continued,
hardened the whole character. I know that, said he,
from my own experience; all the devil there is in me
rises up when a man attempts to compel me. But what
can I do? I am
obliged
to be very strict. When my
feelings
tempt me to unusual indulgence, a bad use is almost
9
always made of it. I see that the system fails to produce
the effect intended; but I cannot change the result.
I felt that his words were true. He could not change
the influence of the system while he discharged the duties
of his office; for the same reason that a man cannot be at
once slave-driver and missionary on a plantation. I allude
to the necessities of the office, and do not mean to imply
that the character of the individual was severe. On the
contrary, the prisoners seemed to be made as comfortable
as was compatible with their situation. There were
watch-towers
,
with loaded guns, to prevent escape from the island;
but they conversed freely with each other as they worked
in the sunshine, and very few of them looked wretched.
Among those who were sent under guard to row us back to
the city, was one who jested on his own situation, in a
manner which showed plainly enough that he looked on
the whole thing as a game of chance, in which he
happened
to be the loser. Indulgence cannot benefit such characters.
What is wanted is, that no human being should grow up
without deep and friendly interest from the society round
him; and that none should feel himself the victim of
injustice
,
because society punishes the very sins which it teaches,
nay drives men to commit. The world would be in a
happier
condition if legislators spent half as much time and
labour to
prevent
crime, as they do to
punish
it. The poor
need houses of
encouragement;
and society gives them
houses of
correction
. Benevolent institutions and
reformatory
societies perform but a limited and temporary use.
They do not reach the ground-work of evil; and it is
reproduced
too rapidly for them to keep even the surface
healed. The natural, spontaneous influences of society
should be such as to supply men with healthy motives, and
give full, free play to the affections, and the faculties. It
is horrible to see our young men goaded on by the fierce,
speculating spirit of the age, from the contagion of which
it is almost impossible to escape, and then see them tortured
into madness, or driven to crime, by fluctuating changes
of the money-market. The young soul is, as it were,
entangled
in the great merciless machine of a
falsely-constructed
society; the steam he had no hand in raising,
whirls him hither and thither, and it is altogether a
lottery-chance
whether it crushes or propels him.
Many, who are mourning over the too obvious diseases
of the world, will smile contemptuously at the idea of
reconstruction
.
But let them reflect a moment upon the
immense
changes that have already come over society. In the
middle ages, both noble and peasant would have laughed
loud and long at the prophecy of such a state of society as
now exists in the free States of America; yet here we are!
I by no means underrate modern improvements in the
discipline
of prisons, or progressive meliorations in the
criminal
code. I rejoice in these things as facts, and still more
as prophecy. Strong as my faith is that the time will come
when war and prisons will both cease from the face of
the earth, I am by no means blind to the great difficulties
in the way of those who are honestly striving to make the
best of things as they
are
. Violations of right, continued
generation after generation, and interwoven into the whole
structure of action and opinion, will continue troublesome and
injurious, even for a long time after they are outwardly
removed
.
Legislators and philanthropists may well be puzzled
to know what to do with those who have become hardened in
crime; meanwhile, the highest wisdom should busy itself
with the more important questions.How did these men
become
criminals? Are not social influences largely at
fault? If society is the criminal, were it not well to
reform
society?
It is common to treat the inmates of penitentiaries and
prisons as if they were altogether unlike ourselvesas if
they belonged to another race; but this indicates
superficial
thought and feeling. The passions which carried
those men to prison exist in your own bosom, and have been
gratified, only in a less degree: perchance, if you look
inward, with enlightened self-knowledge, you will
perceive
that there have been periods in your own life when
a hair's-breadth further in the wrong would have rendered
you amenable to human laws; and that you were prevented
from moving over that hair's breadth boundary by outward
circumstances, for which you deserve no credit.
If reflections like these make you think lightly of sin,
you pervert them to a very bad use. They
should
teach you
that every criminal has a human heart, which
can
be reached
and softened by the same means that will reach and soften
your own. In all, even the most hardened, love lies
folded
up, perchance buried; and the voice of love calls it
forth, and makes it gleam like living coals through ashes.
This influence, if applied in season, would assuredly
prevent
the hardness, which it has so much power to soften.
That most tender-spirited and beautiful book, entitled
My Prisons, by Sylvio Pellico, abounds with incidents
to prove the omnipotence of kindness. He was a gentle
and a noble soul, imprisoned merely for reasons of state,
being suspected of republican notions. Robbers and
banditti
,
confined in the same building, saluted him with
respect
as they passed him in the court; and he always
returned
their salutations with brotherly cordiality. He says,
One of them once said to me, `Your greeting, signore,
does me good. Perhaps you see something in my face
that is not very bad? An unhappy passion led me to
commit
a crime; but oh, signore, I am not, indeed I am not
a villain.' And he burst into tears. I held out my hand
to him, but he could not take it. My guards, not from bad
feeling, but in obedience to orders, repulsed him.
In the sight of God, perchance their repulse was a
heavier
crime than that for which the poor fellow was
imprisoned
;
perhaps it
made
him a villain, when the genial
influence of Sylvio Pellico might have restored him a
blessing
to the human family. If these things
are
so, for what
a frightful amount of crime are the coercing and repelling
influences of society responsible!
I have not been happy since that visit to Blackwell's
Island. There is something painful, yea, terrific, in
feeling
myself involved in the great wheel of society, which
goes whirling on, crushing thousands at every turn. This
relation of the individual to the mass is the sternest and
most frightful of all the conflicts between necessity and free
will. Yet here, too, conflict
should
be harmony, and
will
be so. Put far away from thy soul all desire of retaliation,
all angry thoughts, all disposition to overcome or
humiliate
an adversary, and be assured thou hast done much to
abolish gallows, chains, and prisons, though thou hast never
written or spoken a word on the criminal code.
God and good angels alone know the vast, the
incalculable
influence that goes out into the universe of spirit, and
thence flows into the universe of matter, from the
conquered
evil, and the voiceless prayer, of one solitary soul.
Wouldst thou bring the world unto God? Then live near
to him thyself. If divine life pervade thine own soul, every
thing that touches thee will receive the electric spark,
though thou mayest be unconscious of being charged
therewith
.
This surely would be the highest, to strive to keep
near the holy, not for the sake of our own reward here or
hereafter, but that through love to God we might bless our
neighbour. The human soul can perceive this, and yet the
beauty of the earth is everywhere defaced with jails and
gibbets! Angelic natures can never deride, else were there
loud laughter in heaven at the discord between man's
perceptions
and his practice.
At Long Island Farms I found six hundred children,
supported
by the public. It gives them wholesome food,
comfortable
clothing, and the common rudiments of education.
For this it deserves praise. But the aliment which the
spirit craves, the
public
has not to give. The young heart
asks for
love,
yearns for lovebut its own echo returns to
it through empty halls, instead of answer.
The institution is much lauded by visiters, and not
without
reason; for every thing looks clean and comfortable,
and the children appear happy. The drawbacks are such
as inevitably belong to their situation, as children of the
public. The oppressive feeling is, that there are no
mothers
there. Every thing moves by machinery, as it
always
must with masses of children, never subdivided into
families. In one place, I saw a stack of small wooden
guns, and was informed that the boys were daily drilled
to military exercises, as a useful means of forming habits of
order, as well as fitting them for the future service of the
state. Their infant school evolutions partook of the same
drill character; and as for their religion, I was informed
that it was beautiful to see them pray; for at the first tip
of the whistle, they all dropped on their knees. Alas,
poor childhood, thus doth church and state provide for
thee! The state arms thee with wooden guns, to play the
future murderer, and the church teaches thee to pray in
platoons
,
at the first tip of the whistle. Luckily they
cannot
drive the angels from thee, or most assuredly they would
do it,
pro bono publico
.
The sleeping-rooms were clean as a Shaker's apron.
When I saw the long rows of nice little beds, ranged side
by side, I inquired whether there was not a merry buzz
in the morning. They are not permitted to speak at all
in the sleeping apartments, replied the superintendent.
The answer sent a chill through my heart. I
acknowledged
that in such large establishments the most exact method
was necessary, and I knew that the children had abundant
opportunity for fun and frolic in the sunshine and the open
fields, in the after part of the day; but it is so natural for
all young things to crow and sing when they open their
eyes to the morning light, that I could not bear to have the
cheerful instinct perpetually repressed.
The hospital for these children is on the neighbouring
island of Blackwell. This establishment, though clean
and well supplied with outward comforts, was the most
painful sight I ever witnessed. About one hundred and
fifty children were there, mostly orphans, inheriting every
variety of disease from vicious and sickly parents. In beds
all of a row, or rolling by dozens over clean matting on the
floor, the poor little pale, shrivelled, and blinded creatures
were waiting for death to come and release them. Here
the absence of a mother's love was most agonizing; not
even the patience and gentleness of a saint could supply
its place; and saints are rarely hired by the public. There
was a sort of resignation expressed in the countenances of
some of the little ones, which would have been beautiful
in maturer years, but in childhood it spoke mournfully of a
withered soul. It was pleasant to think that a large
proportion
of them would soon be received by the angels, who
will doubtless let them sing in the morning.
That the law of Love may cheer and bless even public
establishments, has been proved by the example of the
Society of Friends. They formerly had an establishment
for their own poor, in the city of Philadelphia, on a plan so
simple and so beautiful, that one cannot but mourn to think
it has given place to more common and less brotherly modes
of relief. A nest of small households enclosed, on three
sides, an open space devoted to gardens, in which each
had a share. Here each poor family lived in separate
rooms, and were assisted by the Society, according to its
needs. Sometimes a widow could support herself, with
the exception of rent; and in that case, merely rooms were
furnished gratis. An aged couple could perhaps subsis
very comfortably, if supplied with house and fuel; and the
friendly assistance was according to their wants. Some
needed entire support; and to such it was ungrudgingly
given. These paupers were oftentimes ministers and
elders, took the highest seats in the meeting-house, and had
as much influence as any in the affairs of the Society.
Everything conspired to make them retain undiminished
self-respect. The manner in which they evinced this
would be considered impudence in the tenants of our modern
alms-houses. One old lady being supplied with a load of
wood at her free lodgings, refused to take it, saying, that
it did not suit her; she wanted dry, small wood. But,
remonstrated the man. I was ordered to bring it here.
I can't help that. Tell 'em the best wood is the best
economy. I do not want such wood as that. Her orders
were obeyed, and the old lady's wishes were gratified.
Another, who took great pride and pleasure in the neatness
of her little garden, employed a carpenter to make a trellis
for her vines. Some objection was made to paying this
bill, it being considered a mere superfluity. But the old
lady maintained that it was necessary for her comfort; and
at meetings and all public places, she never failed to rebuke
the elders. O
you
profess to do unto others as you would
be done by, and you have never paid that carpenter his
bill. Worn out by her perseverance, they paid the bill,
and she kept her trellis of vines. It probably was more
necessary to her comfort than many things
they
would
have considered as not superfluous.
The poor of this establishment did not feel like
dependents
,
and were never regarded as a burden. They
considered themselves as members of a family, receiving
from brethren the assistance they would have gladly
bestowed
under a reverse of circumstances. This approaches
the gospel standard. Since the dawn of Christianity, no
class of people have furnished an example so replete with
a most wise tenderness, as the Society of Friends, in the
days of its purity. Thank God, nothing good or true ever
dies. The lifeless form falls from it, and it lives elsewhere.
LETTER XXX.
November 13, 1842.
Oh, who that has not been shut up in the great
prison-cell
of a city, and made to drink of its brackish springs,
can estimate the blessings of the Croton Aqueduct? clean,
sweet, abundant water! Well might they bring it thirty
miles under-ground, and usher it into the city with roaring
cannon, sonorous bells, waving flags, floral canopies, and a
loud chorus of song!
I shall never forget my sensations when I first looked
upon the Fountains. My soul jumped, and clapped its
hands, rejoicing in exceeding beauty. I am a novice, and
easily made wild by the play of graceful forms; but those
accustomed to the splendid displays of France and Italy,
say the world offers nothing to equal the magnificence of
the New-York
jets
. There is such a head of water, that
it throws the column sixty feet into the air, and drops it
into the basin in a shower of diamonds. The one in the
Park, opposite the Astor house, consists of a large central
pipe, with eighteen subordinate jets in a basin a hundred
feet broad. By shifting the plate on the conduit pipe, these
fountains can be made to assume various shapes: The
Maid of the Mist, the Croton Plume, the Vase, the Dome,
the Bouquet, the Sheaf of Wheat, and the Weeping-willow.
As the sun shone on the sparkling drops, through mist and
feathery foam, rainbows glimmered at the sides, as if they
came to celebrate a marriage between Spirits of Light and
Water Nymphs.
9*
The fountain in Union Park is smaller, but scarcely less
beautiful. It is a weeping willow of crystal drops; but one
can see that it weeps for
joy
. Now it leaps and sports as
gracefully as Undine in her wildest moods, and then sinks
into the vase under a veil of woven pearl, like the
undulating
farewell courtesy of her fluid relations. On the
evening of the great Croton celebration, they illuminated
this Fountain with coloured fireworks, kindling the cloud of
mist with many-coloured gems; as if the Water Spirits had
had another wedding with Fairies of the Diamond Mines.
I went out to Harlaem, the other day, to see the great
jet of water, which there rises a hundred feet into the air,
and falls through a belt of rainbows. Water
will
rise to its
level, as surely as the morality of a nation, or a sect, rises
to its idea of God. They to whom God is the
Almighty,
rather than the Heavenly
Father,
do not understand that the
highest ideal of Justice is perfect and universal Love.
They
cannot
perceive this: for both spiritually and naturally
water never rises above the level of its source. But how
sublimely it rushes upward to
find
its level! As I gazed
in loving wonder on that beautiful column, it seemed to me
a fitting type of those pure, free spirits, who, at the
smallest
opening, spring upward to the highest, revealing to all
mankind the true level of the religious idea of their age.
But, alas, here is the stern old conflict between Necessity
and Freewill. The column, by the law of its being,
would rise
quite
to the level of its source; but as the
impulse
,
that sent it forth in such glorious majesty, expends
itself, the
lateral pressure
overpowers the leaping waters,
and sends them downward in tears.
If we had a tube high enough to defend the struggling
water from surrounding pressure, it would rise to its level.
Will society ever be so constructed as to enable us to do
this spiritually? It
must
be so, before, Holiness to the
Lord, is written on the bells of the horses.
I told my beloved friends, as we stood gazing on that
magnificent jet of water, that its grandeur and its
gracefulness
revealed much, and promised more. They smiled,
and reminded me that it was a canon of criticism, laid
down by Blair, never to liken the natural to the spiritual.
I have no dispute with those who let down an iron-barred
portcullis between matter and spirit. The winged soul
flies over, and sees the whole as one fair region, golden
with the same sunlight, fresh with the same breezes from
heaven.
But I must not offer sybilline leaves in the market. Who
will buy them? The question shows that my spirit likewise
feels the
lateral pressure
. Would I could turn downward
as gracefully as the waters! uniting the upward and the
downward tendency in an arch so beautiful, and every drop
sparkling as it falls into the common reservoir, whence
future fountains shall gush in perpetual beauty.
I am again violating Blair's injunction. His iron gate
rolls away like a stage curtain, and lo, the whole region of
spiritual progress opens in glorious perspective! How
shall I get back to the actual, and stay there? If the
doctrine
of transmigration of souls were true, I should
assuredly
pass into a bird of Paradise, which forever floats in
the air, or if it touches the earth for a moment, is impatient
to soar again.
Strange material this for a reformer! And I tell you
plainly that reforming work lies around me like the ring
of Necessity, and ever and anon Freewill bites at the
circle. But this nesessity is only another name for
conscience
;
and that is the voice of God. I would not
unchain
Freewill, if I could; for if I did, the planets would
fly out of their places; for they, too, in their far off
splendour
,
are linked with every fragment we perceive of truth
and duty.
But there is a
false
necessity with which we
industriously
surround ourselves; a circle that never expands;
whose iron never changes to ductile gold. This is the
pressure of public opinion; the intolerable restraint of
conventional forms. Under this despotic influence, men
and women check their best impulses, suppress their
noblest
feelings, conceal their highest thoughts. Each longs
for full communion with other souls, but dares not give
utterance to its yearnings. What hinders? The fear of
what Mrs. Smith, or Mrs. Clark, will say; or the frown of
some sect; or the anathema of some synod; or the fashion
of some clique; or the laugh of some club; or the
misrepresentation
of some political party. Oh, thou foolish
soul! Thou art afraid of thy neighbour, and knowest not
that he is equally afraid of thee. He has bound thy hands,
and thou hast fettered his feet. It were wise for both to snap
the imaginary bonds, and walk onward unshackled. If thy
heart yearns for love,
be
loving; if thou wouldst free
mankind
,
be
free; if thou wouldst have a brother frank to thee,
be
frank to him.
Be
noble! and the nobleness that lies
In other men,
sleeping
but never
dead,
Will rise in majesty to meet thine own.
But what will people say?
Why does it concern thee
what
they say? Thy life is
not in their hands. They can give thee nothing of real
value, nor take from thee anything that is worth the having.
Satan may
promise
thee all the kingdoms of the earth, but
he has not an acre of it to give. He may
offer
much, as the
price of his worship, but there is a flaw in all his title deeds.
Eternal and sure is the promise, Blessed are the meek,
for
they
shall inherit the earth. Only have faith in this,
and thou wilt live high above the rewards and punishments
of that spectral giant, which men call Society.
But I shall be misunderstoodmisrepresented.
And what if thou art? They who throw stones at what
is above them, receive the missiles back again, by the law
of gravity; and lucky are they, if they bruise not their
own faces.
Would that I could persuade all who read this to be
truthful and free; to say what they think, and act what
they feel; to cast from them, like ropes of sand,
all
fear of
sects, and parties, and clans, and classes. Most earnestly
do I pray to be bound only by my own conscience, in that
circle of duties, which widens ever, till it enfolds all being,
and touches the throne of God.
What is there of joyful freedom in our social intercourse?
We meet to see each other; and not a peep do we get
under
the thick, stifling veil which each carries about him.
We visit to enjoy ourselves; and our host takes away all
our freedom, while we destroy his own. If the host wishes
to work or ride, he dare not, lest it seem unpolite to the
guest; if the guest wishes to read or sleep, he dare not,
lest it seem unpolite to the host; so they both remain
slaves, and feel it a relief to part company. A few
individuals
,
mostly in foreign lands, arrange this matter with
wiser freedom. If a visiter arrives, they say, I am busy
to-day; but if you wish to ride, there are horse and saddle
in the stable; if you wish to read, there are books in the
library; if you are inclined to music, flute and piano are in
the parlour; if you want to work, the men are raking hay
in the fields; if you want to romp, the children are at play in
the court; if you want to talk with me, I can be with you
at such an hour. Go when you please, and while you stay
do as you please.
At some houses in Florence, large parties meet, without
invitation, and with the slightest preparation. It is
understood
that on some particular evening of the week, a lady
or gentleman always receive their friends. In one room are
books, and busts, and flowers; in another, pictures and
engravings
;
in a third, music; couples are ensconced in
some sheltered alcove, or groups dotted about the rooms in
mirthful or serious conversation. No one is required to
speak to his host, either entering or departing. Lemonade
and baskets of fruit stand here and there on the side-tables,
that all may take who like; but
eating,
which constitutes
so large a part of all American entertainments, is a slight
and almost unnoticed incident in these festivals of
intellect
and taste. Wouldst thou like to see such social
freedom
introduced here? Then do it. But the first step must
be complete indifference to Mrs. Smith's assertion, that you
were mean enough to offer only one kind of cake to your
company, and to put less shortening in the under crust of
your pies than the upper. Let Mrs. Smith talk according
to her gifts; be thou assured that all
living
souls love
freedom
better than cake or under-crust.
Of
perfect
social freedom I never knew but one instance.
Doctor Hof Boston, coming home to dine one day,
found a very bright-looking handsome mulatto on the steps,
apparently about seven or eight years old. As he opened
the door, the boy glided in, as if it were his home. What
do you want? said the doctor. The child looked up with
smiling confidence, and answered, I am a little boy that
run away from Providence; and I want some dinner; and
I thought maybe you would give me some. His radiant
face, and child-like freedom operated like a charm. He
had a good dinner, and remained several days, becoming
more and more the pet of the whole household. He said
he had been cruelly treated by somebody in Providence,
and had run away; but the people he described could not
be found. The doctor thought it would not do to have him
growing up in idleness, and he tried to find a place where
he could run of errands, clean knives,
&c.,
for his living.
An hour after this was mentioned, the boy was missing.
In a few weeks, they heard of him in the opposite part of the
city, sitting on a door-step at dinner-time. When the door
opened, he walked in, smiling, and said, I am a little boy
that run away from Providence; and I want some dinner,
and I thought maybe you would give me some. He was
not mistaken this time either. The heart that trusted so
completely received a cordial welcome. After a time, it
was again proposed to find some place at service; and
straightway this human butterfly was off, no one knew
whither.
For several months no more was heard of him. But one
bright winter day, his first benefactor found him seated on
the steps of a house in Beacon-street. Why, Tom, where
did you come from? said he. I came from
Philadelphia
.
How upon earth did you get there? I heard
folks talk about New-York, and I thought I should like to
see it. So I went on board a steamboat; and when it put
off, the captain asked me who I was; and I told him that I
was a little boy that run away from Providence, and I
wanted
to go to New-York, but I hadn't any money. `You
little
rascal,' says he, `I'll throw you overboard.' `I don't
believe you will,' said I; and he didn't. I told him I was
hungry, and he gave me something to eat, and made up a
nice little bed for me. When I got to New-York, I went
and sat down on a door-step; and when the gentleman came
home to dinner, I went in, and told him that I was a little
boy that run away from Providence, and I was hungry.
So they gave me something to eat, and made up a nice
little
bed for me, and let me stay there. But I wanted to see
Philadelphia; so I went into a steamboat; and when they
asked me who I was, I told them that I was a little boy that
run away from Providence. They said I had no business
there, but they gave me an orange. When I got to
Philadelphia
,
I sat down on a door-step, and when the gentleman
came home to dinner, I told him I was a little boy that run
away from Providence, and I thought perhaps he would
give me something to eat. So they gave me a good
dinner
,
and made me up a nice little bed. Then I wanted to
come back to Boston; and everybody gave me something
to eat, and made me up a nice little bed. And I sat down
on this door-step, and when the lady asked me what I
wanted
,
I told her I was a little boy that run away from
Providence
,
and I was hungry. So she gave me something to
eat, and made me up a nice little bed; and I stay here, and
do her errands sometimes. Every body is very good to
me, and I like everybody.
He looked up with the most sunny gayety, and striking
his hoop as he spoke, went down the street like an arrow.
He disappeared soon after, probably in quest of new
adventures
.
I have never heard of him since; and sometimes
a painful fear passes through my mind that the kidnappers,
prowling about all our large towns, have carried him into
slavery.
The story had a charm for me, for two reasons. I was
delighted with the artless freedom of the winning, wayward
child; and still more did I rejoice in the perpetual
kindness
,
which everywhere gave it such friendly greeting.
Oh, if we
would
but dare to throw ourselves on each other's
hearts, how the image of heaven would be reflected all over
the face of this earth, as the clear blue sky lies mirrored in
the waters.
LETTER XXXI.
November 19, 1842.
To-day, I cannot write of beauty; for I am sad and
troubled. Heart, head, and conscience, are all in
battle-array
against the savage customs of my time. By and by,
the law of love, like oil upon the waters, will calm my
surging sympathies, and make the current flow more calmly,
though none the less deep or strong. But to-day, do not
ask me to love governor, sheriff or constable, or any man
who defends capital punishment. I ought to do it; for
genuine love enfolds even murderers with its blessing.
By to-morrow, I think I can remember them without
bitterness
;
but to-day, I cannot love them; on my soul, I cannot.
We were to have had an execution yesterday; but the
wretched prisoner avoided it by suicide. The gallows had
been erected for several hours, and with a cool refinement
of cruelty, was hoisted before the window of the
condemned
;
the hangman was all ready to cut the cord; marshals
paced back and forth, smoking and whistling; spectators
were waiting impatiently to see whether he would die
game. Printed circulars had been handed abroad to
summon
the number of witnesses required by law: You are
respectfully invited to witness the execution of John C.
Colt. I trust some of them are preserved for museums.
Specimens should be kept, as relics of a barbarous age, for
succeeding generations to wonder at. They might be hung
up in a frame; and the portrait of a New Zealand Chief,
picking the bones of an enemy of his tribe, would be an
appropriate
pendant.
This bloody insult was thrust into the hands of
some
citizens, who carried hearts under their vests, and they
threw it in tattered fragments to the dogs and swine, as
more fitting witnesses than human beings. It was
cheering
to those who have faith in human progress, to see how
many viewed the subject in this light. But as a general
thing, the very spirit of murder was rife among the dense
crowd, which thronged the place of execution. They were
swelling with revenge, and eager for blood. One man
came all the way from New Hampshire, on purpose to
witness
the entertainment; thereby showing himself a likely
subject for the gallows, whoever he may be.
Women
deemed
themselves not treated with becoming gallantry, because
tickets of admittance were denied
them;
and I think it
showed injudicious partiality; for many of them can be
taught murder by as short a lesson as any man, and sustain
it by arguments from Scripture, as ably as any theologian.
However,
they
were not admitted to this edifying exhibition
in the great school of public morals; and had only the
slim comfort of standing outside, in a keen November wind,
to catch the first toll of the bell, which would announce that
a human brother had been sent struggling into eternity by the
hand of violence. But while the multitude stood with open
watches, and strained ears to catch the sound, and the
marshals smoked and whistled, and the hangman walked
up and down, waiting for his prey, lo! word was brought
that the criminal was found dead in his bed! He had asked
one half hour alone to prepare his mind for departure; and
at the end of that brief interval, he was found with a dagger
thrust into his heart. The tidings were received with fierce
mutterings of disappointed rage. The throng beyond the
walls were furious to see him with their own eyes, to be
sure that he was dead. But when the welcome news met
my
ear, a tremendous load was taken from my heart. I
had no chance to analyze right and wrong; for over all
thought and feeling flowed impulsive joy, that this
Christian
community were cheated of a hanging. They who had
assembled to commit legalized murder, in cold blood, with
strange confusion of ideas, were unmindful of their own
guilt, while they talked of his suicide as a crime equal to
that for which he was condemned. I am willing to leave
it between him and his God. For myself, I would rather
have the burden of it on my own soul, than take the guilt
of those who would have executed a fellow-creature.
He
was driven to a fearful extremity of agony and desperation.
He was precisely in the situation of a man on board a
burning
ship, who being
compelled
to face death, jumps into the
waves, as the least painful mode of the two. But they, who
thus drove him to walk the plank, made cool, deliberate
preparations to take life, and with inventive cruelty sought
to add every bitter drop that
could
be added to the
dreadful
cup of vengeance.
To me, human life seems so sacred a thing, that its
violent
termination always fills me with horror, whether
perpetrated
by an individual or a crowd; whether done
contrary
to law and custom, or according to law and custom.
Why John C. Colt should be condemned to an ignominious
death for an act of resentment altogether unpremeditated,
while men, who deliberately, and with malice aforethought,
go out to murder another for some insulting word, are
judges, and senators in the land, and favourite candidates for
the President's chair, is more than I can comprehend.
There is, to say the least, a strange inconsistency in our
customs.
At the same moment that I was informed of the death of
the prisoner, I heard that the prison was on fire. It was
soon extinguished, but the remarkable coincidence added
not a little to the convulsive excitement of the hour. I
went with a friend to look at the beautiful spectacle; for it
was exceedingly beautiful. The fire had kindled at the
very top of the cupola, the wind was high, and the flames
rushed upward, as if the angry spirits below had escaped
on fiery wings. Heaven forgive the feelings that, for a
moment mingled with my admiration of that beautiful
conflagration
!
Society had kindled all around me a bad
excitement
,
and one of the infernal sparks fell into my own
heart. If this was the effect produced on me, who am by
nature tender-hearted, by principle opposed to all
retaliation
,
and by social position secluded from contact with
evil, what must it have been on the minds of rowdies and
desperadoes? The effect of executions on
all
brought
within their influence is evil, and nothing but evil. For a
fortnight past, this whole city has been kept in a state of
corroding excitement, either of hope or fear. The stern
pride of the prisoner left little in his peculiar case to appeal
to the sympathies of society; yet the instincts of our
common
nature rose up against the sanguinary spirit manifested
toward him. The public were, moreover, divided in
opinion
with regard to the legal construction of his crime; and
in the keen discussion of
legal
distinctions,
moral
distinctions
became wofully confused. Each day, hope and fear
alternated; the natural effect of all this, was to have the
whole thing regarded as a game, in which the criminal
might, or might not, become the winner; and every
experiment
of this kind shakes public respect for the laws, from
centre to circumference. Worse than all this was the
horrible
amount of diabolical passion excited. The hearts of
men were filled with murder; they gloated over the thoughts
of vengeance, and were rabid to witness a fellow-creature's
agony. They complained loudly that he was not to be hung
high enough for the crowd to
see
him. What a pity!
exclaimed a woman, who stood near me, gazing at the
burning tower; they will have to give him two hours more
to live. Would you feel so, if he were your
son?
said
I. Her countenance changed instantly. She had not
before
realized that every criminal was
somebody's
son.
As we walked homeward, we encountered a deputy
sheriff; not the most promising material, certainly, for
lessons on humanity; but to him we spoke of the crowd of
savage faces, and the tones of hatred, as obvious proofs of
the bad influence of capital punishment. I know that,
said he; but I don't see how we could dispense with it.
Now suppose we had fifty murderers shut up in prison for
life, instead of hanging 'em; and suppose there should come
a revolution; what an awful thing it would be to have fifty
murderers inside the prison, to be let loose upon the
community
!
There is another side to that proposition, we
answered; for every criminal you execute, you make a
hundred murderers
outside
the prison, each as dangerous
as would be the one inside. He said perhaps it was so;
and went his way.
As for the punishment and the terror of such doings,
they fall most keenly on the best hearts in the community.
Thousands of men, as well as women, had broken and
startled sleep for several nights preceding that dreadful day.
Executions always excite a universal shudder among the
innocent, the humane, and the wise-hearted. It is the
voice of God, crying aloud within us against the
wickedness
of this savage custom. Else why is it that the
instinct
is so universal?
The last conversation I had with the late William Ladd
made a strong impression on my mind. While he was a
sea-captain, he occasionally visited Spain, and once
witnessed
an execution there. He said that no man, however
low and despicable, would consent to perform the office of
hangman; and whoever should dare to suggest such a thing
to a decent man, would be likely to have his brains blown
out. This feeling was so strong, and so universal, that the
only way they could procure an executioner, was to offer
a condemned criminal his own life, if he would consent to
perform the vile and hateful office on another. Sometimes
executions were postponed for months, because there was
no condemned criminal to perform the office of hangman.
A fee was allotted by law to the wretch who did perform it,
but no one would run the risk of touching his polluted hand
by giving it to him; therefore, the priest threw the purse
as far as possible; the odious being ran to pick it up, and
hastened to escape from the shuddering execrations of all
who had known him as a hangman. Even the poor animal
that carried the criminal and his coffin in a cart to the foot
of the gallows, was an object of universal loathing. He
was cropped and marked, that he might be known as the
Hangman's Donkey. No man, however great his needs,
would use this beast, either for pleasure or labour; and the
peasants were so averse to having him pollute their fields
with his footsteps, that when he was seen approaching, the
boys hastened to open the gates, and drive him off with
hisses, sticks, and stones. Thus does the human heart
cry out aloud against this wicked practice!
A tacit acknowledgment of the demoralizing influence of
executions is generally made, in the fact that they are
forbidden
to be
public,
as formerly. The scene is now in a
prison yard, instead of open fields, and no spectators are
admitted but officers of the law, and those especially invited.
Yet a favourite argument in favour of capital punishment
has been the terror that the spectacle inspires in the breast
of evil doers. I trust the two or three hundred, singled
out from the mass of New-York population, by particular
invitation, especially the judges and civil officers, will feel
the full weight of the compliment. During the French
Revolution, public executions seemed too slow, and
Fouquier
proposed to put the guillotine under cover, where
batches of a hundred might be despatched with few
spectators
.
Wilt thou
demoralize the guillotine?
asked Callot,
reproachfully.
That bloody guillotine was an instrument of
law,
as well
as our gallows; and what, in the name of all that is
villanous
,
has
not
been established by law? Nations, clans,
and classes, engaged in fierce struggles of selfishness and
hatred, made laws to strengthen each other's power, and
revenge each other's aggressions. By slow degrees, always
timidly and reluctantly, society emerges out of the
barbarisms
with which it thus became entangled. It is but a
short time ago that men were hung in this country for
stealing
.
The last human brother who suffered under this law,
in Massachusetts, was so wretchedly poor, that when he
hung on the gallows his rags fluttered in the wind. What
think you was the comparative guilt, in the eye of God,
between
him and those who hung him? Yet, it was
according
to law;
and men cried out as vociferously then as they
now do, that it was not
safe
to have the law changed. Judge
McKean, governor of Pennsylvania, was strongly opposed
to the abolition of death for stealing, and the disuse of the
pillory and whipping-post. He was a very humane man,
but had the common fear of changing old customs. It
will not do to abolish these salutary restraints, said the old
gentleman; it will break up the foundations of society.
Those relics of barbarism were banished long ago; but the
foundations of society are in nowise injured thereby.
The testimony from all parts of the world is invariable
and conclusive, that crime diminishes in proportion to the
mildness of the laws. The
real
danger is in having laws
on the statute-book at variance with universal instincts of
the human heart, and thus tempting men to continual
evasion
.
The
evasion,
even of a bad law, is attended with
many mischievous results; its
abolition
is always safe.
In looking at Capital Punishment in its practical bearings
on the operation of justice, an observing mind is at once
struck with the extreme
uncertainty
attending it. The
balance swings hither and thither, and settles, as it were,
by chance. The strong instincts of the heart teach juries
extreme reluctance to convict for capital offences. They
will avail themselves of every loophole in the evidence, to
avoid the bloody responsibility imposed upon them. In
this way, undoubted criminals escape all punishment, until
society becomes alarmed for its own safety, and insists that
the next victim
shall
be sacrificed. It was the misfortune
of John C. Colt to be arrested at the time when the popular
wave of indignation had been swelling higher and higher,
in consequence of the impunity with which Robinson,
White, and Jewell, had escaped. The wrath and jealousy
which they had excited was visited upon him, and his
chance for a merciful verdict was greatly diminished. The
scale now turns the other way; and the next offender will
probably receive very lenient treatment, though he should
not have half so many extenuating circumstances in his
favour.
Another thought which forces itself upon the mind in
consideration of this subject is the danger of convicting the
innocent. Murder is a crime which must of course be
committed in secret, and therefore the proof must be mainly
circumstantial. This kind of evidence is in its nature so
precarious, that men have learned great timidity in trusting
to it. In Scotland, it led to so many terrible mistakes, that
they long ago refused to convict any man of a capital
offence, upon circumstantial evidence.
A few years ago, a poor German came to New-York,
and took lodgings, where he was allowed to do his cooking
in the same room with the family. The husband and wife
lived in a perpetual quarrel. One day, the German came
into the kitchen with a clasp knife and a pan of potatoes,
and began to pare them for his dinner. The quarrelsome
couple were in a more violent altercation than usual; but
he sat with his back toward them, and being ignorant of
their language, felt in no danger of being involved in their
disputes. But the woman, with a sudden and unexpected
movement, snatched the knife from his hand, and plunged
it in her husband's heart. She had sufficient presence of
mind to rush into the street, and scream murder. The poor
foreigner, in the meanwhile, seeing the wounded man reel,
sprang forward to catch him in his arms, and drew out the
knife. People from the street crowded in, and found him
with the dying man in his arms, the knife in his hand, and
blood upon his clothes. The wicked woman swore, in the
most positive terms, that he had been fighting with her
husband, and had stabbed him with a knife he always
carried
.
The unfortunate German knew too little English to
understand her accusation, or to tell his own story. He
was dragged off to prison, and the true state of the case
was made known through an interpreter; but it was not
believed
.
Circumstantial evidence was exceedingly strong
against the accused, and the real criminal swore
unhesitatingly
that she saw him commit the murder. He was
executed
,
notwithstanding the most persevering efforts of his
lawyer, John Anthon, Esq., whose convictions of the man's
innocence were so painfully strong, that from that day to
this, he has refused to have any connection with a capital
case. Some years after this tragic event, the woman died,
and, on her death-bed, confessed her agency in the
diabolical
transaction; but her poor victim could receive no benefit
from this tardy repentance; society had wantonly thrown
away its power to atone for the grievous wrong.
Many of my readers will doubtless recollect the tragical
fate of Burton, in Missouri, on which a novel was founded,
which still circulates in the libraries. A young lady,
belonging
to a genteel and very proud family, in Missouri,
was beloved by a young man named Burton; but
unfortunately
,
her affections were fixed on another less worthy.
He left her with a tarnished reputation. She was by nature
energetic and high-spirited, her family were proud, and
she lived in the midst of a society which considered
revenge
a virtue, and named it honour. Misled by this false
popular sentiment, and her own excited feelings, she
resolved
to repay her lover's treachery with death. But she
kept her secret so well, that no one suspected her purpose,
though she purchased pistols, and practised with them daily.
Mr. Burton gave evidence of his strong attachment by
renewing
his attentions when the world looked most coldly
upon her. His generous kindness won her bleeding heart,
but the softening influence of love did not lead her to forego
the dreadful purpose she had formed. She watched for a
favourable opportunity, and shot her betrayer, when no one
10
was near, to witness the horrible deed. Some little
incident
excited the suspicion of Burton, and he induced her to
confess to him the whole transaction. It was obvious
enough that suspicion would naturally fasten upon him,
the well-known lover of her who had been so deeply
injured
.
He was arrested, but succeeded in persuading her
that he was in no danger. Circumstantial evidence was
fearfully against him, and he soon saw that his chance was
doubtful; but with affectionate magnaminity, he concealed
this from her. He was convicted and condemned. A short
time before the execution, he endeavoured to cut his throat;
but his life was saved, for the cruel purpose of taking it
away according to the cold-blooded barbarism of the law.
Pale and wounded, he was hoisted to the gallows before
the gaze of a
Christian
community.
The guilty cause of all this was almost frantic, when she
found that he had thus sacrificed himself to save her. She
immediately published the whole history of her wrongs,
and her revenge. Her keen sense of wounded honour was
in accordance with public sentiment, her wrongs excited
indignation and compassion, and the knowledge that an
innocent
and magnanimous man had been so brutally treated,
excited a general revulsion of popular feeling. No one
wished for another victim, and she was left unpunished,
save by the dreadful records of her memory.
Few know how numerous are the cases where it has
subsequently
been discovered that the innocent suffered
instead
of the guilty. Yet one such case in an age is surely
enough to make legislators pause before they cast a vote
against the abolition of Capital Punishment.
But many say, the Old Testament requires blood for
blood. So it requires that a woman should be put to
death for adultery; and men for doing work on the
Sabbath
;
and children for cursing their parents; and If an
ox were to push with his horn, in time past, and it hath
been testified to his owner, and he hath not kept him in,
but that he hath killed a man or a woman, the ox shall be
stoned, and his owner also shall be put to death. The
commands given to the Jews, in the old dispensation, do
not form the basis of any legal code in Christendom. They
could
not from the basis of any civilized code. If
one
command
is binding on our consciences,
all
are binding; for
they all rest on the same authority. They who feel bound
to advocate capital punishment for murder, on account of
the law given to Moses, ought, for the same reason, to
insist
that children should be executed for striking or cursing
their parents.
It was said by them of
old
time, an eye for an eye, and
a tooth for a tooth; but
I
say unto you resist not evil.
If our eyes were lifted up, we should see, not Moses and
Elias, but
Jesus only
.
LETTER XXXII
November 26, 1842.
Every year of my life I grow more and more convinced
that it is wisest and best to fix our attention on the
beautiful
and good, and dwell as little as possible on the evil and
the false. Society has done my spirit grievous wrong, for
the last few weeks, with its legal bull-baitings, and its hired
murderers. They have made me ashamed of belonging to
the human species; and were it not that I struggled hard
against it, and prayed earnestly for a spirit of forgiveness,
they would have made me hate my race. Yet feeling thus,
I did wrong to
them
. Most of them had merely caught the
contagion of murder, and really were not aware of the
nature
of the fiend they harboured. Probably there was not
a single heart in the community, not even the most brutal,
that would not have been softened, could it have entered
into confidential intercourse with the prisoner, as Dr.
Anthon
did. All would then have learned that he was a
human
being, with a heart to be melted, and a conscience to
be roused, like the rest of us; that under the turbid and
surging
tide of proud, exasperated feelings, ran a warm current of
human affections, which, with more genial influences, might
have flowed on deeper and stronger, mingling its waters
with the river of life. All this each one would have known,
could he have looked into the heart of the poor criminal as
God looketh. But his whole life was judged by a
desperate
act, done in the insanity of passion; and the motives and
the circumstances were revealed to the public only through
the cold barbarisms of the law, and the fierce exaggerations
of an excited populace; therefore he seemed like a wild
beast, walled out from human sympathies,not as a
fellow-creature
,
with like passions and feelings as themselves.
Carlyle, in his French Revolution, speaking of one of
the three bloodiest judges of the Reign of Terror, says:
Marat too, had a brother, and natural affections; and was
wrapt once in swaddling-clothes, and slept safe in a cradle,
like the rest of us. We are too apt to forget these gentle
considerations when talking of public criminals.
If we looked into our souls with a more wise humility,
we should discover in our own ungoverned anger the germ
of murder; and meekly thank God that we, too, had not
been brought into temptations too fiery for our strength. It
is sad to think how the records of a few evil days may blot
out from the memory of our fellow-men whole years of
generous thoughts and deeds of kindness; and this, too,
when each one has before him the volume of his own broken
resolutions, and oft-repeated sins. The temptation which
most easily besets you, needed, perhaps, to be only a
little
stronger; you needed only to be surrounded by
circumstances
a
little
more dangerous and exciting, and perhaps you,
who now walk abroad in the sunshine of respectability,
might have come under the ban of human laws, as you
have into frequent disobedience of the divine; and then
that one foul blot would have been regarded as the
hieroglyphic
symbol of your whole life. Between you and the
inmate of the penitentiary, society sees a difference so
great, that you are scarcely recognized as belonging to
the same species; but there is One who judgeth not as
man judgeth.
When Mrs. Fry spoke at Newgate, she was wont to
address
both prisoners and visiters as sinners. When Dr.
Channing alluded to this practice, she meekly replied, In
the sight of God, there is not, perhaps, so much difference
as men think. In the midst of recklessness, revenge and
despair, there is often a glimmering evidence that the
divine
spark is not quite extinguished. Who can tell into
what a holy flame of benevolence and self-sacrifice it might
have been kindled, had the man been surrounded from his
cradle by an atmosphere of love?
Surely these considerations should make us judge
mercifully
of the sinner, while we hate the sin with tenfold
intensity
,
because it is an enemy that lies in wait for us all.
The highest and holiest example teaches us to
forgive
all
crimes, while we
palliate
none.
Would that we could learn to be kindalways and
everywhere
kind! Every jealous thought I cherish, every
angry word I utter, every repulsive tone, is helping to build
penitentiaries and prisons, and to fill them with those who
merely carry the same passions and feelings farther than I
do. It is an awful thought; and the more it is impressed
upon me, the more earnestly do I pray to live in a state of
perpetual benediction.
Love hath a longing and a power to save the gathered world,
And rescue universal man from the hunting hell-hounds of his doings.
And so I return, as the old preachers used to say, to my
first proposition; that we should think gently of all, and
claim kindred with all, and include all, without exception,
in the circle of our kindly sympathies. I would not thrust
out even the hangman, though methinks if I were dying of
thirst, I would rather wait to receive water from another
hand than his. Yet what is the hangman but a servant of
the law? And what is the law but an expression of public
opinion? And if public opinion be brutal, and thou a
component
part thereof, art
thou
not the hangman's accomplice?
In the name of our common Father, sing
thy
part of the
great chorus in the truest time, and thus bring this
crashing
discord into harmony!
And if at times, the discord proves too strong for thee,
go out into the great temple of Nature, and drink in
freshness
from her never-failing fountain. The devices of men
pass away as a vapour; but she changes never. Above all
fluctuations of opinion, and all the tumult of the passions,
she smiles ever, in various but unchanging beauty. I have
gone to her with tears in my eyes, with a heart full of the
saddest forebodings, for myself and all the human race; and
lo, she has shown me a babe plucking a white clover, with
busy, uncertain little fingers, and the child walked straight
into my heart, and prophesied as hopefully as an angel;
and I believed her, and went on my way rejoicing. The
language of nature, like that of music, is universal; it speaks
to the heart, and is understood by all.
Dialects
belong to
clans and sects;
tones
to the universe. High above all
language, floats music on its amber cloud. It is not the
exponent of
opinion,
but of
feeling
. The
heart
made it;
therefore it is infinite. It reveals more than language can
ever utter, or thoughts conceive. And high as music is
above mere dialectswinging its godlike way, while verbs
and nouns go creepingeven so, sounds the voice of Love,
that clear, treble-note of the universe, into the heart of man,
and the ear of Jehovah.
In sincere humility do I acknowledge that if I am less
guilty than some of my human brothers, it is mainly
because
I have been
beloved
. Kind emotions and impulses
have not been sent back to me, like dreary echoes, through
empty rooms. All around me, at this moment, are tokens
of a friendly heart-warmth. A sheaf of dried grasses brings
near the gentle image of one who gathered them for love;
a varied group of the graceful lady-fern tells me of
summer
rambles in the woods, by one who mingled thoughts
of me with all her glimpses of nature's beauty. A
rose-bush
,
from a poor Irish woman, speaks to me of her
blessings
.
A bird of paradise, sent by friendship, to warm the
wintry hours with thoughts of sunny Eastern climes, cheers
me with its floating beauty, like a fairy fancy.
Flower-tokens
from the best of neighbours, have come all summer
long, to bid me a blithe good morning, and tell me news of
sunshine and fresh air. A piece of sponge, graceful as if
it grew on the arms of the wave, reminds me of Grecian
seas, and of Hylas borne away by water-nymphs. It was
given me for its uncommon beauty; and who will not try
harder to be good, for being deemed a fit recipient of the
beautiful? A root, which promises to bloom into fragrance,
is sent by an old Quaker lady, whom I know not, but who
says, I would fain minister to thy love of flowers.
Affection
sends childhood to peep lovingly at me from engravings,
or stand in classic grace, embodied in the little plaster cast.
The far-off and the near, the past and the future, are with
me in my humble apartment. True, the mementoes cost
little of the world's wealth; for they are of the simplest
kind; but they express the universebecause they are
thoughts of love, clothed in forms of beauty.
Why do I mention these things? From vanity? Nay,
verily; for it often humbles me to tears, to think how much
I am loved more than I deserve; while thousands, far
nearer
to God, pass on their thorny path, comparatively
uncheered
by love and blessing. But it came into my heart to tell
you how much these things helped me to be
good;
how
they were like roses dropped by unseen hands, guiding me
through a wilderness-path unto our Father's mansion. And
the love that helps
me
to be good, I would have you
bestow upon all, that
all
may become good. To love others
is greater happiness than to be beloved by them; to
do
good is more blessed than to
receive
. The heart of Jesus
was so full of love, that he called little children to his arms,
and folded John upon his bosom; and this love made him
capable of such divine self-renunciation, that he could offer
up even his life for the good of the world. The desire to
be beloved is ever restless and unsatisfied; but the love
that flows out upon others is a perpetual well-spring from
on high.
This
source of happiness is within the reach of
all; here. if not elsewhere, may the stranger and the
friendless
satisfy the infinite yearnings of the human heart, and
find therein refreshment and joy.
Believe me, the great panacea for all the disorders in the
universe, is Love. For thousands of years the world has
gone on perversely, trying to overcome evil
with
evil; with
the worst results, as the condition of things plainly testifies.
Nearly two thousand years ago, the prophet of the Highest
proclaimed that evil could be overcome only with
good
.
But when the Son of Man cometh, shall he find
faith
on
the earth? If we
have
faith in this holy principle, where
is it written on our laws or our customs?
Write it on thine own life; and men reading it shall say,
lo, something greater than vengeance is here; a power
mightier than coercion. And thus the individual faith shall
become a social faith; and to the mountains of crime around
us, it will say, Be thou removed, and cast into the depths
of the sea! and they
will
be removed; and the places that
knew them shall know them no more.
This hope is coming toward us, with a halo of sunshine
round its head; in the light it casts before, let us do works
of zeal with the spirit of love. Man
may
be redeemed from
his thraldom! He
will
be redeemed. For the mouth of
the Most High hath spoken it. It is inscribed in written
prophecy, and He utters it to our hearts in perpetual
revelation
.
To you, and me, and each of us, He says, Go,
bring my people out of Egypt, into the promised land.
To perform this mission, we must love both the evil and
the good, and shower blessings on the just as well as the
unjust. Thanks to our Heavenly Father, I have had much
friendly aid on my own spiritual pilgrimage; through many
a cloud has pierced a sunbeam, and over many a pitfall
have I been guided by a garland. In gratitude for this, fain
would I help others to be good, according to the small
measure of my ability. My spiritual adventures are like
those of the little boy that run away from Providence.
When troubled or discouraged, my soul seats itself on some
door-stepthere is ever some one to welcome me in, and
make a nice little bed for my weary heart. It may be
a young friend, who gathers for me flowers in Summer, and
grasses, ferns, and red berries in the Autumn; or it may be
sweet Mary Howitt, whose mission it is to turn the
sunny
side of things to human eyes; or Charles Dickens, who
looks with such deep and friendly glance into the human
heart, whether it beats beneath embroidered vest, or
tattered
jacket; or the serene and gentle Fenelon; or the devout
Thomas  Kempis; or the meek-spirited John Woolman;
or the eloquent hopefulness of Channing; or the cathedral
tones of Keble, or the saintly beauty of Raphael, or the
clear melody of Handel. All speak to me with friendly
greeting, and have somewhat to give my thirsty soul. Fain
would I do the same, for all who come to
my
door-step,
10*
hungry, and cold, spiritually or naturally. To the erring
and the guilty, above all others, the door of my heart shall
never open outward. I have too much
need
of mercy. Are
we not all children of the same Father? and shall we not
pity those who among pit-falls lose their way home?
LETTER XXXIII.
December 8, 1842.
I went, last Sunday, to the Catholic Cathedral, a
fine-looking
Gothic edifice, which impressed me with that
feeling
of reverence so easily inspired in my soul by a relic of
the past. I have heard many say that their first visit to a
Catholic church filled them with laughter, the services
seemed so absurd a mockery. It was never thus with me.
I know not whether it is that Nature endowed me so
largely
with imagination and with devotional feelings, or
whether
it is because I slept for years with Thomas
Kempis's
Imitation of Christ under my pillow, and found it
my greatest consolation, and best outward guide, next to
the New-Testament; but so it is, that holy old monk is
twined all about my heart with loving reverence, and the
forms which had so deep spiritual significance to him,
could never excite in me a mirthful feeling. Then the
mere circumstance of antiquity is impressive to a character
inclined to veneration. There stands the image of what
was once a living church. A sort of Congress of Religions
is she; with the tiara of the Persian priest, the staff of
the Roman augur, and the embroidered mantle of the
Jewish
rabbi. This is all natural; for the Christian Idea was
a resurrection from deceased Heathenism and Judaism,
and rose encumbered with the grave-clothes and jewels of
the dead. The Greek and Roman, when they became
Christian, still clung fondly to the reminiscences of their
early faith. The undying flame on Apollo's shrine
reappeared
in ever-lighted candles on the Christian altar;
and the same idea that demanded vestal virgins for the
heathen temple, set nuns apart for the Christian sanctuary.
Tiara and embroidered garments were sacred to the
imagination
of the converted Jew; and conservatism, which
in man's dual nature ever keeps innovation in check, led
him to adopt them in his new worship. Thus did the
spirituality
of Christ come to us loaded with forms, not
naturally
and spontaneously flowing therefrom. The very
cathedrals, with their clustering columns and intertwining
arches, were architectural models of the groves and
high-places
,
sacred to the mind of the Pagans, who from
infancy
had therein worshipped their strange gods. The
days of the Christian week took the names of heathen
deities, and statues of Venus were adored as Virgin Mothers.
The bronze image of St. Peter, at Rome, whose toe has
been kissed away by devotees, was once a statue of Jupiter.
An English traveller took off his hat to it as Jupiter, and
asked him, if he ever recovered his power, to reward the
only individual that ever bowed to him in his adversity.
Let us not smile at this odd commingling of religious
faiths and forms. It is most natural; and must ever be,
when a new idea evolves itself from the old. The
Reformers
,
to evade this tendency, destroyed the churches, the
paintings, and the statues, which habit had so long
endeared
to the hearts and imaginations of men; yet while they
flung away, with ruthless hand, all the poetry of the old
establishment, they were themselves so much the creatures
of education, that they brought into the new order of things
many cumbrous forms of theology, the mere results of
tradition
;
and the unpretending fishermen, and tent-maker,
still remained
Saint
Peter, and
Saint
Paul.
Protestants make no
images
of Moses; but many divide
the homage of Christ with him, and
spiritually
kiss his
toe. Thus will the glory of a coming church walk in the
shadow of our times, casting a radiance over that which it
cannot quite dispel.
I think it is Mosheim, who says, After Christianity
became
incorporated with the government, it is difficult to
determine
whether Heathenism was most Christianized, or
Christianity most heathenized.
Wo for the hour, when moral truth became wedded to
politics, and religion was made to subserve purposes of
State! That prostration of reason to authority still fetters
the extremest Protestant of the nineteenth century, after the
lapse of more than a thousand years, and a succession of
convulsive efforts to throw it off. That boasted triumph
of Christianity came near being its destruction. The old
fable of the Pleiad fallen from the sky, by her marriage
with an earth-born prince, is full of significance, in many
applications; and in none more so, than the attempt to
advance
a spiritual principle by political machinery.
Constantine
legalized Christianity, and straightway the powers
of this world made it their tool. To this day, two-thirds of
Christians look outward to ask whether a thing is
law,
and
not inward to ask whether it is
right
. They have mere
legal consciences; and do not perceive that human law is
sacred only when it is the expression of a divine principle.
To them, the slave trade is justifiable while the
law
sanctions
it, and becomes piracy when the law pronounces it
so. The moral principle that changes laws, never
emanates
from them. It acts
on
them, but never
with
them.
They
through
whom it acts, constitute the real church of
the world, by whatsoever name they are called.
The Catholic church is a bad foundation for liberty, civil
or religious. I deprecate its obvious and undeniable
tendency
to enslave the human mind; but I marvel not that
the imaginations of men are chained and led captive by this
vision of the Past; for it is encircled all around with poetry,
as with a halo; and within its fantastic pageantry there is
much that makes it
sacred
poetry.
At the present time, indications are numerous that the
human mind is tired out in the gymnasium of controversy,
and asks earnestly for repose, protection, mystery, and
undoubting
faith. This tendency betrays itself in the rainbow
mysticism of Coleridge, the patriarchal tenderness of
Wordsworth
,
the infinite aspiration of Beethoven. The reverential
habit of mind varies its forms, according to temperament and
character. In some minds, it shows itself in a superstitious
fondness for all
old
forms of belief; the Church which is
proved to their minds to resemble the apostolic, in its ritual,
as well as its creed, is therefore the true Church. In other
minds, veneration takes a form less obviously religious; it
is shown by a strong affection for everything antique; they
worship shadowy legends, architectural ruins, and ancient
customs. This habit of thought enabled Sir Walter to
conjure
up the guardian spirit of the house of Avenel, and
repeople
the regal halls of Kenilworth. His works were the
final efflorescence of feudal grandeur; that system had
passed away from political forms, and no longer had a home
in human reason; but it lingered with a dim glory in the
imagination, and blossomed thus.
Another class of minds rise to a higher plane of
reverence
;
their passion for the past becomes mingled with
earnest
aspiration for the holy. Such spirits walk in a golden
for of mysticism, which leads them far, often only to bring
them back in a circling path to the faith of childhood, and
the established laws of the realm.
To such, Puseyism comes forward, like a fine old
cathedral
made visible by a gush of moonlight. It appeals to
the ancient, the venerable, and the moss-grown. It
promises
permanent repose in the midst of endless agitation.
The young, the poetic, and the mystical, are charmed with
the dim religious light from its painted oriels; they
enter
its Gothic aisles, resounding with the echoes of the past;
and the solemn glory fills them with worship. Episcopacy
rebukes, and dissenters argue; but that which ministers to
the sentiment of reverence, will have power over many
souls, who hunt in vain for truths through the mazes of
argument
.
To the ear that loves music, and sits listening
intently
for the voice that speaks while the dove descends
from heaven, how discordant, how altogether unprofitable,
is this hammering of sects!this coopering and heading up
of empty barrels, so industriously carried on in theological
schools! When I am stunned by the loud, and many-tongued
jargon of sect, I no longer wonder that men are ready
to fall down and worship Romish absurdities, dressed up
in purple robes and golden crown; the marvel rather is,
that they have not returned to the worship of the ancient
graces, the sun, the moon, the stars, or even the element
of fire.
But be not disturbed by Pope or Pusey. They are but
a part of the check-and-balance system of the universe,
and in due time will yield to something better. Modes of
faith last just as long as they are needed in the order of
Providence, and not a day longer. Let the theologian
fume and fret as he may, truth cannot be
forced
above its
level, any more than its great prototype, water. Of what
avail are sectarian efforts, and controversial words? Live
thou a holy lifelet thy utterance be that of a free, meek
spirit! Thus, and not by ecclesiastical machinery, wilt
thou help to prepare the world for a wiser faith and a purer
worship.
Meanwhile, let us hope and trust; and respect sincere
devotion, wheresoever found. A wise mind never despises
aught that flows from a feeling heart. Nothing would tempt
me to disturb, even by the rustle of my garments, the Irish
servant girl, kneeling in the crowded aisle. Blessed be
any power, which, even for a moment, brings the human
soul to the foot of the cross, conscious of its weakness and its
ignorance, its errors and its sins! We may call it
superstition
if we will, but the zealous faith of the Catholic is
everywhere
conspicuous above that of the Protestant. A friend
from Canada lately told me an incident which deeply
impressed
this fact upon his mind. When they cut new roads
through the woods, the priests are in the habit of
inspecting
all the places where villages are to be laid out. They
choose the finest site for a church, and build thereon a
high, strong cross, with railings round it, about three feet
distant from each other. The inner enclosure is usually
more elevated than the outer; a mound being raised about
the foot of the Cross. Inserted in the main timber is a
small image of the crucified Saviour, defended from the
atmosphere
by glass. In Catholic countries, this is called
a
Calvare
. In the village called
Petit Brul
(because
nearly all the dwellings of the first settlers had been
consumed
by fire) was one of these tall Calvares, rendered
conspicuous
by its whiteness among the dense foliage of the
forest. My friend had been riding for a long time in silence
and solitude, and twilight was fast deepening into evening,
when his horse suddenly reared, and showed signs of fear.
Thinking it most prudent to understand the nature of the
danger that awaited him, he stopped the horse and looked
cautiously round. The tall white Cross stood near, in
distinct relief against the dark back-ground of the forest,
and at the foot were two Irishmen kneeling to say their
evening prayers. They were poor, labouring men,
employed
in making the road. There was no human habitation
for miles. From their own rude shantees, they must have
walked at least two or three miles, after their severe daily
toil, thus to bow down and worship the Infinite, in a place
they deemed holy!
Let those who can, ridicule the superstition that
prompted
such an act. Hereafter, may angels teach what
remained
unrevealed to them on earth, that Christ is truly
worshipped
,
neither on this mountain, nor yet at Jerusalem.
I love the Irish. Blessings on their warm hearts, and
their leaping fancies! Clarkson records that while
opposition
met him in almost every form, not a single Irish
member
of the British Parliament ever voted against the
abolition
of the slave trade; and how is the heart of that
generous
island now throbbing with sympathy for the American
slave!
Creatures of impulse and imagination, their very speech
is poetry. What are you going to kill? said I to one of
the most stupid of Irish serving-maids, who seemed in great
haste to crush some object in the corner of the room. A
black
boog,
ma'am, she replied. That is a cricket, said
I. It does no harm, but makes a friendly chirping on the
hearth stone.
Och, and is it a cricket it is? And when the night is
abroad, will it be
spaking?
Sure, I'll not be after killing it,
at all.
The most faithful and warm-hearted of Irish labourers,
(and the good among them are the best on earth) urged me
last spring not to fail, by any means, to rise before the sun
on Easter morning. The Easter sun always dances
when it rises, said he. Assuredly he saw no mockery in
my countenance, but perhaps he saw incredulity; for he
added, with pleading earnestness, And why should it
not
dance, by reason of rejoicement? In his believing
ignorance
,
he had small cause to envy me the superiority of my
reason; at least I felt so for the moment. Beautiful is the
superstition that makes all nature hail the holy; that sees
the cattle all kneel at the hour Christ was born, and the
sun dance, by reason of rejoicement, on the morning of
his resurrection; that believes the dark Cross, actually
found on the back of every Ass, was first placed there when
Jesus rode into Jerusalem with Palm-branches strewed
before
him.
Not in vain is Ireland pouring itself all over the earth.
Divine Providence has a mission for her children to fulfil;
though a mission unrecognized by political economists.
There is ever a moral balance preserved in the universe,
like the vibrations of the pendulum. The Irish, with their
glowing hearts and reverent credulity, are needed in this
cold age of intellect and scepticism.
Africa furnishes another class, in whom the heart ever
takes guidance of the head; and all over the world the
way is opening for them among the nations. Hayti and
the British West Indies; Algiers, settled by the French;
British colonies, spreading over the west and south of
Africa
;
and emancipation urged throughout the civilized world.
Women, too, on whose intellect ever rests the warm
light of the affections, are obviously coming into a wider
and wider field of action.
All these things prophesy of physical force yielding to
moral sentiment; and they all are agents to fulfil what they
prophesy. God speed the hour.
LETTER XXXIV.
January, 1843.
You ask what are my opinions about Women's Rights.
I confess, a strong distaste to the subject, as it has been
generally treated. On no other theme, probably, has there
been uttered so much of false, mawkish sentiment, shallow
philosophy, and sputtering, farthing-candle wit. If the
style of its advocates has often been offensive to taste, and
unacceptable to reason, assuredly that of its opponents have
been still more so. College boys have amused themselves
with writing dreams, in which they saw women in hotels,
with their feet hoisted, and chairs tilted back, or growling
and bickering at each other in legislative halls, or fighting at
the polls, with eyes blackened by fisticuffs. But it never
seems to have occurred to these facetious writers, that the
proceedings which appear so ludicrous and improper in
women,
are also ridiculous and disgraceful in
men
. It were
well than
men
should learn not to hoist their feet above their
heads, and tilt their chairs backward, not to growl and snap
in the halls of legislation, or give each other black eyes
at the polls.
Maria Edgeworth says, We are disgusted when we
see a woman's mind overwhelmed with a torrent of
learning
;
that the tide of literature has passed over it should be
betrayed only by its fertility. This is beautiful and true;
but is it not likewise applicable to man? The truly great
never seek to display themselves. If they carry their heads
high above the crowd, it is only made manifest to others by
accidental revelations of their extended vision. Human
duties and proprieties do not lie so very far apart, said
Harriet Martineau; if they did, there would be two
gospels
,
and two teachers, one for man, and another for woman.
It would seem, indeed, as if men were willing to give
women the exclusive benefit of gospel-teaching.
Women
should be gentle, say the advocates of subordination; but
when Christ said, Blessed are the meek, did he preach
to women only?
Girls
should be modest, is the
language
of common teaching, continually uttered in words
and customs. Would it not be an improvement for men,
also, to be scrupulously pure in manners, conversation, and
life? Books addressed to young married people abound
with advice to the
wife,
to control her temper, and never
to utter wearisome complaints, or vexatious words, when
the husband comes home fretful or unreasonable, from his
out-of-door conflicts with the world. Would not the advice
be as excellent and appropriate, if the husband were
advised
to conquer
his
fretfulness, and forbear
his
complaints, in
consideration of his wife's ill-health, fatiguing cares, and
the thousand disheartening influences of domestic routine?
In short, whatsoever can be named as loveliest, best, and
most graceful in woman, would likewise be good and
graceful in man. You will perhaps remind me of courage.
If you use the word in its highest signification, I answer
that woman, above others, has abundant need of it, in
her pilgrimage; and the true woman wears it with a quiet
grace. If you mean mere animal courage,
that
is not
mentioned
in the Sermon on the Mount, among those qualities
which enable us to inherit the earth, or become the
children
of God. That the feminine ideal approaches much
nearer to the gospel standard, than the prevalent idea of
manhood, is shown by the universal tendency to represent
the Saviour and his most beloved disciple with mild, meek
expression, and feminine beauty. None speak of the
bravery, the might, or the intellect of Jesus; but the devil
is always imagined as a being of acute intellect, political
cunning, and the fiercest courage. These universal and
instinctive tendencies of the human mind reveal much.
That the present position of women in society is the result
of physical force, is obvious enough; whosoever doubts it,
let her reflect why she is afraid to go out in the evening
without
the protection of a man. What constitutes the danger of
aggression? Superior physical strength, uncontrolled by
the moral sentiments. If physical strength were in
complete
subjection to moral influence, there would be no need
of outward protection. That animal instinct and brute
force now govern the world, is painfully apparent in the
condition of women everywhere; from the Morduan
Tartars
,
whose ceremony of marriage consists in placing the
bride on a mat, and consigning her to the bridegroom, with
the words, Here, wolf, take thy lamb,to the German
remark, that stiff ale, stinging tobacco, and a girl in her
smart dress, are the best things. The same thing,
softened
by the refinements of civilization, peeps out in
Stephen's
remark, that woman never looks so interesting, as
when leaning on the arm of a soldier: and in Hazlitt's
complaint that it is not easy to keep up a conversation with
women in company. It is thought a piece of rudeness to
differ from them; it is not quite fair to ask them a
reason
for
what they say.
This sort of politeness to women is what men call
gallantry
;
an odious word to every sensible woman, because
she sees that it is merely the flimsy veil which foppery
throws over sensuality, to conceal its grossness. So far
is it from indicating sincere esteem and affection for
women
,
that the profligacy of a nation may, in general, be
fairly measured by its gallantry. This taking away
rights,
and
condescending
to grant
privileges,
is an old trick
of the physical force principle; and with the immense
majority, who only look on the surface of things, this mask
effectually disguises an ugliness, which would otherwise
be abhorred. The most inveterate slaveholders are
probably
those who take most pride in dressing their
household
servants handsomely, and who would be most
ashamed
to have the name of being
unnecessarily
cruel. And
profligates, who form the lowest and most sensual estimate
of women, are the very ones to treat them with an excess
of outward deference.
There are few books, which I can read through, without
feeling insulted as a woman; but this insult is almost
universally
conveyed through that which was intended for
praise. Just imagine, for a moment, what impression it
would make on men, if women authors should write about
their
rosy lips, and melting eyes, and voluptuous
forms, as they write about
us!
That women in general
do not feel this kind of flattery to be an insult, I readily
admit
;
for, in the first place, they do not perceive the gross
chattel-principle, of which it is the utterance; moreover,
they have, from long habit, become accustomed to consider
themselves as household conveniences, or gilded toys.
Hence, they consider it feminine and pretty to abjure all
such use of their faculties, as would make them co-workers
with man in the advancement of those great principles, on
which the progress of society depends. There is
perhaps
no
animal,
say Hannah More, so much indebted
to subordination, for its good behaviour, as woman. Alas,
for the animal age, in which such utterance could be
tolerated
by public sentiment!
Martha More, sister of Hannah, describing a very
impressive
scene at the funeral of one of her Charity School
teachers, says: The spirit within seemed struggling to
speak, and I was in a sort of agony; but I recollected that
I had heard, somewhere, a woman must not speak in
the
church
. Oh, had she been buried in the church
yard,
a messenger from Mr. Pitt himself should not have
restrained
me; for I seemed to have received a message
from a higher Master within.
This application of theological teaching carries its own
commentary.
I have said enough to show that I consider prevalent
opinions and customs highly unfavourable to the moral and
intellectual development of women: and I need not say,
that, in proportion to their true culture, women will be more
useful and happy, and domestic life more perfected. True
culture, in them, as in men, consists in the full and free
development of individual character, regulated by their
own
perceptions of what is true, and their
own
love of what is
good.
This individual responsibility is rarely acknowledged,
even by the most refined, as necessary to the spiritual
progress
of women. I once heard a very beautiful lecture
from R. W. Emerson, on Being and Seeming. In the
course of many remarks, as true as they were graceful, he
urged women to
be,
rather than
seem
. He told them that
all their laboured education of forms, strict observance of
genteel etiquette, tasteful arrangement of the toilette, &c.
all this
seeming
would not
gain hearts
like
being
truly
what God made them; that earnest simplicity, the
sincerity
of nature, would kindle the eye, light up the
countenance
,
and give an inexpressible charm to the plainest
features.
The advice was excellent, but the motive, by which it
was urged, brought a flush of indignation over my face.
Men
were exhorted to
be,
rather than to
seem,
that they
might fulfil the sacred mission for which their souls were
embodied; that they might, in God's freedom, grow up into
the full stature of spiritual manhood; but
women
were urged
to simplicity and truthfulness, that they might become more
pleasing
.
Are we not all immortal beings? Is not each one
responsible
for himself and herself? There is no measuring
the mischief done by the prevailing tendency to teach
women
to be virtuous as a duty to
man,
rather than to
God
for the sake of pleasing the creature, rather than the
Creator.
God
is thy law,
thou
mine, said Eve to Adam.
May Milton be forgiven for sending that thought out into
everlasting time in such a jewelled setting. What
weakness
,
vanity, frivolity, infirmity of moral purpose, sinful
flexibility of principlein a word, what soul-stifling, has
been the result of thus putting man in the place of God!
But while I see plainly that society is on a false
foundation
,
and that prevailing views concerning women indicate
the want of wisdom and purity, which they serve to
perpetuate
still,
I must acknowledge that much of the talk
about Women's Rights offends both my reason and my
taste. I am not of those who maintain there is no sex in
souls; nor do I like the results deducible from that doctrine.
Kinmont, in his admirable book, called the Natural
History
of Man, speaking of the warlike courage of the ancient
German women, and of their being respectfully consulted
on important public affairs, says: You ask me if I
consider
all this right, and deserving of approbation? or that
women were here engaged in their appropriate tasks? I
answer, yes; it is just
as
right that they should take this
interest in the honour of their country, as the other sex.
Of course, I do not think that women were
made
for war
and battle; neither do I believe that
men
were. But since
the fashion of the times had made it so, and settled it that
war was a necessary element of greatness, and that no
safety was to be procured without it, I argue that it shows a
healthful state of feeling in other respects, that the feelings
of both sexes were
equally
enlisted in the cause: that there
was no
division
in the house, or the State; and that the
serious pursuits and objects of the one were also the serious
pursuits and objects of the other.
The nearer society approaches to divine order, the less
separation will there be in the characters, duties, and
pursuits
of men and women. Women will not become less
gentle and graceful, but men will become more so.
Women
will not neglect the care and education of their
children
,
but men will find themselves ennobled and refined by
sharing those duties with them; and will receive, in return,
co-operation and sympathy in the discharge of various
other duties, now deemed inappropriate to women. The
more women become rational companions, partners in
business
and in thought, as well as in affection and amusement,
the more highly will men appreciate
home
that blessed
word, which opens to the human heart the most perfect
glimpse of Heaven, and helps to carry it thither, as on an
angel's wings.
Domestic bliss,
That can, the world eluding, be itself
A world enjoyed; that wants no witnesses
But its own sharers, and approving heaven;
That, like a flower deep hid in rocky cleft,
Smiles, though 'tis looking only at the sky.
Alas, for these days of Astor houses, and Tremonts, and
Albions! where families exchange comfort for costliness,
fireside retirement for flirtation and flaunting, and the
simple
,
healthful, cozy meal, for gravies and gout, dainties and
dyspepsia. There is no characteristic of my countrymen
which I regret so deeply, as their slight degree of
adhesiveness
to home. Closely intertwined with this instinct,
is the religion of a nation. The Home and the Church
bear a near relation to each other. The French have no
such word as home in their language, and I believe they
are the least reverential and religious of all the Christian
nations. A Frenchman had been in the habit of visiting a
lady constantly for several years, and being alarmed at a
report that she was sought in marriage, he was asked why
he did not marry her himself.
Marry
her! exclaimed
he; Good heavens!
where should I spend my evenings?
The idea of domestic happiness was altogether a foreign
idea to his soul, like a word that conveyed no meaning.
Religious sentiment in France leads the same roving life
as the domestic affections; breakfasting at one
restaurateur's
,
and supping at another's. When some wag in
Boston
reported that Louis Philippe had sent over for Dr.
Channing to manufacture a religion for the French people,
the witty significance of the joke was generally
appreciated
.
There is a deep spiritual reason why all that relates to
the domestic affections should ever be found in close
proximity
with religious faith. The age of chivalry was
likewise
one of unquestioning veneration, which led to the
crusade
for the holy sepulchre. The French Revolution,
which tore down churches, and voted that there was no
God, likewise annulled marriage; and the doctrine that
there is no sex in souls has usually been urged by those of
infidel tendencies. Carlyle says: But what feeling it
was in the ancient, devout, deep soul, which of marriage
made a
sacrament,
this, of all things in the world, is what
Diderot will think of for ons without discovering; unless,
perhaps, it were to increase the
vestry fees
.
The conviction that woman's present position in society
is a false one, and therefore re-acts disastrously on the
happiness
and improvement of man, is pressing, by slow
degrees
,
on the common consciousness, through all the
obstacles
of bigotry, sensuality, and selfishness. As man
approaches
to the truest life, he will perceive more and more
that there is no separation or discord in their mutual duties.
They will be one; but it will be as affection and thought
are one; the treble and bass of the same harmonious tune.
LETTER XXXV.
February, 1843.
A book has been lately published called the Westover
Manuscripts, written more than a hundred years ago, by
Col. William Byrd, an old Virginian cavalier, residing at
Westover, on the north bank of James river. He relates
the following remarkable circumstance, which powerfully
arrested my attention, and set in motion thoughts that flew
beyond the stars, and so I lost sight of them, till they again
come within my vision, in yonder world, where, as the
German beautifully expresses it, we shall find our dreams,
and only lose our sleep. The writer says:
11
Of all the effects of lightning that ever I heard of, the
most amazing happened in this country, in the year 1736.
In the summer of that year, a surgeon of a ship, whose
name was Davis, came ashore at York, to visit a patient.
He was no sooner got into the house, but it began to rain,
with many terrible claps of thunder. When it was almost
dark, there came a dreadful flash of lightning, which struck
the surgeon dead, as he was walking about the room, but
hurt no other person, though several were near him. At
the same time, it made a large hole in the trunk of a pine
tree, which grew about ten feet from the window. But
what was most surprising in this disaster was, that
on the
breast of the unfortunate man that was killed, was the figure
of a pine tree, as exactly delineated as any limner in the
world could draw it; nay, the resemblance went so far as to
represent the colour of the pine, as well as the figure
. The
lightning must probably have passed through the tree first,
before it struck the man, and by that means have printed
the icon of it on his breast. But whatever may have been
the cause, the effect was certain, and can be attested by a
cloud of witnesses, who had the curiosity to go and see
this wonderful phenomenon.
This lightning daguerreotype aroused within me the old
inquiry, What
is
electricity? Of what spiritual essence
is it the form and type? Questions that again and again
have led my soul in such eager chase through the universe,
to find an answer, that it has come back weary, as if it had
carried heavy weights, and traversed Saturn's rings, in
magnetic sleep. Thick clouds come between me and this
mystery, into which I have searched for years; but I see
burning lines of light along the edges, which significantly
indicate the glory it veils.
I sometimes think electricity is the medium which puts
man into relation with all things, enabling him to act on all,
and receive from all. It is now well established as a
scientific
fact, though long regarded as an idle superstition, that
some men can ascertain the vicinity of water, under ground,
by means of a divining rod. Thouvenel, and other
scientific
men in France, account for it by supposing that the
water forms with the earth above it, and the fluids of the
human body, a
galvanic circle
. The human body is said
to be one of the best conductors yet discovered, and
nervous
or debilitated persons to be better conductors than
those in sound health. If the body of the operator be a
very good conductor, the rod in his hand will be forcibly
drawn toward the earth, whenever he approaches a vein of
water, that lies near the surface. If silk gloves or
stockings
are worn, the attraction is interrupted; and it varies in
degree, according as any substances between the water and
the hand of the operator are more or less good conductors
of the galvanic fluid.
Everybody knows what a frightful imitation of life
can be produced in a dead body by the galvanic battery.
The animal magnetizer often feels as if strength had
gone out of him; and it is very common for persons in
magnetic sleep to speak of bright emanations from the
fingers
which are making passes over them.
What
is
this invisible, all-pervading essence, which thus
has power to put man into communication with all? That
man contains the universe within himself, philosophers
conjectured
ages ago; and therefore named him the
microcosm
.
If man led a true life, he would, doubtless, come
into harmonious relation with all forms of being, and thus
his instincts would be universal, and far more certain and
perfect, than those of animals. The bird knows what
plant will cure the bite of a serpent; and if man led a life
as true to the laws of
his
being, as the bird does to
hers,
he
would have no occasion to study medicine, for, he would at
once perceive the medicinal quality of every herb and
mineral. His
inventions
are, in fact, only
discoveries;
for
all existed, before he applied it, and called it his own.
The upholsterer-bee had a perfect cutting instrument, ages
before scissors were invented; the mason-bee cemented
pebbles together, for his dwelling, centuries before houses
were built with stone and mortar; the wasp of Cayenne
made her nest of beautiful white card paper, cycles before
paper was invented; the lightning knew how to print
images
,
ons before Monsieur Daguerre found out half the
process; viz: the
form
without the
colour;
the bee knew
how to take up the least possible room in the construction
of her cells, long before mathematicians discovered that she
had worked out the problem perfectly; and I doubt not
fishes had the very best of submarine reflectors, before
Mrs. Mather invented her ocean telescope, which shows
a pin distinctly on the muddy bottom of the bay.
I cannot recall the name of the ancient philosopher, who
spent his days in watching insects and other animals, that
he might gather hints to fashion tools; but the idea has
long been familiar to my mind, that every conceivable thing
which has been, or will be invented, already exists in
nature
,
in some form or other. Man alone can reproduce all
things of creation; because he contains the
whole
in
himself, and all forms of being flow into his, as a common
centre.
Of what spiritual thing is electricity the type? Is there
a universal medium by which all things of spirit act on the
soul, as matter on the body by means of electricity? And is
that medium the
will
, whether of angels or of men?
Wonderful
stories are told of early Friends, how they were guided
by a sudden and powerful impulse, to avoid some particular
bridge, or leave some particuler house, and subsequent
events showed that danger was there. Many people
consider
this fanaticism; but I have faith in it. I believe the
most remarkable of these accounts give but a faint idea of
the perfection to which man's moral and physical instincts
might attain, if his life were obedient and true.
Though in vigorous health, I am habitually affected by
the weather. I never indulge gloomy thoughts; but
resolutely
turn away my gaze from the lone stubble waving in
the autumn wind, and think only of the ripe, golden seed
which the sower will go forth to sow. But when to the
dreariness of departing summer is added a week of
successive
rains; when day after day, the earth under foot is
slippery mud, and the sky over head like gray marble, then
my nature yields itself prisoner to utter melancholy. I am
ashamed to confess it, and hundreds of times have
struggled
desperately against it, unwilling to be conquered by
the elements, looking at me with an evil eye. But so it
isa protracted rain always convinces me that I never did
any good, and never can do any; that I love nobody, and
nobody loves me. I have heard that Dr. Franklin
acknowledges
a similar effect on himself, and philosophically
conjectures
the physical cause. He says animal spirits
depend
greatly on the presence of electricity in our bodies;
and during long-continued rain, the dampness of the
atmosphere
absorbs a large portion of it; for this reason, he
advises
that a silk waistcoat be worn next the skin; silk being
a non-conductor of electricity. Perhaps this precaution
might diminish the number of suicides in the foggy month
of November, when Englishmen are so prone to hang
and drown themselves.
Animal magnetism is connected, in some unexplained
way, with electricity. All those who have tried it, are
aware that there is a
metallic
feeling occasioned by the
magnetic passesa sort of attraction, as one might imagine
the magnet and the steel to feel when brought near each
other. The magnetizer passes his hands over the subject,
without touching, and at the end of each operation shakes
them, precisely as if he were conducting off electric fluid.
If this is the actual effect, the drowsiness, stupor, and final
insensibility, may be occasioned by a cause similar to that
which produces heaviness and depression of spirits in rainy
weather.
Why
it should be so, in either case, none can
tell. The most learned have no knowledge what
electricity
is;
they can only tell
what
it does, not
how
it does it.
That the state of the atmosphere has prodigious effect
on human temperament, is sufficiently indicated by the
character of nations. The Frenchman owes his sanguine
hopes, his supple limbs, his untiring vivacity, to a genial
climate; to this too, in a great measure, the Italian owes
his pliant gracefulness and impulsive warmth. The
Dutchman
,
on his level marshes, could never dance La Sylphide;
nor the Scotch girl, on her foggy hills, become an
improvisatrice
.
The French dance into everything, on
everything
,
and over everything; for they live where the breezes
dance among vines, and the sun showers down gold to the
the piper; and dance they must, for gladsome sympathy.
We call them of
mercurial
temperament; according to
Dr. Franklin's theory, they are surcharged with
electricity
.
In language, too, how plainly one perceives the influence
of climate! Languages of northern origin abound in
consonants
,
and sound like clanging metals, or the tipping up
of a cart-load of stones. The southern languages flow like
a rill that moves to music; the liquid vowels so sweetly
melt into each other. This difference is observable even
in the dialect of our northern and southern tribes of Indians.
At the north, we find such words as Carratunk, Scowhegan,
Norridgewock, and Memphremagog; at the south,
Pascagoula
,
Santee, and that most musical of all names, Oceola.
Climate has had its effect, too, on the religious ideas
of nations. How strongly does the bloody Woden and the
thundering Thor, of northern mythology, contrast with the
beautiful Graces and gliding Nymphs of Grecian origin. As
a general rule, (sometimes affected by local causes,)
southern
nations cling to the pictured glory of the Catholic
church, while the northern assimilate better with the
severe
plainness of the Protestant.
If I had been reared from infancy under the cloudless
sky of Athens, perhaps I might have bounded over the
earth, as if my element were air, and music but the echo
of my steps; the caution that looks where it treads, might
have been changed for the ardent gush of a Sappho's song;
the sunbeam might have passed into my soul, and written
itself on the now thoughtful countenance in perpetual
smiles.
Do you complain of this, as you do of phrenology, and
say that it favours fatalism too much? I answer, no
matter
what it favours, if it be truth. No two truths ever
devoured
each other, or ever can. Look among the families
of your acquaintanceyou will see two brothers vigorous,
intelligent, and enterprising; the third was like them, till
he fell on his head, had fits, and was ever after puny and
stupid. There are two sunny-tempered, graceful girls
their sister might have been as cheerful as they, but their
father died suddenly, before her birth, and the mother's
sorrow chilled the fountains of her infant life, and she is
nervous, deformed, and fretful. Is there no fatality, as you
call it, in this? Assuredly, we are all, in some degree,
the creatures of outward circumstance; but this in nowise
disturbs the scale of moral responsibility, or prevents
equality of happiness. Our responsibility consists in the
use
we make of our possessions, not on their
extent
.
Salvation
comes to all through obedience to the light they have,
be it much or little. Happiness consists not in having
much, but in wanting no more than we have. The idiot
is as happy in playing at Jack Straws, or blowing bubbles
all the livelong day, as Newton was in watching the great
choral dance of the planets. The same universe lies above
and around both. The mouse can drink no more than
his fill at the mightiest river; yet he enjoys his draught as
well as the elephant. Thus are we all unequal, yet equal.
That we
are,
in part, creatures of necessity, who that has
tried to exert free will, can doubt? But it is a necessity
which has power only over the outward, and can never
change evil into good, or good into evil. It may compel
us to postpone or forbear the good we would fain do, but it
cannot compel us to commit the evil.
If a consideration of all these outward influences teach
us charity for the deficiencies of others, and a strict watch
over our own weaknesses, they will perform their
appropriate
office.
There is so much of good among the worst, so much of evil in the
best,
Such seeming partialities in Providence, so many things to lessen and
expand,
Yea, and with all man's boast, so little real freedom of his will,
That to look a little lower than the surface, garb, or dialect, or fashion,
Thou shalt feebly pronounce for a saint, and faintly condemn for a
sinner.
LETTER XXXVI.
March, 1843.
I went, a few evenings ago, to the American Museum,
to see fifteen Indians, fresh from the western forest. Sacs,
Fox, and Iowas; really important people in their respective
tribes. Nan-Nouce-Fush-E-To, which means the Buffalo
King, is a famous Sac chief, sixty years old, covered with
scars, and grim as a Hindoo god, or pictures of the devil
on a Portuguese contribution box, to help sinners through
purgatory. It is said that he has killed with his own hand
one hundred Osages, three Mohawks, two Kas, two Sioux,
and one Pawnee; and if we may judge by his organ of
destructiveness, the story is true; a more enormous bump
I never saw in that region of the skull. He speaks nine
Indian dialects, has visited almost every existing tribe of
his race, and is altogether a remarkable personage.
Mon-To-Gah
,
the White Bear, wears a medal from President
Monroe, for certain services rendered to the whites.
Wa-Con-To-Kitch-Er
,
is an Iowa chief, of grave and thoughtful
countenance, held in much veneration as the Prophet of
his tribe. He sees visions, which he communicates to
them for their spiritual instruction. Among the squaws is
No-Nos-See, the She Wolf, a niece of the famous Black
Hawk, and very proud of the relationship; and
Do-HumMe
,
the Productive Pumpkin, a very handsome woman, with
a great deal of heart and happiness in her countenance.
Smiles settled on her sun-flecked cheeks,
Like noon upon the mellow apricot.
She was married about a fortnight ago, at Philadelphia, to
Cow-Hick-He, son of the principal chief of the Iowas, and
as noble a specimen of manhood as I ever looked upon.
Indeed I have never seen a group of human beings so
athletic
,
well-proportioned, and majestic. They are a keen
satire on our civilized customs, which produce such feeble
forms and pallid faces. The unlimited pathway, the broad
horizon, the free grandeur of the forest, has passed into
their souls, and so stands revealed in their material forms.
We who have robbed the Indians of their lands, and worse
still, of
themselves,
are very fond of proving their inferiority.
We are told that the
facial angle
in the
Caucasian race is
85 degrees.
Asiatic
78 degrees.
American Indian
73 degrees.
Ethiopian
70 degrees.
Ourang Outang
67 degrees.
11*
This simply proves that the Caucasian race, through a
a succession of ages, has been exposed to influences
eminently
calculated to develop the moral and intellectual
faculties. That they started
first
in the race, might have
been owing to a finer and more susceptible nervous
organization
,
originating in climate, perhaps, but serving to
bring the physical organization into more harmonious
relation
with the laws of spiritual reception. But by
whatever
agency it might have been produced, the nation, or
race that perceived even one spiritual idea in advance of
others, would necessarily go on improving in geometric
ratio, through the lapse of ages. For
our
Past, we have the
oriental fervour, gorgeous imagery, and deep reverence of
the Jews, flowing from that high fountain, the
perception
of the oneness and invisibility of God. From the
Greeks we receive the very Spirit of Beauty, flowing into
all forms of Philosophy and Art, encircled by a golden halo
of Platonism, which
Far over many a land and age hath shone,
And mingles with the light that beams from God's own throne.
These have been transmitted to us in their own forms,
and again reproduced through the classic strength and high
cultivation of Rome, and the romantic minstrelsy and rich
architecture of the middle ages. Thus we stand, a
congress
of ages, each with a glory on its brow, peculiar to
itself
,
yet in part reflected from the glory that went before.
But what have the African savage, and the wandering
Indian for
their
Past? To fight for food, and grovel in the
senses, has been the employment of
their
ancestors. The
Past reproduced in them, mostly belongs to the animal part
of our mixed nature. They have indeed come in
contact
with the race on which had dawned higher ideas; but
how
have they come in contact? As
victims,
not as
pupils
.
Rum, gunpowder, the horrors of slavery, the unblushing
knavery of trade, these have been their teachers! And
because these have failed to produce a high degree of
moral and intellectual cultivation, we coolly declare that
the negroes are made for slaves, that the Indians cannot be
civilized; and that when either of the races come in
contact
with us, they must either consent to be our beasts of
burden, or be driven to the wall, and perish.
That the races of mankind are different, spiritually as
well as physically, there is, of course, no doubt; but it is as
the difference between trees of the same forest, not as
between trees and minerals. The facial angle and shape
of the head, is various in races and nations; but these are
the
effects
of spiritual influences, long operating on
character
,
and in their turn becoming
causes;
thus intertwining,
as Past and Future ever do.
But it is urged that Indians who have been put to schools
and colleges, still remained attached to a roving life; away
from all these advantages,
His blanket tied with yellow strings, the Indian of the forest went.
And what if he did? Do not white, young men who have
been captured by savages in infancy, show an equally
strong disinclination to take upon themselves the restraints
of civilized life? Does anybody urge that this
well-known
fact proves the
white
race incapable of civilization?
You ask, perhaps, what becomes of my theory that races
and individuals are the product of ages, if the influences of
half a life produce the same effects on the Caucasian and
the Indian? I answer, that white children brought up
among Indians, though they strongly imbibe the habits of
the race, are generally prone to be the geniuses and
prophets
of their tribe. The organization of nerve and brain
has been changed by a more harmonious relation between
the animal and the spiritual; and this comparative
harmony
has been produced by the influences of Judea, and
Greece, and Rome, and the age of chivalry; though of all
these things the young man never heard.
Similar influences brought to bear on the Indians or the
Africans, as a race, would gradually change the structure
of their skulls, and enlarge their perceptions of moral and
intellectual truth. The
same
influences cannot be brought
to bear upon them; for
their
Past is
not our
Past; and of
course never can be. But let ours mingle with theirs, and
you will find the result variety, without inferiority. They
will be flutes on different notes, and so harmonize the better.
And how is this elevation of all races to be
effected
?
By that which worketh
all
miracles, in the name of
Jesus.The
law of love
. We must not teach as
superiors
;
we must
love as brothers
. Here is the great
deficiency
in all our efforts for the ignorant and the criminal.
We stand apart from them, and expect them to feel
grateful
for our condescension in noticing them at all. We do
not embrace them warmly with our sympathies, and put our
souls into their soul's stead.
But even under this great disadvantage; accustomed to
our smooth, deceitful talk, when we want their lands, and
to the cool villany with which we break treaties when our
purposes are gained; receiving gunpowder and rum from
the very hands which retain from them all the better
influences
of civilized life; cheated by knavish agents,
cajoled by government, and hunted with bloodhounds
still, under all these disadvantages, the Indians have shown
that they
can
be civilized. Of this, the Choctaws and
Cherokees are admirable proofs. Both these tribes have
a regularly-organized, systematic government, in the
democratic
form, and a printed constitution. The right of
trial by jury, and other principles of a free government,
are established on a permanent basis. They have good
farms, cotton-gins, saw-mills, schools, and churches. Their
dwellings are generally comfortable, and some of them are
handsome. The last annual message of the chief of the
Cherokees is a highly-interesting document, which would
not compare disadvantageously with any of our governors'
messages. It states that more than $2,500,000 are due to
them from the United States; and recommends that this
sum be obtained, and in part distributed among the people;
but that the interest of the school fund be devoted to the
maintenance of schools, and the diffusion of knowledge.
There was a time
our
ancestors, the ancient
Britons
,
went nearly without clothing, painted their bodies in
fantastic fashion, offered up human victims to uncouth
idols, and lived in hollow trees, or rude habitations, which
we should now consider unfit for cattle. Making all due
allowance for the different state of the world, it is much to
be questioned whether they made more rapid advancement
than the Cherokees and Choctaws.
It always fills me with sadness to see Indians surrounded
by the false environment of civilized life; but I never felt
so deep a sadness, as I did in looking upon these western
warriors; for they were evidently the noblest of their
dwindling
race, unused to restraint, accustomed to sleep beneath
the stars. And here they were, set up for a two-shilling
show, with monkeys, flamingoes, dancers, and buffoons! If
they understood our modes of society well enough to be
aware of their degraded position, they would doubtless quit
it, with burning indignation at the insult. But as it is, they
allow women to examine their beads, and children to play
with their wampum, with the most philosophic indifference.
In their imperturbable countenances, I thought I could once
or twice detect a slight expression of scorn at the eager
curiosity of the crowd. The Albiness, a short woman,
with pink eyes, and hair like white floss, was the only
object
that visibly amused them. The young chiefs nodded
to her often, and exchanged smiling remarks with each
other, as they looked at her. Upon all the buffooneries
and ledgerdermain tricks of the Museum, they gazed as
unmoved as John Knox himself could have done. I would
have given a good deal to know their thoughts, as mimic
cities, and fairy grottoes, and mechanical dancing figures,
rose and sunk before them. The mechanical figures
were such perfect imitations of life, and went through so
many wonderful evolutions, that they might well surprise
even those accustomed to the marvels of mechanism. But
Indians, who pay religious honours to venerable rocks, and
moss-grown trees, who believe that brutes have souls, as
well as men, and that all nature is filled with spirits, might
well doubt whether there was not here some supernatural
agency, either good or evil. I would suffer almost
anything
,
if my soul could be transmigrated into the She
Wolf, or the Productive Pumpkin, and their souls pass
consciously into my frame, for a few days, that I might
experience
the fashion of their thoughts and feelings. Was
there ever such a foolish wish! The soul
is
Me,
and
is
Thee. I might as well put on their blankets, as their
bodies, for purposes of spiritual insight. In that other
world, shall we be enabled to know exactly how heaven,
and earth, and hell, appear to other persons, nations, and
tribes? I would it might be so; for I have an intense
desire
for such revelations. I do not care to travel to Rome,
or St. Petersburg, because I can only look
at
people;
and I want to look
into
them, and
through
them; to know
how things appear to
their
spiritual eyes, and sound to
their
spiritual ears. This is a universal want; hence the
intense
interest taken in autobiography, by all classes of
readers. Oh, if any one had but the courage to write the
whole
truth of himself, undisguised, as it appears before the
eye of God and angels, the
world
would read it, and it
would soon be translated into all the dialects of the universe.
But these children of the forest, do not even give us
glimpses of their inner life; for they consider that the body
was given to
conceal
the emotions of the soul. The stars
look down into their hearts, as into mine, the broad ocean,
glittering in the moonbeams, speaks to them of the
Infinite
;
and doubtless the wild flowers and the sea-shells,
talk to them a thought. But what thoughts, what
revelations
of the infinite? This would I give the world to know;
but the world cannot buy an answer.
How foreign is my soul to that of the beautiful
Do-Hum-Me
!
How helpless should I be in situations were she
would be a heroine; and how little could she comprehend
my eager thought, which seeks the creative three-in-one
throughout the universe, and finds it in every blossom, and
every mineral. Between Wa-Con-To-Kitch-Er, and the
German Herder, what a distance! Yet are they both
prophets
;
and though one looks through nature with the
pitchpine
torch of the wilderness, and the other is lighted by a
whole constellation of suns, yet have both learned, in their
degree, that matter is only the time-garment of the spirit.
The stammering utterance with which the Iowa seer
reveals
this, it were worth a kingdom to hear, if we could
but borrow the souls of his tribe, while they listen to his
visions.
It is a general trait with the Indian tribes to recognise
the Great Spirit in every little child. They rarely refuse
a child anything. When their revenge is most implacable,
a little one is often sent to them, adorned with flowers and
shells, and taught to lisp a prayer that the culprit may be
forgiven; and such mediation is rarely without effect, even
on the sternest warrior. This trait alone is sufficient to
establish their relationship with Herder, Richter, and other
spirits of angel-stature. Nay, if we could look back a few
centuries, we should find the ancestors of Shakspeare, and
the fastidiously-refined Gethe, with painted cheeks, wolves'
teeth for jewels, and boars' hides for garments. Perhaps
the universe could not have passed before the vision of
those star-like spirits, except through the forest life of such
wild ancestry.
Some theorists say that the human brain, in its formation,
changes with a steady rise, through a likeness to one
animal and then another, till it is perfected in that of man,
the highest animal. It seems to be so with the nations,
in their progressive rise out of barbarism. I was never
before so much struck with the animalism of Indian
character
,
as I was in the frightful war-dance of these chiefs.
Their gestures were as furious as wild-cats, they howled
like wolves, screamed like prairie dogs, and tramped like
buffaloes. Their faces were painted fiery red, or with
cross-bars of green and red, and they were decorated with
all sorts of uncouth trappings of hair, and bones, and teeth.
That which regulated their movements, in lieu of music,
was a discordant clash; and altogether they looked and
acted more like demons from the pit, than anything I ever
imagined. It was the natural and appropriate language of
War. The wolfish howl, and the wild-cat leap, represent
it more truly than graceful evolutions, and the Marseilles
hymn.
That
music rises above mere brute vengeance; it
breathes, in fervid ecstacy, the
soul's
aspiration after
freedom
the
struggle of will with fate. It is the Future
setting
sail from old landings, and merrily piping all hands on
board. It is too noble a voice to belong to physical
warfare
;
the shrill howl of old Nan-Nouce-Fush-E-To, is good
enough for such brutish work; it clove the brain like a
tomahawk, and was hot with hatred.
In truth, that war-dance was terrific both to eye and ear.
I looked at the door, to see if escape were easy, in case
they really worked themselves up to the scalping point.
For the first time, I fully conceived the sacrifices and perils
of Puritan settlers. Heaven have mercy on the mother
who heard those dreadful yells when they really foreboded
murder! or who suddenly met such a group of grotesque
demons in the loneliness of the forest!
But instantly I felt that I was wronging them in my
thought. Through paint and feathers, I saw gleams of
right honest and friendly expression; and I said, we are
children of the same Father, seeking the same home. If
the Puritans suffered from their savage hatred, it was
because
they met them with savage weapons, and a savage
spirit. Then I thought of William Penn's treaty with the
Indians; the only one ever formed without an oath, and
the only one that was never broken. I thought of the
deputation of Indians, who, some years ago, visited
Philadelphia
,
and knelt with one spontaneous impulse around the
monument of Penn.
Again I looked at the yelling savages in their grim array,
stamping through the war-dance, with a furious energy that
made the floor shake, as by an earthquake; and I said,
These, too, would bow, like little children, before the
persuasive
power of Christian love! Alas, if we had but faith
in this divine principle, what mountains of evil might be
removed into the depths of the sea.
P. S. Alas, poor Do-Hum-Me is dead; so is No-See,
Black Hawk's niece; and several of the chiefs are
indisposed
.
Sleeping by hot anthracite fires, and then exposed
to the keen encounters of the wintry wind; one hour, half
stifled in the close atmosphere of theatres and crowded
saloons
,
and the next, driving through snowy streets and the
midnight air; this is a process which kills civilized people
by inches, but savages at a few strokes.
Do-Hum-Me was but nineteen years old, in vigorous
health, when I saw her a few days since, and obviously so
happy in her newly wedded love, that it ran over at her
expressive
eyes, and mantled her handsome face like a veil
of sunshine. Now she rests among the trees, in
Greenwood
Cemetery; not the trees that whispered to her
childhood
.
Her coffin was decorated according to Indian
custom
,
and deposited with the ceremonies peculiar to her
people. Alas, for the handsome one, how lonely she sleeps
here! Far, far away from him, to whom her eye turned
constantly, as the sunflower to the light!
Sick, and sad at heart, this noble band of warriors, with
melancholy steps, left the pestilential city last week, for
their own broad prairies in the West. Do-Hum-Me was
the pride and idol of them all. The old Iowa chief, the
head of the deputation, was her father; and
notwithstanding
the stoicism of Indian character, it is said that both he
and the bereaved young husband were overwhelmed with
an agony of grief. They obviously loved each other most
strongly. May the Great Spirit grant them a happy
meeting
in their fair hunting grounds beyond the sky.
LETTER XXXVII.
March, 1843.
When I began to write these letters, it was simply as a
safety-valve for an expanding spirit, pent up like steam in
a boiler. I told you they would of be every fashion,
according
to my changing mood; now a mere panorama of passing
scenes, then childlike prattle about birds or mosses; now a
serious exposition of facts, for the reformer's use, and then
the poet's path, on winged Pegasus, far up into the blue.
To-day I know not what I shall write; but I think I shall
be off to the sky; for my spirit is in that mood when smiling
faces peep through chinks in the clouds, and angel fingers
beckon and point upward. As I grow older, these glimpses
into the spiritual become more and more clear, and all the
visible
stamps itself on my soul, a daguerreotype image of
the
invisible,
written with sunbeams.
I sometimes ask myself, Will it continue to be so? For
coming age casts its shadow before; and the rarest of
attainments
is to grow old happily and gracefully. When I
look around among the old people of my acquaintance, I
am frightened to see how large a proportion are a burden to
themselves, and an annoyance to others. The joyfulness
of youth excites in them no kindlier feeling than gloom, and
lucky is it, if it does not encounter angry rebuke or
supercilious
contempt. The happiness of lovers has a still worse
effect; it frets them until they become like the man with
a toothache, whose irritation impelled him to kick poor puss,
because she was sleeping so comfortably in the sunshine.
If this state were an inevitable attendant upon advanced
years, then indeed would long life be an unmitigated curse.
But there
is
no such necessity imposed upon us. We make
old age cheerless and morose, in the same way that we
pervert all things; and that is, by
selfishness
. We allow
ourselves
to think more of our own convenience and comfort, in
little matters, than we do of the happiness and improvement
of others; and thus we lose the habit of sympathizing with
love and joy. I pray God to enable me to guard against
this. May I be ever willing to promote the innocent
pleasure
of others, in their
own
way, even if be not
my
way.
Selfishness can blight even the abundant blossoms of youth;
and if carried into age, it leaves the soul like a horse
enclosed
within an arid and stony field, with plenty of
verdant
pastures all around him.
Childhood itself is scarcely more lovely than a cheerful,
kind, sunshiny old age.
How I love the mellow sage,
Smiling through the veil of age!
And whene'er this man of years
In the dance of joy appears,
Age is on his temples hung,
But his heart
his heart is young!
Here is the great secret of a bright and green old age.
When Tithonus asked for an eternal life in the body, and
found, to his sorrow, that immortal
youth
was not included
in the bargain, it surely was because he forgot to ask the
perpetual gift of loving and sympathizing.
Next to this, is an intense affection for nature, and for
all simple things. A human heart can never grow old, if it
takes a lively interest in the pairing of birds, the
re-production
of flowers, and the changing tints of autumn-ferns.
Nature, unlike other friends, has an exhaustless meaning,
which one sees and hears more distinctly, the more they
are enamoured of her. Blessed are they who
hear
it; for
through tones comes the most inward perceptions of the
spirit. Into the ear of the soul, which reverently
listens,
Nature whispers, speaks, or warbles, most heavenly arcana.
And even they who seek her only through science,
receive
a portion of her own tranquillity, and perpetual youth.
The happiest old man I ever saw, was one who knew how
the mason-bee builds his cell, and how every bird lines
her nest; who found pleasure in a sea-shore pebble, as
boys do in new marbles; and who placed every glittering
mineral in a focus of light, under a kaleidescope of his own
construction. The effect was like the imagined riches of
fairy land; and when an admiring group of happy young
people gathered round it, the heart of the good old man
leapt like the heart of a child. The laws of nature, as
manifested in her infinitely various operations, were to him
a perennial fountain of delight; and, like her, he offered
the joy to all. Here was no admixture of the bad
excitement
attendant upon ambition or controversy; but all was
serenely happy, as are an angel's thoughts, or an infant's
dreams.
Age, in its outward senses, returns again to childhood;
and thus should it do spiritually. The little child enters a
rich man's house, and loves to play with the things that are
new and pretty; but he thinks not of their market value,
nor does he pride himself that another child cannot play
with the same. The farmer's home will probably delight
him more; for he will love living squirrels better than
marble greyhounds, and the merry bob o'lincoln better than
stuffed birds from Araby the blest; for
they
cannot sing into
his heart. What
he
wants is life and lovethe power of
giving and receiving joy. To this estimate of things,
wisdom
returns, after the intuitions of childhood are lost.
Virtue
is but innocence on a higher plane, to be attained only
through severe conflict. Thus life completes its circle;
but it is a circle that
rises
while it revolves; for the path
of spirit is ever spiral, containing
all
of truth and love in
each revolution, yet ever tending upward. The virtue which
brings us back to innocence, on a higher plane of wisdom,
may be the childhood of another state of existence; and
through successive conflicts, we may again complete the
ascending circle, and find it holiness.
The ages, too, are rising spirally; each containing all,
yet ever ascending. Hence, all our new things are old,
and yet they are new. Some truth known to the ancients
meets us on a higher plane, and we do not recognise it,
because it is like a child of earth, which has passed
upward
and become an angel. Nothing of true beauty ever
passes away. The youth of the world, which Greece
embodied
in immortal marble, will return in the circling Ages,
as innocence comes back in virtue; but it shall return
filled with a higher life; and that, too, shall point upward.
Thus shall the Arts be glorified. Beethoven's music
prophesies
all this, and struggles after it continually;
therefore
,
whosoever hears it, (with the
inward,
as well as the
outward
ear,) feels his soul spread its strong pinions, eager
to pass the flaming bounds of time and space, and circle
all the infinite.
It is a beautiful conception of Fourier's, that the Aurora
borealis is the
Earth's aspiration
after its glorious future;
and that when the moral and intellectual world are brought
into order by the right construction of society, these
restless
,
flashing northern lights will settle into an intensely
radiant circle round the poles, melt all the ice, and bring
into existence new flowers of unknown beauty.
Astronomers almost contemporary with Fourier, and
probably
unacquainted with his theory of re-constructing
society
,
have suggested the idea of progressive changes in
the earth's motions, till her poles shall be brought into
exact harmony with the poles of the heavens, and thus
perpetual spring pervade the whole earth.
It is a singular fact, too, that the groups and series
of Fourier's plan of society are in accordance with
Swedenborg's description of the order in heaven. It
is said that Fourier never read Swedenborg; yet has he
embodied his spiritual order in political economy, as
perfectly
as if he had been sent to answer the prayer, Thy
kingdom come on
earth,
as it is in
heaven
.
Visions! idle visions! exclaims the man of mere facts.
Very well, friend; walk by the light of thy lantern, if it
be sufficient for thee. I ask thee not to
believe
in these
visions; for peradventure thou canst not. But said I not
truly that their faces
smile
through chinks in the clouds,
and that their fingers beckon and
point upward?
LETTER XXXVIII.
March 17, 1843.
Here it is the 17th of March, and I was rejoicing that
winter had but a fortnight longer to live, and imagination
already began to stir its foot among last year's fallen leaves,
in search of the hidden fragrant treasures of the trailing
arbutuswhen lo, there comes a snow-storm, the wildest
and most beautiful of the season! The snow-spirit has been
abroad, careering on the wings of the wind, in the finest
style imaginable; throwing diamonds and ermine mantles
around him, with princely prodigality.
And when his hours are numbered, and the world
Is all his own, retiring, as he were not,
Loaves, when the sun appears, astonished Art
To mimic, in slow structures, stone by stone,
Built in an age, the mad wind's night work,
The frolic architecture of the snow.
I had wealth of fairy splendor on my windows this
morning
.
Alpine heights, cathedral spires, and glittering
grottoes
.
It reminded me of the days of my youth, when on
the shores of the Kennebec I used to watch to see the
river go down, as the rafters expressed it. A magnificent
spectacle it was, in those seasons when huge masses of ice
were loosened by sudden warmth, and came tumbling over
the falls, to lie broken into a thousand fantastic shapes of
beauty. Trees, mountains, turrets, spires, broken columns,
went sailing along, glancing and glittering in the
moonlight
,
like petrified Fata-Morgana of Italian skies, with the
rainbows frozen out. And here I had it painted in crystal,
by the wild artist whom I heard at his work in the
nighttime
,
between my dreams, as he went by with the whistling
storm.
Nature, dear goddess, is
so
beautiful!
always
so
beautiful
!
Every little flake of the snow is such a perfect
crystal
;
and they fall together so gracefully, as if fairies of the
air caught water-drops, and made them into artificial flowers
to garland the wings of the wind! Oh, it is the saddest of
all things, that even one human soul should dimly perceive
the Beauty, that is ever around us, a perpetual
benediction
.
Nature, that great missionary of the Most High,
preaches to us for ever in all tones of love, and writes truth
in all colours, on manuscripts illuminated with stars and
flowers. But we are not in harmony with the
whole,
and
so we understand her not.
Here and there, a spirit less at discord with Nature,
hears semitones in the ocean and the wind, and when the
stars look into his heart, he is stirred with dim recollections,
of a universal language, which would reveal
all,
if he only
remembered the alphabet. When one stands alone at
night, amidst unfettered Nature, says Bettine, it seems
as though she were a spirit praying to man for release! And
should
man set Nature free? I must at some time reflect
upon this: but I have already very often had this
sensation
,
as if wailing Nature plaintively begged something of
me; and it cut me to the heart, not to be able to understand
what she would have. I must consider seriously of this;
perhaps I may discover something which shall raise us
above this earthly life.
Well may Nature beg plaintively of man; for all that
disturbs her harmony flows from
his
spirit. Age after age,
she has toiled patiently, manifesting in thunder and
lightning
,
tempest and tornado, the evils which man produces,
and thus striving to restore the equilibrium which
he
disturbs
.
Every thing else seeks earnestly to live according
to the laws of its being, and therefore each has individual
excellence, the best adapted of all things to its purpose.
Because Nature is earnest, spontaneous, and true, she is
perfect. Art, though it makes a fair show, produces
nothing
perfect. Look through a powerful microscope at the
finest cambric needle that ever was manufactured, and it
shall seem blunt as a crowbar; but apply the same test to
the antenn of a beetle or a butterfly, and thou wilt see
them taper to an invisible point. That man's best works
should be such bungling imitations of Nature's infinite
perfection
,
matters not much; but that he should make
himself
an imitation, this is the fact which Nature moans over, and
deprecates beseechingly. Be spontaneous, be truthful, be
free, and thus be individuals! is the song she sings through
warbling birds, and whispering pines, and roaring waves,
and screeching winds. She wails and implores, because
man keeps her in captivity, and he alone can set her free.
To those who rise above custom and tradition, and dare to
trust their own wings never so little above the crowd, how
eagerly does she throw her garland ladders to tempt them
upward! How beautiful, how angelic, seems every
fragment
of life which is earnest and true! Every man can
be really great, if he will only trust his own highest instincts,
think his own thoughts, and say his own say. The
stupidest
fellow, if he would but reveal, with childlike honesty,
how he feels, and what he thinks, when the stars wink at
him, when he sees the ocean for the first time, when music
comes over the waters, or when he and his beloved look
into each others' eyes,would he but
reveal
this, the world
would hail him as a genius, in
his
way, and would prefer
his story to all the epics that ever were written, from Homer
to Scott.
The commonest mind is full of thought, some worthy of the rarest;
And could it see them fairly writ, would wonder at its wealth.
Nay, there is truth in the facetious assertion of Carlyle,
that the dog, who sits looking at the moon so seriously,
would doubtless be a poet, if he could but find a
publisher
.
Of this thing be assured, no romance was ever so
interesting
,
as would be a right comprehension of that dog's
relation
to the moon, and of the relation of both to all things,
and of all things to thyself, and of thyself, to God. Some
glimmering of this mysterious relation of each to All may
disturb the dog's mind with a strange solemnity, until he
fancies he sees another dog in the moon, and howls thereat.
Could his howl be translated and published, it might teach
us somewhat that the wisest has not yet conjectured.
12
Let not the matter-of-fact reader imagine me to say that
it is difficult for puppies to find publishers. The frothy sea
of circulating literature would prove such assertion a most
manifest falsehood. Nor do I assert that puerile and
common-place
minds are diffident about making books. There
is babbling more than enough; but among it all, one finds
little true speech, or true silence. The
dullest
mind has
some beauty peculiarly its
own;
but it echoes, and does not
speak
itself
. It strives to write as schools have taught, as
custom dictates, or as sects prescribe; and so it stammers,
and makes no utterance. Nature made us
individuals,
as
she did the flowers and the pebbles; but we are afraid to
be peculiar, and so our society resembles a bag of marbles,
or a string of mould candles. Why should we all dress
after the same fashion? The frost never paints my
windows
twice alike.
As I write, I look round for the sparkling tracery; it is
gone, and I shall never see a copy. Well, I will not mourn
for this. The sunshine has its own glorious beauty, and
my spirit rejoices therein, even more than in the graceful
pencilings of the snow. All kinds of beauty have I loved
with fervent homage. Above all, do I worship it in its
highest form; that of a sincere and loving soul. Even here
in the city, amid bricks and mortar, and filth and finery, I
find it in all its manifestations, from the animal to the
godlike
.
This morning, our pavements were spread with jewelled
ermine, more daintily prepared than the foot-cloth of an
Eastern queen. But now the world has travelled through
it, as it does through the heart of a politician, and every
pure drift is mud-bespattered. But there is still the beauty
of the bells, and the graceful little shell-like sleighs, and
the swift motions. There is something exhilarating in the
rapid whirl of life, abroad and joyous in New-York, soon
after a new-fallen snow. It excites somewhat of the
triumphant
emotion which one feels when riding a swift horse,
or careering on the surging sea. It brings to my mind
Lapland deer, and flashing Aurora, and moon-images in the
sky, and those wonderful luminous snows, which clothe the
whole landscape with phosphoric fire.
But there is beauty here far beyond rich furs, and Russian
chimes, and noble horses, or imagination of the glorious
refractions
in arctic skies; for here are human hearts,
faithful
and loving, amid the fiercest temptations; still genial
and cheerful, though surrounded by storm and blight. Two
little ragged girls went by the window just now, their
scanty
garments fluttering in the wind; but their little blue hands
were locked in each other, and the elder tenderly lifted the
younger through the snow-drift. It was but a short time
ago, that I passed the same children in Broadway. One
of them had rags bound round her feet, and a pair of broken
shoes. The other was barefoot, and she looked very red,
for it was pinching cold. Mary, said the other, in a
gentle voice, sit down on the door-step, here, and I will
take off my rags and shoes. Your feet are cold, and you
shall wear them the rest of the way. Just a
little
while,
replied the other; for they
are
very cold; but you shall
have them again, directly. They sat down, and made the
friendly exchange; and away jumped the little one, her
bare feet pattering on the cold stones, but glowing with a
happy heart-warmth.
You say I must make up such incidents, because
you
never see humanity under such winning aspects, in the
streets of New-York. Nay, my friend, I do
not
make up
these stories; but I look on this ever-moving panorama of
life, as Coleridge describes his Cupid:
What outward form and features are,
He guesseth but in part;
But what
within
is good and fair,
He seeth with the heart.
LETTER XXXIX.
April 27, 1843.
There is a fine engraving of Jean Paul Richter,
surrounded
by floating clouds, all of which are angels' faces;
but so soft and shadowy, that they must be sought for to be
perceived. It was a beautiful idea thus to environ Jean
Paul; for whosoever reads him, with an earnest
thoughtfulness
,
will see heavenly features perpetually shining
through the golden mists or rolling vapour.
But the picture interested me especially, because it
embodied
a great spiritual truth. In all clouds that surround
the soul, there
are
angel faces, and we should
see
them if
we were calm and holy. It is because we are impatient of
our destiny, and do not understand its use in our eternal
progression, that the clouds which envelope it seem like
black masses of thunder, or cold and dismal obstructions of
the sunshine. If man looked at his being as a whole, or
had faith that all things were intended to bring him into
harmony with the divine will, he would gratefully
acknowledge
that spiritual dew and rain, wind and lightning, cloud
and sunshine, all help his growth, as their natural forms
bring to maturity the flowers and the grain. Whosoever
quarrels with his fate, does not understand it, says
Bettine
;
and among all her inspired sayings, she spake none
wiser.
Misfortune is never mournful to the soul that accepts it;
for such do always see that every cloud is an angel's face.
Every man deems that he has precisely the trials and
temptations which are the hardest of all others for him to
bear; but they are so, simply because they are the very
ones he most needs.
I admit the truth of Bulwer's assertion, that long
adversity
usually leaves its prey somewhat chilled, and
somewhat
hardened to affection; passive and quiet of hope,
resigned
to the worst, as to the common order of events, and
expecting little from the best, as an unlooked for incident
in the regularity of human afflictions. But I apprehend
this remark is mainly applicable to pecuniary difficulties,
which, in all their wretched and entangling minuti, like
the diminutive cords by which Gulliver was bound, tame
the strongest mind, and quell the most buoyant spirit.
These vexations are not man's natural destiny, and
therefore
are not healthy for his soul. They are produced by
a false structure of society, which daily sends thousands
of kind and generous hearts down to ruin and despair, in
its great whirl of falsity and wrong. These are victims of
a stinging grief, which has in it nothing divine, and brings
no healing on its wings.
But the sorrow which God appoints is purifying and
ennobling
,
and contains within it a serious joy. Our Father
saw that disappointment and separation were necessary,
and he has made them holy and elevating. From the
sepulchre the stone is rolled away, and angels declare to
the mourner, He is not here; he is risen. Why seek
ye the living among the dead? And a voice higher than
the angels, proclaims, Because I live, ye shall live also.
There
is
no Death to those who know of life;
No Time to those who see Eternity.
Blessed indeed are the ministrations of sorrow! Through
it, we are brought into more tender relationship to all other
forms of being, obtain a deeper insight into the mystery of
eternal life, and feel more distinctly the breathings of the
infinite
.
All sorrow raises us above the civic, ceremonial
law, and makes the prosaist a psalmist, says Jean Paul.
Whatsoever is highest and holiest is tinged with
melancholy
.
The eye of genius has always a plaintive
expression
,
12*
and its natural language is pathos. A prophet is
sadder
than other men; and He who was greater than all
prophets
,
was a man of sorrows, and acquainted with grief.
Sorrow connects the soul with the invisible and the
everlasting
;
and therefore all things prophesy it, before it comes
to us. The babe weeps at the wail of music, though he is
a stranger to grief; and joyful young hearts are saddened
by the solemn brightness of the moon. When men try to
explain the oppressive feelings inspired by moonlight and
the ever silent stars, they say it is as if spirits were near.
Thus Bettine writes to Gnderode In the night was
something confidential, which allured me as a child; and
before I ever
heard
of spirits, it seemed as if there was
something living near me, in whose protection I trusted.
So was it with me on the balcony, when a child three or
four years old, when all the bells were tolling for the
emperor's
death. As it always grew more nightly and cool,
and nobody with me, it seemed as if the air was full of
bell-chimes
,
which surrounded me; then came a gloom over my
little heart, and then again sudden composure, as if my
guardian angel had taken me in his arms. What a great
mystery is life, so closely embracing the soul, as the
chrysalis
the butterfly!
The spiritual speaks ever to us, but we hear it at such
moments, because the soul is silent and listening, and
therefore
the infinite pervades it.All alone, alone, through deep
shadows, thus only can ye pass to golden sunshine on the
eternal shore! this is the prophetic voice, whose sad but
holy utterance goes deep down into the soul when it is
alone with moonlight and stars. Under its unearthly
influence
,
childhood nestles closer to its mother's side, and the
mirthful heart of youth melts into tears. It is as if the
cross upreared its dark shadow before the vision of the
infant
Saviour.
As we grow older, this prophecy becomes experience.
By the hand of Sorrow the finite is rolled away like a
scroll, and we stand consciously in the presence of the
infinite
and the eternal. The wailing of the autumn wind,
the lone stubble waving in the wintry field, the falling
foliage, and the starry stillness, are no longer a luxury of
sadness, as in the days of youthful imagination. The voice
of wailing has been
within
us; our loved ones have left us,
and
we
are like the lone stubble in the once blooming field;
the leaves of our hopes are falling withered around us;
and the midnight stillness is filled with dreary echoes of
the past.
Oh, Father, how fearful is this pilgrimage!Alone in the
twilight, and voices from the earth, the air, and the sky, call,
Whence art thou?Whither goest thou? And none
makes answer. Behind us comes the voice of the Past,
like the echo of a bell travelling through space for a
thousand
years; and all it utters is, As thou art, I was.
Before
us stands the Future, a shadow robed in vapour,
with a far-off sunlight shining through. The Present is
around uspassing awaypassing away. And
we?
Oh,
Father! fearful indeed is this earth pilgrimage, when the
soul has learned that all its sounds are echoes,all its
sights are shadows.
But lo! the clouds open, and a face serene and hopeful
looks forth, and says, Be thou as a little child, and thus
shalt thou become a seraph. The shadows which perplex
thee are all realities; the echoes are all from the eternal
voice which gave to light its being. All the changing forms
around thee are but images of the infinite and the true,
seen in the mirror of time, as they pass by, each on a
heavenly
mission. Be thou as a little child. Thy Father's
hand will guide thee home.
I bow my head in silent humility. I cannot pray that
afflictions may not visit me. I know why it was that Mrs.
Fletcher said, Such prayers never seem to have wings.
I am willing to be purified through sorrow, and to accept it
meekly as a blessing. I see that all the clouds are angels'
faces, and their voices speak harmoniously of the
everlasting
chime.
LETTER XL.
May 1, 1843.
The first of May! How the phrase is twined all round
with violets; and clumps of the small Housitania, (which
remind me of a Sylvania phalanx of babies:) and slight
anemones, nodding gracefully as blooming maidens, under
the old moss-grown trees! How it brings up visions of fair
young floral queens, and garlanded May-poles, and door-posts
wreathed with flowers, and juvenile choirs hymning the
return
of the swallows, in the ancient time! The old French
word
Mes,
signifies a garden; and in Lorraine,
Mai
still
has that meaning; from which, perhaps, the word
maiden
.
In Brittany,
Mae
signifies green, flourishing; the Dutch
Mooy,
means beautiful, agreeable; the Swedish
Mio
is
small, pretty and pleasant; and the East India
Maya
is
Goddess of Nature. Thus, have men shown their love of
this genial month, by connecting its name with images of
youth and loveliness.
In our climate, it happens frequently, that Winter
lingering
,
chills the lap of May, and we are often tantalized
with promises unfulfilled. But though our Northern
Indians
named June the month of flowers, yet with all her
abundant beauty, I doubt whether she commends herself to
the heart, like May, with her scanty love-tokens from the
grave of the frosty past. They are like infancy, like
resurrection
,
like everything new and fresh, and full of
hopefulness
and promise.
The
First,
and the
Last!
Ah, in all human things, how
does one idea forever follow the other, like its shadow!
The circling year oppresses me with its fulness of meaning.
Youth, manhood, and old age, are its most external
significance
.
It is symbolical of things far deeper, as every
soul knows, that is travelling over steep hills, and through
quiet valleys, unto the palace called Beautiful, like
Bunyan's
world-renowned Pilgrim. Human life, in its
forever-repeating
circle, like Nature, in her perpetual self-restoring
beauty, tells us that from the burial place of Winter, young
Spring shall come forth to preach resurrection; and thus
it must be in the outward and symbolical, because thus it
is in the inward, spiritual progression of the soul.
Two children in two neighbour villages,
Playing mad pranks along the heathy lees;
Two strangers meeting at a festival;
Two lovers whispering by an orchard wall;
Two lives bound fast in one, with golden ease;
Two graves grass green beside a gray church-tower,
Washed with still rains, and daisy-blossomed;
Two children in one hamlet born and bred;
So runs the round of life from hour to hour.
Blessings on the Spring-time, when Nature stands like
young children hand in hand, in prophecy of future
marriage
!
May-day in New-York, is the saddest thing, to one who
has been used to hunting mosses by the brook, and paddling
in its waters. Brick walls, instead of budding trees, and
rattling wheels in lieu of singing birds, are bad enough;
but to make the matter worse, all New-York
moves
on the
first of May; not only moves about, as usual, in the
everlasting
hurry-scurry of business, but one house empties
itself
into another, all over the city. The streets are full of
loaded drays, on which tables are dancing, and carpets
rolling to and fro. Small chairs, which bring up such
pretty, cozy images of rolly-pooly mannikens and maidens,
eating supper from tilted porringers, and spilling the milk
on their night-gownsthese go ricketting along on the tops
of beds and bureaus, and not unfrequently pitch into the
street, and so fall asunder. Children are driving hither and
yon, one with a flower-pot in his hand, another with
workbox
,
band-box, or oil-canakin; each so intent upon his
important
mission, that all the world seems to him (as it does
to many a theologian,) safely locked up within the little
walls
he
carries. Luckily, both boy and bigot are mistaken,
or mankind would be in a bad box, sure enough. The dogs
seem bewildered with this universal transmigration of
bodies; and as for the cats, they sit on the door-steps,
mewing piteously, that they were not born in the middle
ages, or at least, in the quiet old portion of the world. And
I, who have almost as strong a love of localities as poor
puss, turn away from the windows, with a suppressed
anathema on the nineteeth century, with its perpetual
changes. Do you want an appropriate emblem of this
country, and this age? Then stand on the side-walks of
New-York, and watch the universal transit on the first of
May. The facility and speed with which our people change
politics, and move from sect to sect, and from theory to
theory, is comparatively slow and moss-grown; unless,
indeed
,
one excepts the Rev. O. A. Brownson, who seems to
stay in any spiritual habitation a much shorter time than
the New-Yorkers do in their houses. It is the custom
here, for those who move out to leave the accumulated
dust and dirt of the year, for them who enter to clear up.
I apprehend it is somewhat so with all the ecclesiastical
and civil establishments, which have so long been let out
to tenants in rotation. Those who enter them, must make
a great sweeping and scrubbing, if they would have a clean
residence.
That people should move so
often
in this city, is
generally
a matter of their own volition. Aspirations after the
infinite
,
lead them to perpetual change, in the restless hope
of finding something better and better still. But they would
not raise the price of drays, and subject themselves to great
inconvenience, by moving
all on one day,
where it not that
the law compels everybody who intends to move at all, to
quit his premises before twelve o'clock, on May morning.
Failing to do this, the police will put him and his goods
into the street, where they will fare much like a boy beside
an upset hornet's nest. The object of this regulation is to
have the Directory for the year arranged with accuracy.
For, as theologians, and some reformers, can perceive no
higher mission for human souls than to arrange themselves
rank and file in sectarian platoons, so the civil authorities
do not apprehend that a citizen has any more important
object
for living, just at this season, than to have his name
set in a well-ordered Directory.
However, human beings are such creatures of habit and
imitation, that what is necessity soon becomes fashion, and
each one wishes to do what everybody else is doing. A
lady in the neighbourhood closed all her blinds and shutters,
on May-day; being asked by her acquaintance whether
she had been in the country, she answered, I was
ashamed
not to be moving on the first of May; and so I
shut up the house that the neighbours might not know it.
One could not well imagine a fact more characteristic of
the despotic sway of custom and public opinion, in the
United States, and the nineteenth century. Elias Hick's
remark, that it takes
live
fish to swim
up
stream, is
emphatically true of this age and country, in which
liberty-caps
abound, but no one is allowed to wear them.
I am by temperament averse to frequent changes, either
in my spiritual or material abodes. I think I was made for
a German; and that my soul in coming down to earth, got
drifted away by some side-wind, and so was wafted into
the United States, to take up its abode in New-York. Jean
Paul, speaking of the quiet habits of the Germans, says he
does not believe they turn in their beds so often as the
French do. O, for one of those old German homes,
where the same stork, with his children and grandchildren,
builds on the same roof, generation after generation; where
each family knows its own particular stork, and each stork
knows the family from all the world beside. Oh, for a quiet
nook in good old Nuremberg, where still flourishes the lime
tree, planted seven hundred years ago, by empress
Cunegunde
;
where the same family inhabits the same mansion for
five centuries; where cards are still sold in the same house
where cards were first manufactured; and where the great
grandson makes watches in the same shop that was
occupied
by his watchmaking great-grandfather.
But after all, this is a foolish, whining complaint. A
stork's nest is very pleasant, but there are better things.
Man is moving to his highest destiny through manifold
revolutions
of spirit; and the outward must change with the
inward.
It is selfish and unwise to quarrel with this spiritual
truth or its ultimate results, however inconvenient they
may be. The old fisherman, who would have
exterminated
steam-boats, because they frightened the fish away from
the waters where he had baited them for years, was by no
means profound in his social views, or of expansive
benevolence
.
If the world were filled with different tribes of
Nurembergers
,
with their storks, what strangers should we
brethren of the human household be to each other! Thanks
to Carlyle, who has brought England and America into such
close companionship with the mind of Germany. Thanks
to Mary Howitt, who has introduced Frederika Bremer
into
our homes, like a sunbeam of spring, and thus changed
Sweden from a snowy abstraction to a beautiful and healthy
reality. It is so pleasant to look into the hearts and eyes
of those Northren brothers! To be conveyed to their
firesides by a process so much swifter than steam?
Do you fear that the patriot will be lost in the
cosmopolite
?
Never fear. We shall not love our own household
less, because we love others more. In the beautiful words
of Frederika: The human heart is like Heaven; the
more angels, the more room.